title,selftext,subreddit
Determining someone’s sexuality,"Someone I know who is trans male says that he dates cis and trans men, and nonbinary and genderfluid people, but not females. What sexuality would he be?",AskLGBT
Transgender,"I haven't had very many interactions with transgendered people, so I just had a few questions.

From what I understand, the term ""transgender male"" would mean someone who was born ""female, but identifies ""male""? And ""transgender female"" is the opposite? Please correct me if I'm wrong.

And then I was wondering about transgender sexuality, more specifically, does that change the name of their identity? Like, if a transgender female liked females, would she be a lebsian transgender female?

Last, is there anything I should know? Things that I shouldn't say?",AskLGBT
Do I count as bisexual?,"So I love women, and I am attracted to a select few men (mostly Jason Mamoa, Chris Hemsworth etc), but I'm not really into men that much. However, I love sucking dick, swallowing cum and being fucked, but only when I'm either blindfolded, with a trans woman who still has her penis, with a drag queen or with a cross dresser. Am I considered bi, or not?

Edit: I should mention I have tried to hook up with men before, but I was never really into it.",AskLGBT
if you are a female turning to a male do you get to pick your penis?,,AskLGBT
Gender Non Binary Vs Gender Fluid,"From my reading and research I've been trying to understand this. This is my understanding

If a person is non binary then they reject societies gender norms.

But a gender  fluid person embraces  societies  gender norm as in ""today i'm a male so i'll act/dress/behave like a male"" 

&amp;#x200B;

To me one group is saying i'm going to embrace gender stereotypes whilst the other is saying there should be no action/clothing/behavior that is associated with a gender. 

  
How can non binary people support non gender fluid people whilst they reinforce these stereotypes ? ",AskLGBT
Am I bi or pan?,"Hello everyone. Since August, I've been identifying myself as a bisexual. Now that I've explored by sexuality a bit more, I am unsure whether I am bisexual or pansexual.
 
   In my scenario, a person's gender identity is irrelevant to me. I would gladly date any gender and I don't feel as if I have a gender based lean.

   I do, however, have a genital preference (which fluxuates often). 

   I know that pansexual is without a gender lean, but I am wondering if having a genital preference would still place me in the category of bi, or if I'm pan (or even another label entirely). 
 
   Thank you all in advance!!!
  
  (Edit: formatting)",AskLGBT
how did you know that your were trans? What were the thoughts and or feelings you had that made you question?,"I'v been having feelings but I have no idea what's going on, I'v booked into a doctors but I was hoping to get some sort of piece of mind. ",AskLGBT
What is gender identity?,"Hi, I'm quite new to LGBT+ topics so any help/advice and reference to further reading material will be greatly appreciated.

So, to my question, what is gender identity? I have read a bit on Wikipedia and the APA, but still can't really understand it. As far as my understanding of the topic gender goes, there exists:

The biological aspect of it, called sex (or biological sex), which for most humans, it is either female or male

And the cultural aspect of it, where individuals are expected to follow some rules, behaviors and attitudes considered normal and appropriated by a given society, called gender roles. Western societies have usually had/continue having two roles, one for biological females and one for biological males. In other societies this can be different.

I fully understand someone who doesn't want to follow her assigned gender role, as with any expectation driven from society, it's oppressiveness is bound to cause problems.

But I don't understand what gender identity refers to. For instance, what would it mean if an individual identifies as male? Would he be content following his gender role? Our would it be something deeper?",AskLGBT
"New, ready to learn, &amp; looking for advice","I've never been a part of the LGBT community, not because I have a phobia or anti-anything, just straight and never had a great reason.

But now, I just started dating a great person who's bi, and I'd like to learn more and be supportive. I'm just not sure where to start. 

Should I just ask what she'd want me to educate myself on? Should I join an LGBT group with her? Should we just talk about it? Should I even bring up the topic at all?

I think anything at all would help. Thank you so much in advance!",AskLGBT
"My 16yo sister keeps changing their mind about their identity, and I don't know what to do.","I (24f) came out to my sister/sibling (16f/person&lt;3) as pansexual and polyamorous last year before I started dating anyone outside of my marriage. A few months later, they figured out they were bisexual. They've since changed that to pansexual, no biggie, but then this summer, three weeks after beginning to date a trans guy (FTM if that's important to know), my sibling decided to use them they; they started wearing a binder. Two weeks after that, changed their mind again and started going by he him pronouns. 

I'm very very progressive and supportive of all identities. What I'm concerned about is that this is taking place so rapidly and seems to be, rather than a genuine ""I've always known"" expression, an experiment or phase. And I don't know what to do. My sibling has severe depression and anxiety and doesn't open up to their therapist. Our parents are shitty hateful Christians so I'm worried that they're making everything hell for my sibling (although my sibling is not out; I am). And my sibling posts all of their decisions on social media before talking with me about any of it, which strikes me as attention seeking or wanting to have an edgy identity. [My sibling hashtags everything #aesthetic, which indicates a certain amount of teenage angst, no?] 

I don't really know how to be a good big sister here. My sibling has no one to guide them or ask questions to and I'm worried they are trying to copy others instead of live authentically as themself. My sibling has always been very feminine and loved make up, dresses, etc, until very recently. I've tried explaining androgyny and gender nonconformity. My sibling got super pissed at me and told me I was being just as hateful as our mom, which broke me so hard. 

I just want to know that my sibling is healthy. My sibling seems so far from it, not because I think LGBTQ identities are unhealthy; I don't. At all. I'm worried my sibling is unhealthy because of their mental health and general behavior and I don't know how to help them out without losing them altogether. 

I'm so sad that my sibling isn't happy, and I wish more than anything that I could magically change that. Any advice would be utterly amazing. &lt;3",AskLGBT
i've always thought i was straight but i might have feelings for my female best friend,"ok so I'm a 17 year old girl and I've been really struggling with this and I was hoping for some advice! also sorry if this isn't very coherent it's late where I am. 

I've only ever been attracted to men, but I'm questioning my feelings towards my best friend. we are super close and overall have a really deep friendship that I have intense feelings about. I love her a lot and she is the person I trust most in my life, we like to say that we are basically the same person with different personalities if that makes sense. we talk all the time about everything (we've been friends about 8 months) and I think about her a lot- we don't get to hang out very often so im always imagining having conversations with her and I can't decide if that's an abnormal thing? sometimes we'll be sitting close and casually touching and I start to feel nauseous, which is the thing that is most making me question if I like her more than platonically. I can't ignore that feeling she gives me and its really stressing me out. basically I can't decide if she's just a friend I really love and am close with or I have a crush on her? I wouldn't necessarily say im physically attracted to her, like the thought of kissing her feels weird, but maybe im just repressing something?

 I can't decide if this thought got into my head and now im making up all my feelings. also I've never been in a relationship, but the thought of dating her feels wrong I guess because she's my friend. I feel like its probably common to kind of be in love with someone you're really close to, but I wish it wasn't happening to me!! normally something like this I would talk to her about but I can't so I guess that's why im talking to strangers in the internet lmao. ik she only likes guys and I wouldn't want to tell her and mess up this friendship I really value. I've been sort of avoiding her bc I guess im kind of afraid of my feelings. im scared im going to realize that I have a crush on her and I haven't been making it up, and I will have to deal with it and our friendship won't be the same. if anyone has advice or can help me figure out what I'm really feeling I would be so grateful !!",AskLGBT
"Trans people: If there was a pill that your mother could've taken while you were in the womb that would've made you your preferred gender, would you want her to take it?","Not trying to be a troll, but I'm a cis-hetero guy here and just thinking that being trans is not like being gay.  Gay people can just find other gay people and make relationships there.

If I understand everything correctly (which I doubt, and let me know if I am), you need surgery to feel complete, and even then, most of the corrective surgery is painful, difficult, expensive, and sometimes not possible.  

So in this situation, the pill would make you cis, in your preferred gender, you wouldn't know she took the pill.  

Would you want her to take it? 

Update: Unfortunately, without going down a rabbit hole, this only applies to people who were born as one gender/having one set of sexual characteristics, but identify as strictly another.  I'm not trying to exclude agender people, it just doesn't fit the thought experiment. ",AskLGBT
I have existential issues that I need to tell strangers on the internet about and hope to get some advice. Thanks.,"Okay so, hi. I’m 21, female and pansexual, I guess. I always knew I’m attracted to women too, but recently I discovered that I absolutely don’t care what’s going on between the legs of a person that I think is attractive.
So, that’s cool and I’m happy about it. But there’s something going on in my head for quite a while that makes me feel uncomfortable and like there’s something wrong with me. 
Me and my boyfriend are together for almost two years now and I absolutely LOVE him, like I want to grow old with him and just spent the rest of my life with that wonderful person and I can say he loves me as much. Well I guess that’s the jackpot right? But somehow my brain does crazy things. Like I mentioned before I’m also attracted to women but I never made experience with that besides from making out with a few females. 
And I can’t stop thinking about it. Like I have that strange desire to have a romantic relationship with another woman. I want more than a friendship, but like less than the relationship I have with my boyfriend? I don’t know how to describe that feeling. 
I also experienced having crushes on other people and wanting to go deeper than a “regular” friendship but still having a stronger bond with my boyfriend. Whenever that happened I tried to suppress these feelings and told nobody about it. 
I would never ever cheat on my boyfriend but I honestly don’t think there’s a way of exploring those fantasies. 
My boyfriend is very „jealousy“. He’s not putting me in a cage or something, I can do(almost) whatever I want and he trusts me but because of his insecurities he’s constantly worried too. 
I thought about telling him, asking him if a polyamorous relationship is possible but I’m way too scared because I don’t want to hurt his feelings and it definitely will. 
So here I am, telling strangers on the internet what’s going on in my head and hoping, that anybody will respond to my way too long post. Does anybody experience the same feelings/the same situation or just have some advice? 
Please be kind. 
Have a nice day. Thank you. ",AskLGBT
How does one figure out they're demisexual?,,AskLGBT
am i bi/coming out,"this probably won’t be very coherent sorry, it’s late and i’m tired. i’d also like to apologize in advance if i phrase things insensitively, i promise that’s not my intention.
growing up i always thought i was straight (i’m male). but i’ve found lately that in certain scenarios i’m at least somewhat attracted to men and/or trans women, which has confused me. it’s not the same thing as being attracted to women, it’s more purely sexual, i think it’s only really there strongly when juxtaposed with women, although there may be some slight romantic elements at points. i’m not really interested in having any sort of relationship with a man, although i wouldn’t be opposed to a trans woman (although that’s difficult because i don’t know any trans women in real life). i don’t care too much if I “qualifies” as bi (although i still do somewhat - and i’d like to understand more, would this potentially more fall under queer), but i care a lot about discovering who i am, and figuring out for sure what i’m attracted to, id like to know. how do you figure this out? how do you know if it matters, or if it’s just mild average curiousity? i know there’s probably no real line between the two, but from your experience where is it?
i’m also concerned about talking to other people about it. i’m in a very conservative environment, and while i know my closest friends wouldn’t care too much (although i’m a little concerned about how to go about continued with platonic touch, i.e. leaning on my male roommate, who i’m not attracted to at all, during a movie, i don’t want to make it harder for him), i’m still wondering if it’s even worth talking about at this point when it would probably just make my life harder. i don’t think i’d be in danger or anything but i just worry about what people would think.
so yeah that’s pretty much it. any input would be appreciated. if nothing else, thanks for reading because i already feel better just having typed this all out. 

",AskLGBT
"would you mind an impromptu survey? the size of your index and ring finger, equal or unequal?","am curious if there's a relationship between this and sexuality, as recent post indicate.

for those wondering, your index finger is the one closest to your thumb.

mine are equal and I'm straight.",AskLGBT
I’m having huge body issues,"I am a born male but much prefer to look feminine and have no inclination towards physical sex 

But as a physical male my body and voice is a lot more masculine than I want

At measurement of 36, 32, 34 it’s very straight down with big shoulders and I don’t feel good about my shape 

I don’t even have too much of an issue being bustless but I just can’t feel comfortable as I am 

Dieting isn’t doing much 

Is there anything I can do?",AskLGBT
Can you be bi and interested in more than two genders?,,AskLGBT
"I just accepted that I'm at least bisexual after many years of possible repression. I'm incredibly afraid, please help me. I'm a sufferer of depression and OCD and I feel emotionally destroyed right now.","All my life I believed that I was straight, I felt attracted to and enjoyed being in a relationship with a woman. During my younger years I felt attracted to men as well, though did not wish for a relationship with them. I identified as straight during this period of my life and didn't think much of the fact that I was attracted to women and men.

Eventually I became very afraid that I was gay, so I think I started to repress my attraction to men and focus solely on women. In the back of my mind for the past 7 years I was always afraid that I might be gay, or bisexual. Why that would be a bad thing, I'm not sure. But it scared me.

I had a very strong, intense relationship with a woman during this 7 year period. And I have no doubt in my mind that I was both physically and romantically in love with her, even a year and a half after she dumped me (now) I still feel her in my heart somewhat. Also during this 7 year period, though I constantly fought and doubted myself over my sexuality, I never doubted that I liked women. I was always aroused and attracted to women, that part of myself at least, I never doubted.

Part of me feels the biggest reason I was afraid to accept that I might be bisexual or gay is because I felt as though I was losing the identity that I thought I had, the person I thought I was and enjoyed being.

During this 7 year repression period I sometimes was aroused by men, sometimes not. Sometimes it felt like I was just convincing myself that I was, sometimes it felt real. Either way, I was in a very vulnerable space tonight and grew very aroused for some reason. This eventually leaded to me ""relieving"" myself to gay porn.

After I was finished I felt content that I finally gave into my urges, an hour after that, I truly considered committing suicide. I've always suffered from depression, anxiety, and OCD, and the gay urges were one of my biggest OCD thoughts. I had suicidal thoughts (not only over this, it was many factors in my life) throughout this period, second guessing myself over everything was a burden that was so impossible to bear.

I don't know what to do now. I sort of feel like crying. I don't want to accept that I might be bisexual or gay after living my life as a straight man for the past 26 years. I truly do like women, but even now (because of my OCD) I'm forced to doubt myself and think that I'm exclusively gay.

In my heart I feel as though I wouldn't have a problem being bisexual. I was ""bisexual"" in my youth and that wouldn't be so different if I began that lifestyle again, but I'm still very afraid that I might be gay. For the same reason as before, I'm afraid that I will lose my identity of who I was.

I'm going through full time schooling right now, and on top of my depression (and now this) I truly feel like dropping out of school. This is not something I feel as though I can handle or accept at the moment, 7 years of repression has ingrained into my mind that being attracted to men wasn't something I enjoyed.

Apparently this wasn't the case. I wish I was straight or full blown gay and completely confident in myself about my attraction to the opposite or same sex. My OCD makes me doubt that I'm attracted to either, even though I feel like I'm attracted to both. It feels good to admit that, but at the same time my OCD is making me doubt that I'm attracted to women now...even though I never doubted it before.

I truly don't know how to talk to about this, I'm so sorry if this post is so long. Please help me.",AskLGBT
How to help out a friend who is transgender?,"We are both only 15 and he (Now she) has been out as trans for about a year. I've noticed that they have been in a spiral downwards and it is getting out of control. she constantly talks about how nobody cares about them and complain when their parents keep calling them by their ""deadname"", even though she doesn't realize that it has been tough for everybody in her life. She also acts as though everybody should cater to her all the time. I don't really agree with them being trans, but I care too much about them as a friend and support them anyway. What can I do to let them know that I and the other people in her life actually care about her? And also possibly let them know that they aren't the center of the universe at the same time? I really don't want to be a dick about it because we have been friends for years and years.",AskLGBT
What are the experiences of a heteroromantic homosexual/homoromantic heterosexual person?,"I've always wondered that if romantic and sexual attraction are separated, how do people whose romantic and sexual attractions just don't line up deal with relationships?  Anyone who can shed some light on it would be appreciated!",AskLGBT
Why do gay people sound feminine?,,AskLGBT
Is Heteromantic Asexual LGBT?,"I am Heteromantic Asexual cis male (attracted to girls and feminine-leaning nonbinary and agender people) and recently I’ve been getting heat from LGBTQ+ people saying that Heteromantic Asexual isn’t LGBTQ+ even though it’s part of the Asexual spectrum, and Asexual is part of LGBTQ+. 

So does it still count?",AskLGBT
"If the prefixes pan- and poly- exist, is the prefix bi- rendered redundant?","...or does ""polysexual/polyromantic"" connote multiple *simultaneous* attractions, whereas ""bisexual/biromantic"" would be more useful for describing being attracted with one sex or gender expression at a time? This is the best I can come up with, without finding a definitive source to discern the terms in a way that would deem bi- necessary. Otherwise the prefix bi- just seems like an outdated one.

[I saw this chart of terms online](https://7cupstearesources.s3.amazonaws.com/img/qa/whats-the-difference-between-pansexuality-bisexuality-and-polysexuality-746-zmRnd32Xl-JO45lrhljF.jpg) and it got me thinking it might help to clear it up for me, but I'm still looking for a clearer answer or confirmation of what I've come up with above.

Please forgive any flubbing of terminology I've done here and correct me if necessary. I'm essentially trying to understand the differences between the terms so that if someone says they identify as one or the other, I know what that means.",AskLGBT
Questions about being attracted sexually but not romantically to the same sex.,"I'm a 30-something woman. I've been with men my whole life, am attracted to them sexually and romantically. 

I've had a couple of sexual experiences with women, I know that I'm attracted to them sexually but I have no idea if I could fall in love and have a relationship with a woman. 

I'm quite curious about this, but every time I'm single, I don't get the opportunity to test it. And I think that I'm scared to try, because I would hate to disappoint my hypothetical partner if I were to realize that women are not for me. So I always end up with a man and keep asking myself ""what if?"".

My questions:

- How common is it for a woman to be attracted to women sexually but not romantically ?
- Is it frowned upon in the community ?
- Could I have the cacapity to fall in love with women and have not realized it by now, being in my 30's ?
- In your opinion, if I were to really not be romantically attracted to women, but only sexually, would I be legitimate to call myself bisexual ? ",AskLGBT
"my highschool is starting a club for LGBT students, any suggestions for stuff we can do?",,AskLGBT
Is there a sub for people with gender dysphoria who still identify as cis?,"Kind of specific. I would prefer to have been born a woman, and if there was some process by which I could rewind time I would definitely change to be born a woman.

&amp;#x200B;

But, alas, it's not to be. Gender as a whole is not terribly important to me, so I really don't mind being a guy all that much, and I definitely don't want to do any transitioning-related stuff, it's a huge hassle for what would be a very marginal gain. Plus at this point my whole life and view has been shaped by being a guy, so even if there were the ability to transition perfectly and it weren't still viewed as weird, I'm not sure it would be much of a benefit.

&amp;#x200B;

So, I don't really identify as trans and I would never want to transition, but I wish I'd been born a girl. Is there any sub for discussion of that? I have a lot of confusing feelings I'd like to get sorted out :)",AskLGBT
Writer Questions on being closeted,"I want to write a character who is ""closeted"" about his magical powers, as they are typically seen as shameful, unholy, and/or frightening and experiences much prejudice from religious individuals. I thought a good way to get an insight was to ask the LGBT community who may have had similar experiences.

Any LGBT persons are welcomed to answer any and all questions that apply to them and they feel comfortable answering. Sorry if any questions are offensive.

  

Sex: Male, Female, Trans, Other (pls specify)

Sexuality: Gay, Bi, Ace, Other (pls specify)

Are you out to your: parents, siblings, close friends, casual friends, boss, coworkers, and/or classmates?

What made you come out to one group but not others?

What makes you the most hesitant to let someone know? (Politics, religion, gender, closeness to someone, an action/statement they made)

How early in knowing someone do you tell them? (Right away, after you feel safe around them, need to know, they usually can tell without saying anything to them)

What was the most difficult thing about coming out? 

Who was the most difficult person to come out to? Did you expect them to accept or reject you?

What was the worst/best/most typical reaction you got?

How did your religious family / friends / community react?

How did your relationships change after coming out?

Do you regret coming out?

How much of a detriment to your emotional well being is it to be closeted?

Has someone who knew told someone you weren’t ready to tell yet? Was it malicious or accidental?

What happened? Did you forgive them? Did it end your relationship? How did you feel about the results?

Do you feel like there are more or less barriers for you now?

Do people around you feel the need to tread carefully when talking about their opinions on LGBT issues? 

Do you appreciate this or does it offend/annoy you?

Have you experienced unexpected judgment/bigotry from a different part of the LGBT community or a group that that is generally thought of as tolerant or an ally? (Liberals/democrats, atheists, other minorities)

If (for example) a job interview declines to hire you, do you ever think “it’s because I’m \_\_\_\_” when it’s not explicitly stated, and how often do you think it might actually be the case?

Which if any of these questions do you find bigoted or offensive?

EDIT: new questions:

Do you ever wish that you weren’t gay / bi / ace / trans / etc?

Have you ever had or thought about having conversion therapy? Not the bs kind like electrical shock therapy or an exorcism, but like talking it out with a therapist or taking drugs (is that even a thing?)

If you were pressured into the bs kind by parents or religious figures, how did it affect you?",AskLGBT
Pansexual vs bisexual?,"Tldr: ELI5- the difference between pansexual and bisexual?

My girlfriend is pansexual and I have a basic understanding of what that means, but do you think I could have an in depth ELI5 about the difference? My friends keep telling me she's bisexual, which I obviously have to try and explain the difference. I just feel like I need a better way to explain it it them too😅",AskLGBT
"I'm making a website, but I need more opinions. What did/do you need?"," Hey, so white, pansexual, trans masc software developer here. A (white, cis, heterosexual, male) friend and I are in the brainstorming portion of website creation. We want to make a resource for people who are questioning their gender and/or sexuality (like, uh, yours truly, going into year four of the unknown gender zone). What would yall have wanted/want in a website like that? We don't currently have clear goals, so we're looking for fairly open-ended input right now. If you have some random idea that isn't touched on in the post but is relevant, please feel free to share it.

# Some things we're thinking about (feedback welcome):

* adaptive content. Users would take a quiz off the bat that asks some questions that will parse out what sorts of information they're looking for, and the content of the site changes accordingly.
* easily shareable/uncensorable. Easy to save to a harddrive, host from another site, share on Tor (and loads on somewhat spotty internet connection, as rural internet often is). Also potentially a button that would hide the screen as a Bible study (I'm personally thinking of religious households here), vague names at the tops of a tab, something that won't look suspicious if found in browser history, etc.

We haven't decided if we want to gear this towards just gender or include sexuality, or towards teens specifically (or anyone questioning), if we want content to include some means of larger data access (history of LGBTQ+ worldwide/other cultures' takes/religious references or perspectives).

Some of the content we're thinking of having would be stories and/or interviews with LGBTQ+ folks and/or linking to mentor services (which I don't know where to find, pls help).

# Some specific questions yall could answer that would be helpful:

* What were yall googling when you were struggling or unsure?
* What questions were yall most keen on having answers to during that period, or even now if you'd use such a site?
* What were the barriers to entry for you as you underwent self-discovery, and how might we tear those down?
* Do you know of other sites and resources that we could draw on, link to/reference, or that otherwise already fills some of these needs?

If you think you'd be good at and interested in **writing content** for such a site, PLEASE let me know. If you're an **illustrator or designer** who would like to volunteer your services, please let me know. This is just something we're doing for fun because it's a need we know of that I as a teen (and, hell, right this minute) didn't have and would've killed for.

Also, we're both white, and both masculine-leaning. Answers from folks of color and feminine perspectives would be A++++. I'm a little worried about us making this site in a vacuum. What would be helpful?

\*\* This is posted on another similar subreddit as well. I'm not really on reddit very much, so let me know if me posting this here isn't kosher. \*\*",AskLGBT
[20M] Am I too old to begin questioning my sexuality?,"Up until last year, I was pretty certain that I was straight. But for some reason I have begun really questioning whether I was also attracted to men, because I'm still attracted to women but I have also havestarted becoming more attracted to men. It's something that I have been sort of going back and forth with in my mind.",AskLGBT
"When a person who is genderfluid passes away, what gender do you refer to them as?","Are they the gender they were when they died? The gender they were when they were born? Are they just neutral?
I really don't know",AskLGBT
Too young to know I’m lgbt?,"So I discovered the lgbt community at age 12ish, and I never thought about liking girls or being something other than female until then. I researched the word bisexual and felt like it applied to me. Then I found transgender. At first, I was like, hmm cool, but then I researched it more and I was like well I guess I might be trans. Currently I’m nearly 14 and extremely confused. I’m scared that I brainwashed myself into thinking that I’m queer/trans. I’m thinking this because I spent a lot of time researching this (I’m not joking, literally 8-9 hours a day) and maybe it’s been drilled into my brain. I was never really uncomfortable about my body before I found out about trans people and now I want to rip my skin off and just be a boy, but I was super girly up until I was 10. Am I going through a phase or am I for real?",AskLGBT
Is there a gay culture and if their is can a straight man be culturally gay?,,AskLGBT
Too conservative to be LGBT?,"My sexual orientation is Heteromantic Asexual (which is asexual spectrum and counts as LGBT) but I feel like I don’t fit in because I consider myself “too conservative” to be LGBT and my view is very contradictory to the rest.

Please note that these statements are based on MY personal experiences with the LGBT community.

I Have a belief in only 3 genders (male, female, other)

I believe in more traditional masculinity and femininity (in terms of how they should behave), and so I hold trans men and women to the same societal standards as cis men and women, meaning I expect trans men to be tough and resilient (so no “soft boys”, “flower boys”, “fairy boys”, etc.), and trans women to act like women (which thankfully out of the surprisingly-few trans women I’ve met, they do)

I despise 3rd wave feminism

I despise liberals (aka SJWs)

I’m part of a Republican family and intend to follow in their footsteps.

I’m very logical and analytical, so I rely on facts, logic, and rationale instead of emotions, which is what many LGBTs rely on.

I don’t like the common “dyed hair and piercings” look associated with many LGBTs (as it is both unnecessary in the bigger picture and makes you look less proper and immature)

My mindset is more black and white (although there are some grey aspects of LGBT that I do agree with)

I can’t relate to many LGBTs due to me both not experiencing their lifestyle and the fact that due to my nature, I’m not good at empathizing with people.

I don’t like that some LGBTs think they’re special, self-entitled, privileged, or that they’re a separate people when in reality, they’re not. They’re still expected to be mature, refined, self-responsible adults regardless of gender or sexuality. 

I posted a video explaining my points on TikTok and a popular LGBT person said that I’m still welcome, but I personally don’t know for sure.

I mean I still treat LGBT people with respect and use correct pronouns and all that.",AskLGBT
Why so much LGBT hatred towards President Trump [Serious],"For transparency and background. I am a cis straight male. I honestly want some serious and honest answers.  Thank you in advance.

I keep reading and seeing protests towards the President. People call him a Homophobe.  Yet I haven't heard what he did or said that would warrant being called a Homophobe from the LGBT community. Then Candidate Trump ran on a pro-LGBT platform. 

I was also wondering why the LGBT Community love President Obama when he ran on a pro-Traditional Marriage platform in 2008 and flipped to pro-LGBT in 2012 because his opponent then Senator Hillary Clinton was running on a pro-traditional Marriage platform. Hillary then flipped to a Pro-LGBT platform in 2016. My question is with both candidates[Clinton and Trump]running on Pro-LGBT rights platforms what is it about Trump that makes him a Homophobe?",AskLGBT
Can someone explain gender to me?,"Specifically I'm confused about gender outside of the realm of male, female, and gender neutral. I understand that gender is fluid and you can be male, female, gender neutral, gender fluid or gender queer and anywhere in between. But I don't understand these genders outside of that spectrum. Like, how can you identify with a gender with not reference in reality. No disrespect meant.",AskLGBT
"I am DJing/MCing a Pride party, and I want to do it right.","I do 2 Saturdays every month at a geeky video game bar that also occasionally hosts Pride events and supports the community in a variety of other ways. I was never the DJ for those events because it just landed on other DJs that are also regulars at the bar.

For a variety of unrelated reasons, those other DJs are taking a break from DJing and hosting events, and I have been asked to take over them. A friend of mine came up with the idea for ""Dragonborn This Way - A Fantasy Pride Party"", which is meant to be a combination Pride event and also celebrate fantasy themed pop culture (Skyrim, GoT, LOTR, you get the idea).

I am a straight CIS male. I also consider myself an ally. I wanted to create an event that would combine two things that haven't been combined before. I'm also afraid of unintentionally appropriating LGBT culture in order to promote it. I don't want the entire event to be an excuse to make puns that combine a glossary of LGBT terms with fantasy races and classes.

Should I reach out to LGBT organizations to partner up with them and figure out a way to benefit them?

How can I promote and put on this event without it being problematic? Or am I overthinking this? Thanks.",AskLGBT
How Are There So Many Genders?,"Hi, I'm bisexual and an atheist, I have no real reason to care or be prejudiced about anyone else's claim to a gender, I just genuinely don't understand how there can be more than three potential genders. You're attracted to men, women or you're attracted both (or none, but that would sort of seem more like a lack of gender to me), right? I also don't understand why trans people are defined as other, because if you're trans, doesn't that mean you want to be identified as the gender you transitioned into? So I don't know why there would even need to be further subcategorization in relation to trans people because wouldn't it be better in terms of normalizing to just refer to them as the gender they became rather than trans this or that? Because if you look like the gender you want to look like now, why would you be upset that someone didn't know that you were originally another gender and they just referred of you as what you are now? It's very confusing to me, any clarification would be much appreciated, thank you.",AskLGBT
Is there a word for people you are not out to?,"I feel like it would be convenient to have one, because if I say "" I was hanging out with my straight friends"". That could mean that they know I am lgbt, and it could also mean that I am not out to them. If I want to specify that I am not out to them I have to say ""people whom I am not yet out to"" which is a big mouthfull. Is there a word yet for this. I think there should be a word.",AskLGBT
Who steals the hoodies?,"So in straight relationships, the girl steals the hoodies from the guys. How do gay ppl steal hoodies from their partners? Is ot from who's most outwardly butch? Whoevers smaller steals hoodies from the larger partner? I need to know.",AskLGBT
Bi Visibility Day and Media Representation!," It's Bi Visibility day!! Positive representation matters! That is why we are working on a study to measure the impact of positive representation on the bi community(ies). Check out this survey on bi representation :   
 r/https://umassboston.qualtrics.com/jfe/form/SV_6WOsZl1i2BrfRfD   Happy Visibility Day everyone! 

*Processing img bse9a7nt33o11...*",AskLGBT
"Am I just a ""strong ally"" or a ""member"" of the lgbt community?","On some level, I guess this is kind of a ""am I queer? Is this what queer is?"" post. I socially identity as male and straight. I'm fairly aware about fellow (white) straight men horning in on community spaces they don't belong to just to cause trouble and ""well actually"" it up. But, maybe I've done the same? I've always felt really close to the GSM/LGBTQ+ community, have more queer friends than non-queer, and as a kid did quite a bit of advocacy. (small town/college clubs and stuff).  
But I'm older now, and get teased by friends in two directions: 

""You're telling me you've gotten this far and never actually explored who you are yourself?"" 

and

""You're just such an SJW that you'll make any excuse to be a minority if you can.""  


Right. So ignoring those, I'm like, properly adult. Like doctors say ""you're just, you know, old now."" when I complain about aches. It seems ridiculous to think about this stuff, like, I would have known by now, right? Well, in the case of 'Is NotCecilP part of the queer community?' here's some over share:  


1. I use queer because I'm an academic, and I do a lot of 'queer theory.'

2. I very much just accept my social role without questions. I think in terms of external factors, like ""my birth certificate says male and I have a penis, so I am male.""  


3. When asked how I identify internally, I draw a blank. My thoughts are generally like ""I am the pilot of this body, and this body is male. This male body gets aroused by women, therefore I am straight.""  


4. I really don't like being touched, but I've got a pretty big sex drive. I have, in my years, slept with quite a few women, and a couple men. The men.... just no. No attraction to their bodies, no attraction to them. That was a quick to answer question. The women? Massive attraction to bodies, to their personalities, etc. Sex though? Is kinda gross. And sweaty. And there's this constant limbo between ""I want to have sex with them"" then ""Ew, I just had sex. Now I want a shower.""  


5. I really like giving oral, to any set of genitals, but generally only if they're attached to women. Leave my set out of it, enjoyment of sex sky rockets.

&amp;#x200B;

6. Overt sexiness and sexuality really freaks me out. I've been dragged to drag shows, and as much of an ""ally"" I am, I just can't enjoy it. Or strip clubs. Or club clubs. People hitting on me in general. Sex scenes in movies. Anything with heavy base music and clothing being removed. I may be old now, but I never liked this stuff. I get called a prude a lot, and I think ""is that so bad?"" coupled with ""shit, kid, if you knew half the shit I've done you'd never call me a prude.""

&amp;#x200B;

7. Oh, as far as sex goes, I've been exposed to fetish/debauched shit since childhood. My brother was really into bondage, like hooks and needles level, and prepubescent me totally found his magazines/tapes. The internet, in my teens, gave me some pretty weird images, and I'd hunt through the strangest porn just going ""But..... but why?"" My friends (and family, actually.) drag me to fetish conventions periodically, and mostly I just kind of go ""Oh. That's a thing. Ok.""

&amp;#x200B;

8. When reading/watching things, for fun usually but also academically, I always gravitate toward characters that wind up later being gay. Or characters that turn out to be trans. Or anything of the sort. It's probably because of my friend circle, but sometimes it's disconcerting. The biggest example is Cecil from Welcome to Nightvale. I spent the first few episodes just loudly thinking to myself ""Holy fuck, that's me. I am this character."" One of my cohort laughed, and told me it was good to know I finally was coming out of the closet.

&amp;#x200B;

9. I get really weepy at coming out stories. I love reading them. I love hearing them. I, as far as I know, have nothing to come out as, so I won't be having my own. And that's fine, but man do I enjoy watching people affirm their identity.  


10. I don't like my body and facial hair. It wavers between ""this is inconvenient and I'm not a fan"" to ""uuuuugh, get this the fuck off of me."" I've considered getting laser done because I hate that greasy feeling my face gets after I shave. Seems like a ridiculous expense for an academic, though.  


11. I go through pains to find fashion styles that reduce my shoulders/chest, and make my hips a bit more noticeable. It's kind of a fun game I play ""how not suit like can I make this suit and still look like a professor."" If I had less of a jaw, or softer features over all, it'd be pretty cool. Maybe I just want to be young again? But I've thought this even when I was young.

  
12. I've recently gotten a large urge to paint my nails (I used to in high school) which is odd. I figure it's a youthful throw back, but, it struck me as big enough to actually be the thing that drove me to post this. It's probably the only external desire to do something that isn't tied to ""disappearing into the background"" and ""conforming to social role at all costs.""  


  
To get all feminist on this, I feel like I've been performing 'straight dude' my whole life, amongst other things. But if you strip away that performance, there is no actor underneath. I'm just a background role, with quirks, and nothing else. I feel kind of like Kevin Kline in ""In and Out,"" to some degree. So every time I think ""but I'm not X!!!!"" I just laugh to myself.

I've relayed some personal weirdness, and I figured if anyone had insight, it would be nice. However, this is mostly just some guy hashing out some personal stuff anonymously on the internet and wasting everyone's time.  


Thanks for reading! Any questions or comments are appreciated. ",AskLGBT
"Is there or was there ever such a thing as a ""gay handshake""?",I hear conflicting stories about this whenever it comes up.  Both gay and straight people have told me there's a handshake that gay men use to identify each other.  I've also heard that this handshake is different depending on where you go.  Anyone have any experience with this?,AskLGBT
Can I ease my gender dysphoria without eventually using hormones?,"I'm a bisexual male at about a 80/20 preference towards females. 
I've always liked cute girls, but I always felt this sense of unease when I considered those emotions.

 It was only recently after my 19th birthday that I realized I didn't just find myself attracted to cute girls, I wanted to *be* a cute girl. 

My parents and friends are very understanding so I'm not worried about backlash or anything.

But when I do decide to transition, will hormones be necessary? I may sound ignorant but I don't want breasts or a curvier body or a higher voice. Would crossdressing be enough? 

I know this seems like a simple case of ""try it out and escalate as necessary"" but I'd like to hear other's takes.",AskLGBT
What does it mean to be transgender?,"I am really trying to understand this. I am really not trying to offend anyone. Someone please help me.

Sex is biological. Gender is constructed. Right? So when we say gender is constructed, we are talking about behaviors and experiences that are designated as masculine or feminine. And this designation is fundamentally arbitrary and distinct from biological sex. Right?

So let's say person A is male, and extremely feminine, and identifies as a man. And person B is male, and extremely feminine, and identifies as a woman.

What is the difference between A and B? What makes B trans?",AskLGBT
What should I do for my high school's second GSA meeting?,"Hey all, I'm the vice president of my high schools GSA and I'm looking for some ideas for what we should do in our second meeting tomorrow. On our first meeting last week, myself and our president laid out a general roadmap for what we planned to do this year (fundraisers to donate to LGBTQ+ causes, have discussions on relevant topics and current events, show films/music, and establish a presence in our school newspaper). The thing is, our high school is only about 200 people in total, and our club is maybe 20 people (depending on who leaves and joins throughout the next few meetings), and our meeting time is during our lunch period (about 40 minutes). 

I've been searching through GLSEN and GSA resources, but they mostly just outline general things like activism and fostering a social space, rarely anything specific. I've tried to google team building exercises and stuff we could fit into our 40 minute meeting time, yet I'm struggling to find something that a group of high schoolers would enjoy doing.

I'm writing up ideas in a google doc, and right now we just plan on starting our meeting tomorrow with member introductions (we introduced the Pres/VP last week and decided to wait on introducing the members because people would be leaving and joining), but then I'm honestly clueless on where to go from there. Jumping into a fundraiser this early seems a bit excessive and our school newspaper isn't prepped enough yet for us to be able to write for it, so I guess we could go from introductions to discussing relevant current events? 

I'm sorry for the wall of text and word vomit but I've been caught up in college apps and both myself and the president procrastinated on this and we need some last minute help. Thank you very much for any ideas in advance.",AskLGBT
Questions as a writer :),"Hey all, I write high fantasy and focus on representation and being inclusive because, well, there's no reason not to. I've run into an issue in representing the LGBT+ community, though: my main character in one story isn't human, and, in her society, their main focus is what can you do for the Clan? Identify how you want, love whomever you want, do what makes you happy if it doesn't harm others(so, ya know, nobody's walking around punching people in the eye). As long as you, in some way, whether it be caring for children or hunting/fighting, or cooking, or crafting weapons, or maintaining the garrison, or gathering herbs, or building, you're a member of the Clan. 

Because of this, in my mind, they don't label themselves in terms of sexuality. If you're trans, you can seek out the gods for a complete transition, or if your Clan can spare you for a bit, you can travel for an admittedly easier to obtain transition(secondary traits are easier and cheaper, but internal changes can be made if your Clan can survive with you being away and having to recover for however long). If you don't identify with either gender, that's fine, you have a name, after all. The characters' sexualities and identities aren't the plot, so it feels forced to say oh have you seen her WIFE, if it isn't context relevant,  like it's just to point out she has a wife. 

When my character does eventually meet humans, the humans do have and use these labels, but I can't see any reason for them in a society that already doesn't ""care,"" or at least not in the sense of differentiating between each other. 

Does that make sense? If I'm still integrating their identities throughout the story, does it ""work"" to not use labels, at least not immediately? I don't want to portray anyone in a way that's hurtful or damaging or even inaccurate.",AskLGBT
How to protray bigotry realistically?,"So one of my characters is bi and her friend feels like he might have made too many jokes about it (they're not mean spirited and this character enjoys joking around with her friend) so he asks a girl he meets (who's lesbian) how to be more ""aware"" basically. He's just trying to be a good friend, although she interprets him as homophobic (despite him  always treating his bi friend as an equal.)

This character is basically a bully and believes that if you're bisexual you can't face discrimination. Even at one point remarking ""it'd be easy if bi people didn't exist because they make it harder on us.""(she says this during a heated argument and tries backtracking) Which the guy friend takes great offense in, even when she tries to brush it off. 

The point is that it doesn't matter who you are, you shouldn't treat anyone as a lesser or tell them they can't have problems have their own.

How can I display this bully character realistically? 
",AskLGBT
Should I be stating my pronouns as a cis person?,"People at work are increasingly adding their preffered pronouns to their email signature, regardless of their gender, appearance or orientation. We're a large organization and I'm in a department that's generally pretty mindful of inclusion. I've joined suit, but I feel weird about it. I'm a cis female who presents as a cis female. I've never had to cope with any pronoun-related adversity. So while I understand that the idea of this as an initiative is that if everyone does it, it will create an environment in which it's entirely standard and for anyone who wants to do so to feel free and not stand out, part of me feels like this might look like cavalier appropriation. So, thoughts from relevant community members - does it feel supportive to have everyone join in in stating their pronouns or are we misguided?",AskLGBT
Have your tastes changed post-transition?,"Are there any changes in the way a trans individual feels about things like music and movies once they move into their confirmed genders? Obviously, there would be no fully encompassing answer, but I've been wondering if the changes in hormone levels, self-identity and even changes in social circumstances would also affect one's perceptions of what makes a good song, film or culinary experience.  I'm just curious. ",AskLGBT
Looking for help understanding some things about gender identity as a concept.,"Let me start by saying I’m a straight cis white guy, not looking to offend anybody so please correct me if I have the wrong idea about anything. I fully support all walks of the LGBTQ+ community, I’m just trying to get a better understanding of how people within the community perceive my thoughts here. I also don’t really know how to succinctly put my thoughts into words so if anything needs clarification let me know. 

My main question is, for trans* or agender people, doesn’t ascribing gender as a paramount feature of one’s identity perpetuate gender norms? Like, my thoughts are that by rejecting the “boxes” of male and female and describing yourself as somewhere either in between or on the outside, you are acknowledging the existence of those boxes. Why is identity so closely tied with gender for a significant portion of the community if the current gender norms should be deconstructed? Why do sex and gender not simply refer to biology, and pronouns continue to match that of biological sex, while people who reject the current gender norms or the concept of gender norms as a whole still do so without describing themselves as another gender?

With my current understanding, gender identity seems more linked to personality than to sex. By linking it to sex and describing yourself as a gender inconsistent with your biological sex, it sort of confirms the idea that men and women should express themselves as society sees fit, and that if you don’t do that, you aren’t a man or woman, hence people transitioning and/or outright rejecting the two “boxes.”

My bottom line is that, the way I see it right now, it’s possible to still describe oneself as a man or woman while rejecting the norms associated with being a man or a woman, and expressing oneself in a way that reflects that rejection. 

Again, I’m sorry if this was in any way offensive, it’s something I’ve been thinking about a lot lately and I thought the best place to ask something like this would be the community itself in order to get a full understanding. I fully support letting people live the life they want to live, and I understand that for a lot of people, being trans or agender isn’t an active thing that they chose to do in order to reject any societal norms or to necessarily accomplish anything for anybody other than themselves, and that’s great. I just want more incite into what people who are actively fighting gender norms through their gender identity think about this, as sometimes things seem counterintuitive to that goal.",AskLGBT
What do you call your sexual orientation if you're genderfluid but only attracted to one gender?,"E.g., I'm genderfluid but only attracted to women, so I'm straight part of the time and lesbian part of the time. Is there an alternative term that I can use all the time?

I'd guess the right word would be something like gynosexual (or androsexual if you're attracted to men), but if there's some 'official' vocabulary floating around I'd like to use it.",AskLGBT
Identity vs stereotypes,"I used to kinda hate on non binary people, but now I realize that this is because their existance made me question my own gender. So I want to confront my insecuriry.

I was assigned female at birth, and I hate being treated differently by boys because I’m a girl, and also being expected to dress a certain way. Does that mean I’m not a girl? 

I know there isn’t a simple answer but I appreciate any insights.",AskLGBT
Guy I hookup with calls themselves ace but I feel it’s an oxymoron. Help?,"I met this guy on tinder (I think I’m allowed to say guy, they identify as queer but have never corrected me when I called them a guy) and they told me they were asexual. I’m fine with that, we hang out, and end up hooking up and banging. Clearly that’s sexual attraction. I find it weird they identify as ace though. Can someone clear up why their identification is still valid/makes sense? Thanks ",AskLGBT
Is it wrong to call non binary people non binaries?,"I referred to non binary people as non binaries, but someone said that calling non binary people non binaries is like calling gay people gays. I though of it as you don't say girl people or boy people, you say girls or boys, and since non binary is also a gender, it would make sense to call them non binaries. Are they right and should I stop calling them non binaries?",AskLGBT
Is it wrong for someone to not feel comfortable undressing infront of someone whos attracted to their gender,"I recently heard about this (never thought about it) and on one hand I understand how it could be alianating

But on the other hand if a gay guy told me (I’m a straight woman) he felt more comfortable undressing infront of lesbians or straight dudes I wouldnt bat an eye.

Like some people  feel uncomfortable being seen naked by others who could see them sexually in general and maybe thats be enchanced when its someone you arent “on the same level” with, so like;

A lesbian might feel uncomfortable undressing infront of a straight guy, 
a gay guy might feel uncomfortable undressing infront of a straight girl, 
a straight guy might feel uncomfortable undressing infront of a gay guy,
and a straight girl might feel uncomforable undressing infront of a lesbian.

And then it affects everyone but if its because you think gay people are icky and predatory then its obviously homophobia.",AskLGBT
"What's the best smut you've ever read (fanfic, published or otherwise)?",,AskLGBT
"Why do gay people refer to themselves as ""queen"" or ""empress"", but they don't want to be women?",,AskLGBT
Confused about who im attracted too,Ive been wondering if I was gay ever since I was 11. After having sex with a female for the second time I realized that it wasnt for me. I thought the first time was just a fluke and i was with the wrong woman. After having sex again with a different woman I realized that i simply wasnt interested in woman like that. With that being said im still not 100% sure im gay either. Ive never been in a gay relationship (though I have fantasized before) and i am attracted to men to a certain degree. Ive been too afraid to be in a relationship with a man in highschool. Now im 18 and in a different city and have no one to talk to about this and im sooooo confused about everything.  ,AskLGBT
"Is the phrase ""gay pride"" offensive?","I don't know where I picked it up, but I use this phrase all the time and on Sunday my pastor told me that it was wrong. I don't mean to offend anyone and will start just saying ""pride"" if that is more acceptable.

Does anyone here know the answer? Thank you in advance!",AskLGBT
Why are the majority of transwomen mainly attracted to women?,,AskLGBT
Will I have regrets if I settle down before experimenting?,"I've been dating my SO since I was 15 and since before I knew I was bisexual. We're a great match and I love him so much, but I can't shake the disappointment that I might never get to fall in love/make love to with a woman.",AskLGBT
Confessing,"Hello, there's this friend of mine in school who I find really cute and dashing. I've had romantic feelings towards him ever since the start of the year but I'm not sure how he would react to it. I've never seen it myself but I heard from my other friends that he was in a relationship with another guy (all in the same school) before but they broke up after awhile.   


 I would consider both of us to be extremely close as we don't really have much time to hang out together (different classes). But there is one class where we sit together (no more classes for that :( ) and he would try to poke my hands and just give those subtle interactions. He doesn't do that to many people however, I am not the only person whom he does it to. They say you can tell if someone is bi or into you by looking at the way they look at you with your eyes but I can't really see it XD. I plan to confess to him after our exams in mid november but I'm not sure what to expect because there is no concrete evidence of whether he likes me back or if he is actually into guys. Any advice, opinions and insights would be greatly appreciated.

&amp;#x200B;

Thanks for reading this longarse text :)",AskLGBT
How do we determine if being asexual is a identity or a medical issue?,I've often wondered this. The absence of a sex drive can be symptmatic for certain biological issues and hormone imbalances. When are we certain that it is a way  of life rather than a medical issue to be addressed? And does the LGBTQ literature advocate anywhere for an investigation into the cause of this?,AskLGBT
"Is there a word that just means ""fluid"" in every respect?","As in, fluid about your gender, sexuality, self-identification, mode of dress, and so on?

&amp;#x200B;

I'm not wild about using 'queer' partly because of the derogatory use and partly because the word itself implies 'not normal'. It feels like there should be a word that means ""I feel how I feel at this point in time but I'm open to change/this could change at any time"". ",AskLGBT
"How do I get my parents to call me ""he"" ?","I recently came out to them that I am genderfluid, but they do not respect that in the slightest. Most especially, my mom. She's told me I will always be her daughter and nothing is going to change that. I keep trying to let her know how much it would mean to me and how important it is, but she won't back down. What do I do?",AskLGBT
"My boyfriend is gay (and rather defensive about it), and I’m MtF trans. Would it be wrong for me to ask him to not tell people he’s gay?","Long story short, my boyfriend isn’t attracted to cis women, or most trans women either. I’ve asked him a few times about this, and he angrily said “Why can’t you just let me like who I like and not try and put me in a box?” So I know this is a touchy subject for him...

Put now it’s come to a point where I may very well start passing as a girl soon. He already refers to me as his girlfriend, and by my name, but insists he’s gay when the topic comes up. That’s enough for most people to make the inference, and has outed me before to people not paying much attention to the conversation.

I’m not ashamed of being trans, or even consider it something to hide. I just prefer people seeing me as “Lily” rather than “That transgender person.” 

I don’t want to invalidate my boyfriend’s sexual orientation, especially since his being gay is a part of who he is. On the other hand though, I’d really not like to have this conversation ever time it comes up... Help?",AskLGBT
My (20M) Girlfriend's (18F) Gay Friend's (18M) actions are new to me and I don't know how to react/understand,"So i posted this to the /r/relationships sub but after a day it was taken down, the mid suggested to post it here as they thought it would be more appropriate. I didn't think of it at the time but i do want an opinion from someone who might have more experience and perspective on this whole situation.

Please do not get offended by anything I say below I'm not experienced enough with LGBT people and have only ever had exposure and met people when i went to college. What I'm writing is with best intentions and is not intentionally there to offend anyone.

Thank you in advance for your help.

So myself and my girlfriend have been together for over 3 years, I love her I really do and its been a bumpy ride but I truely think we can get through things of we communicate.

Recently we've had one of the worst fights ever, lasted about 2 months and started when her gay friend (18m) brought her to a place we've wanted to go together with since we started the relationship, school and college got in the way and this year we were too late to plan it. But he surprised her on the day of the event. The place is a good distance away and when she told me that day it was late in the evening and i was at work. When I looked at his social media I seen they were already in the hotel together 3 hours before she told me. I was pissed, and i kept asking her questions, keep in mind i had never met a gay person until i went to college. I'm sorry if this offends anyone but I was just insecure about her spending time with another man.

Me asking her questions over text while she was up there escalated to a fight and then she stopped talking to me and continued to put up pictures of him and her together at one stage he bought her flowers.

Fast forward 2 months a lot of things were going on in both of our lives and we managed to get passed all the things that happened in that time. We didn't cheat on each other or anything just put distance between each other, I tried to contact her all the time but she continued to push me away. She was still in contact with her friend most of that time.

After we resolved things 2 weeks ago. Again we didn't get time to see each other, combination of work and her saying she wouldn't see me because she didn't want me to get her flu. Then we finally got to meet on last Friday night, we spent ages together and when I left things felt great.

Last night (Sunday) I finished earlier from work 8pm instead of 11pm and was hoping to see her, I then find out she is spending time with her friend 50 miles from home. I'm still insecure about it and I'm trying to get used to it but the way it happened just had me question his agenda. She told where she was at 9.30pm, 3 hours before she put up on snapchat a picture of him holding a bear with a heart on it saying ""I love you"" and captioned it ""he made it his mission 😳❤️"".

I have no problem with her spending time with him its just I haven't seen this kind of actions before and I don't know what the typical behavior of a gay person is and I don't hate him at all but it just hurt seeing that.

I've said it to her and since she hasn't spoken to me and recently and just seen my messages but isn't replying to me, I'm not accusing her of anything I just don't like what he did and can't understand why he would do it is all.

Once again I'm sorry if this offends anyone I'm just going on what I've experienced and want some advice, I'm probably reading into this too much, but all she says to me is that he's gay and theres nothing to worry about.

Thanks to anyone that can help.

** TL;DR: Is this ok for her gay friend to give her a big Teddy that says ""I love you"". Why would someone want to give they're friend something that is typically seen as a Valentine's gift in our eyes? I know if it was just one of her female friends I would probably just laugh at it and it'd be fine im just finding it hard to adjust to this, am i a bad person for asking her to reassure me that his intentions are only good?**",AskLGBT
"I've always thought I was straight, but there's this one guy..","I'm a 21 year old cis man, though I have never felt quite at home within traditional masculinity (but that's another story). While I have never had any kind of sexual or romantic contact with anyone (again, another story), I have always been attracted to girls. I have only had specific feelings towards two girls in my entire life, but none at the moment. I have had platonic relationships (friendships and otherwise) with both women and men (not sure if this could be relevant but I thought I'd tell ya anyway).

Though I've only ever been attracted to girls before semi-recently, there's this one guy at work that I kinda like (let's call him Bob). Bob's two years younger than me and, though he has had many (short?) relationships and flings with women, people often call him gay because of his mannerisms (which I know is slightly homophobic), and because his ex (also a coworker) told someone else he was gay (though he doesn't know about this). He and I never hang out after work or anything, but our relationship as coworkers is quite good and I always enjoy working with him (and I think it's vice versa). 

I think Bob's cute and we sometimes do this thing where we look at each other and kinda just smile. We also sometimes tease each other, but we do that with every coworker. Basically, if Bob had been a girl, I would have regarded this as (obviously really subtle) flirting, but I could be imagining it. 

But there's the thing. He's the only man I've ever found attractive. I quite honestly think most men are kinda gross, and I feel slightly repulsed when I think about sex/romance with most men. He is the only exception. 

Has this happened to anyone else? Could I be bisexual? Or could I have confused feelings of friendship for attraction? I'm quite open to being bi or something that doesn't fit into easy categories, but I suppose even the open-minded cannot escape heteronormativity. 

Finally, I know this is a rather common question, but I really wanted you guys' opinion anyway.",AskLGBT
Confused,"I'm a heterosexual male for the most part but recently I've been finding myself attracted to feminine-leaning nonbinary and agender people. I wouldn't consider it bi or pan because I'm not attracted to boys at all, so I'm confused on whether or not I'd still be straight or another sexuality? Any advice helps.",AskLGBT
Help! I don't know what I am...,"Hi guys.  
I am a girl and I just broke up from a long lasting (and my only one) relationship. Now I am pondering what to do or who to do (pun intended). Jokes aside, I don't know what I identify with :( I think boys are very attractive, but the sex is just... well bad. It hurts, doesn't feel very good (and kinda gross). In my head it does seam fun, but in reality it freaks me out. As I don't have experience with other boys I don't know if this was just bad luck. I think the ideia of having sex with a girl more appealing, but they don't seem as attractive to me as boys. I also confess that I have difficulties having phantasies with people. To me, most people are well... people. It's kinda like they are asexuated. When I fell in love for the first time that changed for that person. I don't know that this can be the case with a girl. I just feel so confused and I am probably just rambling.  
I just want to find love, but I also want to feel that special connection during sex.   
Can you help me figure out these things? Should I speak to a therapist or something like that?",AskLGBT
"If I'm a cis male but often get mistaken for a woman, is it misgendering?","I should clarify that I'm not exactly *cis*, but the point is that I don't identify as female.",AskLGBT
"I'm conflicted, help me.","I've been waiting for 6 years to see one of my favorite musicians live and now she's coming to a venue close to me. She happens to be preforming at a gay club and now I feel like I'm invading since I'm not gay.

The last thing I want is to upset someone. I just want everyone to have a good time.",AskLGBT
Am I asexual?,"I have a hard time with this since it’s hard to find online asexual groups online but I’ll try here. Hopefully you can help me find out more about myself. All comments are appreciated. 

First of all, I am on antidepressants. These are known to stunt the sex drive but I felt this way before I started taking them. 

When I grew up into my late teens I never had any interest in having sex with women at all. I was sexually attracted to them and would masturbate, but something about actually having sex was inherently repulsive to me. It seemed gross and unpleasant. 

Now, I knew almost nothing about sexuality back then (private Christian high school, no sex Ed at all) and I assumed that, if I didn’t want sex with women I must be gay. I tried to date boys and even tried to sleep with one despite not being attracted to him at all, but couldn’t bring myself to do it. 

That’s where I am right now. Sexually attracted to women and not men, but don’t want to have sex with either. I could see myself dating and marrying a woman but not ever having sex, at least probably not. 

Sorry for the long post, thank you for reading this far. Hopefully you can help me discover something about myself since I’ve been in turmoil!

I will be responding in the comments to try and figure this out. ",AskLGBT
How can i change my voice?,"Hello, i am a man, 19 yo, and i am THINKING about starting my transition. But something really bother me. My voice is kinda manly and i won't fedl better with a female's body and my voice. Is there any way to change my voice?",AskLGBT
"In same sex marriage, how do you decide who walks down the aisle first?","I know it's a silly question, and it almost surely differs from couple to couple, I am just curious. I'm getting straight married soon and have it easy. I am basically just the appetizer to the big show of the beautiful bride's grand entrance. 

But what about you all? Do you both make a big show of it, or just kinda casually walk down. Do you walk down hand in hand, or just flip a coin to see who goes first?",AskLGBT
How to politely ask for someone’s pronouns?,"Hello!

I just wanted to ask—what’s the best way to learn someone’s pronouns if you’re just meeting them? Is it good practice to just ask “hey, what are your pronouns?” or should I wait for them to clarify? 

My college recently has asked many professors to, when doing icebreakers, have people clarify their pronouns right off the bat, which is awesome, even though a lot of the cisgender people who don’t know much about the trans community don’t seem to understand why.

Thoughts? I am an RA at my college, so I meet a lot of people, and want to make sure everyone feels welcome and loved in my community. ",AskLGBT
"Straight friends prefer it when people don't act ""too gay""?","I'm not sure what to even call this or how to properly explain the frustration here, but I wanted to hear a bit of dialogue about this and if anyone else has encountered the same issue. If I've posted this in the wrong place please let me know, I'm really new to the site. 

A few days ago I was talking with a friend of mine and they mentioned that they really liked the company of another friend of theirs who happened to be gay. They told me liked spending time with this person because they're ""just like a normal person"" and they don't ""act too gay"" and it was a bit of a throwaway comment but it's been a week and I'm still thinking about it. 

I'm not sure why this bothered me so much, but I'd like to hear if anyone else has dealt with stories like this and how you dealt with this sort of thing? Or if anyone would be kind enough to point me in the direction of some sources that discuss this topic so I can do some reading on my own would be incredibly appreciated!",AskLGBT
The difference between “gay” and “queer”," I had long thought that “queer” could be an umbrella term for gender-fluid or non-binary, such as “queer studies.” But my sense was that it usually was interchangeable with gay and was a younger generation word. 

 A scandal with the NYU professor Avital Ronell and her student has gotten me questioning this.  I’ve seen articles that say that she is queer, and he is a gay man. But then in other articles, there are suggestions that she could not have sexually harassed or assaulted him because she was a lesbian and that these allegations are ridiculous. 

 Anyway, I feel a little lost and I’m curious if anyone has insight.

Edited: typos",AskLGBT
"Straight people have a ""girls/guys night"" to hang out w/o SOs, is there a similar phrase in LGBT?","By this I mean, if you're in a lesbian couple, and someone wants to have a ""girls"" night, and hang out with just you and not your partner, it'd get sorta awkward... no? ",AskLGBT
Can a FtM Trans person ejaculate through their penis?,,AskLGBT
Should I refer to drag queens as men or women?,all in the title,AskLGBT
Asking about non-binary pronouns.,"Hi! So I'm writing a story where this married couple is non-binary, so they don't identify as completely male or female. I know that for some non-binary people they prefer 'they/them' pronouns, but probably not all. This couple, they have kids.  My question is: what would the kids call their parents? I don't want to assume, and I'm genuinely curious and confused. I don't know if it's as easy as saying 'mom, mommy' or 'dad, pop' or others. Is there anything else that I'm missing when it comes to pronouns?",AskLGBT
Question about Gender Roles...,"So I have a few friends that came out as trans or non binary, and one day while talking to them about it i had this thought, that ive yet to find an answer to. If anyone can clear this up, id appreciate it.

So the general thought process is that gender roles are bad. Pink/dolls/dresses doesnt equal feminine, and blue/trucks/pants dont equal male. But, why did my friends who held this belief, feel such an urgent need to conform to the same gender roles they where also protesting, but since it was the opposite one they where born into, it was a different story?

Dont get me wrong, i understand transgender is a legit thing, and for a lot of people its about feeling comfortable in their skin. But what i dont get, is the people who man hate and gender hate, and then spend all their time trying to follow the same rules, and being mad if people dont put them in the right category, even if they later say the category is wrong. 

Like, if a cis man decides ""make up is gross id never wear it"" People go ""wow fragile masculinity""

But if a trans man decides the same thing, its understandable for them to want to conform to a gender norm. But also gender norms are bad?

Same kinda goes for non binary in my mind. For me, if a boy plays with a doll, hes still a boy. i feel like some people have that obsession with gender norms again where they're almost worse than the people they protest against in a sense, because something as simple as a boy interacting with a female norm can make them go ""That kids the wrong gender"" which seems very narrow minded and extreme to me. Dipping into both gender norms doesn't make you unique or non binary. It makes you like everyone else.

This all might not make sense at all but i just wanted to write it down and see if anyone has any thoughts, because every time i asked anyone else, they didnt know either.",AskLGBT
I seriously don’t know what to do or if this is the right place to ask,"Well as far as i know I am attracted to women but I’m not to shure about that at the moment. 
Every time i slept with a woman I felt completely indifferent afterwards, at the time it was ok... just thought it wasn’t the right person or something. Now that I’ve done it with someone I thought was exactly what I was looking for. But nothing again. All my friends always say how awesome it is. I have never been attracted to men. 
So I’m at quite a loss at the moment, i like cuddling and that kind of thing way more than sex. Going on dates is great to. 
I just don’t know what to do... or if this is normal
Sorry that this post is such a mess
Dominic",AskLGBT
Lesbian views on attraction?,"Hello.

I'm writing a novel, and one of my characters is a lesbian woman. I wanted to do an interlude from her perspective, but I'm uncertain how to approach attraction from the perspective of a lesbian woman. Do lesbian women look at other women the same way straight men look at women? If not, in what way does it differ? Are there particular qualities a lesbian woman would focus more on, when compared to a straight man?

Note that this is purely the physical attraction side of things, not the personality side. I just want to know how lesbian women look at other women from a physical attraction standpoint in order to better write a lesbian character.",AskLGBT
I want to be gay,"I am currently 13, but in the past year or two, ive been questioning my sexuality and never with any conclusive result. Despite being aware of their inaccuracy, I couldn't stop myself from browsing online ""am i gay tests'. What I found myself doing however, was actively wanting the result to be gay or bisexual. (which it mostly was, but I don't know if that was because I wanted them to be. Also the tests, as mentioned before, aren't very reliable) Im asking here in the hope that someone can explain to me why I want to be, at least consistently gay.",AskLGBT
"A ""political"" question","Hi, I labeled this question as ""political"" because mainly in the past it was an even more political problem and I think also that this question could be about rights of LGBT+ people.

Basically, I totally support all the rights that the LGBT+ community is fighting for: marriage, adoption, etc...

I totally think that the love that there could be between two or more people is true love and nothing less than cis-hetero love.

Also, I recognize this question has an answer, because otherwise there wouldn't be so many people that already has this answer, so I'm here basically as a physics student learning from his teacher, I trust my teacher even before he explained me why because otherwise he wouldn't be a physics teacher, the fact is that this thing has never been explained to me.

Simply sometimes I find difficult not to consider the not-hetero spectrum an illness on the medical term.

As said, since tons of scientist and psychologists don't repute this as an illness, I'm sure it isn't, I'd like to know why.

Hope not to have hurt anybody, I also don't recognize totally in heterosexuality (I'm questioning), so that answer would be useful.

Thanks for your time!",AskLGBT
I'm not sure how to handle my friend who seems to be claiming they are trans incorrectly.,"I have a friend who claim they are trans, but they do not want to undergo hormone therapy and sex reassignment is 100% not on the table for them. They don't want to alter their body in any way. To me, it just seems like they are a male who better identifies with stereotypical female gender roles.  


I mean, aside from the physical, any separation of male and female is all purely stereotypical. There is nothing inherently feminine or masculine outside of things we have assigned those labels too. I'm a fairly effeminate man, but I don't consider myself trans because I like the things I like. My friend seems to believe that wanting to do ""female"" oriented things makes them trans, even though they don't want to physically alter their body in anyway.  


Am I wrong for thinking *trans* is purely a label for those who feel they are in the wrong body and want to change it? Should I confront my friend about it, or just let them continue to misuse (obviously this is only my opinion) the term?",AskLGBT
My best friend is vaguely reactionary and kind of a weirdo. How should I handle coming out to him?,"So I feel like I should expand on the title a bit. My friend seems to be at least a little progressive on LGBT stuff since he has a few openly gay/bi friends and was pro gay marriage when I asked him about it in middle school. On the other hand he's said some crazy shit about LGBT people being mentally ill,is pretty religious,and has a few political beliefs that could be described as far right.








As for him being kind of a weirdo,he likes doing kinda gay stuff to get laughs. In the past he's done things like:


Greeting me by shoving his hand up my shirt




Hand feeding me chicken nuggets and insisting super hard that I let him when I got weirded out by it.


Asked me to sit in his lap while we're crowded around my computer,then doing fake sexual moans when I agreed. 


I kinda worry that if I do come out he's going to think I got off on it or something. Plus at points I played along which makes it seem even more likely that my fear of him thinking I got off on it will come true. 



On the other hand,he's done shit that makes me suspect he might not be 100% straight. I've seen him climb into bed with me and start cuddling up to me while I was already asleep,and it seems a tad suspect to constantly do gay stuff as a joke. I also sometimes get the feeling he knows. There was this one time (and for context he's a huge war nerd) that he started telling me about the how gay men helped create different branches of the U.S military and the whole time he kept giving me what I felt were very pointed looks.



Normally my philosophy with coming out is to just be frank about my sexuality if it comes up and not really worry about announcing it to anyone (enthusiastic support makes me super uncomfortable). However, he's joined the military and is leaving in 12 days and since there's been points where I've lied to conceal it from him,I kinda feel like I should tell.



So any tips? This seems like a very unique situation worth getting specific input on.",AskLGBT
Is it closed minded to end friendships with people that think being gay is wrong/sinful?,"I'm curious if you maintain friendships with people that believe being gay is wrong/sinful/ bad for society.
I am a married woman in my 30s, kids, husband, and bisexual. So needless to say people assume I'm straight. 
A friend of mine recently said she thinks being gay is wrong. I went through the whole it's not a choice thing. She felt it was. I *know* it's not, because I know I don't choose to feel sexual attraction and arousal toward men and women, I just do. 
She continued to reference the Bible as reason why being gay is wrong. But when I questioned her divorce, that she said god hates but it's actually not sin. 
Now regardless for this she says FULLY supports the LGBT community, legal marriage, etc because she knows that her thoughts and religious beliefs should not dictate others' lives. And while it's wrong to be gay, that people should be free to chose to do so. She did not say anything about gay people that was hurtful or judgmental, only that the life style is wrong and she feels is not good for society, but didn't elaborate on that. 
I didn't tell my friend in that moment I am bi. 

Since then (a few days ago) I have been sick over this. I simply don't want to be her friend anymore. But I feel I'm being petty and childish. I'm taking her statement very personally, and it wasn't intended that way. 
I feel like she is insulting a part of who I am. 
I didn't think I had to explain my sexuality to everyone I meet, but in her defense she doesn't know. 
Fwiw, my husband knows, is supportive and there have been things we've done as a couple that have included me and another woman. But I don't share (except in Reddit apparently) this because our sex life is not my friend's business. 

Do you keep friends that think you are sinning? She's not in anyway verbally abusive about homosexuality. She's not making awful comments, just simply thinks is a wrong, sinful choice. 
Am I wrong to feel so upset by this?",AskLGBT
What is this I am feeling?,"Hi all, just a question! I'm 18F and have a current boyfriend whom I love so much. In all my life I know I am straight, but there are sometimes in the process of early adolescent years (up until now), I get to have crushes on girls that are very pretty. It is some sort that I would stare at them and admire them. It's nothing of idolizing them but of certain attraction I feel towards them. There are some girls in my school who would really stare at me and look at me like they're telling something. I sort of get to have some crushes on them. I'd like to clarify that I can't imagine being on bed on them, or anything sexual with them. And the thought of dating them is quite not a good thought for me. Pardon me if I said something that triggered anyone, or anything I said that takes offense on you. For now I perceive my sexuality as straight but I want to have a clear view of what I really am feeling towards these women. Is it infatuation or something else? Probably bi-romantic?",AskLGBT
Unsure if this is the right place - searching for workable or realistic balance.,"How do I, as an unintentional member of a historically abusive classification (white, apparently cishet, AMAB) balance extremely useful messages for dealing with anxiety (A) and also extremely necessary messages about privilege (B)?
  
(A) - ""Just do it, just ask - what's the worst that could happen, they'll say no?""  
(B) - ""Analyze EVERYTHING - action, message, expression - for privilege and power, because the worst that could happen is they feel like they _can't_ say no.""  

I'd also like to acknowledge that it's no one's obligation to help me figure this out, and that that isn't going to stop me from trying.  I'm sincerely sorry if this is upsetting or not the right place.",AskLGBT
Is it normal to hate your own sexuality?,"The reason I ask is because I'm bisexual and wish I were straight. I've had other mental health issues in the past, and I wanted to see whether these thoughts are common for LGBT people to get from time to time, or if they're the kind that led me to depression and self-hatred.

First, I should probably mention that I have no problem with other people's sexuality. I feel people should be allowed to express their true selves, I just don't like myself the way that I am. 

I could go into the reasons why, but it doesn't really seem relevant. When I start thinking about sexuality, I feel ashamed in myself. I wish I were straight. Has anyone else had similar feelings?",AskLGBT
"if a form asks what gender you are, can should that offend/upset/trigger you?","If there was a form that asks the question like so  
  
&gt; Gender?  
&gt; Male [ ]  
&gt; Female [ ]  
&gt; Other/Prefer not to say [ ]  
  
can that be considered offensive or upsetting or triggering? and if it can, why is that?   
  
To give some background, I am part of a society that had a 5-10 min discussion on if such a form would turn-off potential people we want to bring into our society and I couldnt see a reason why it would be a turn-off since It doesnt assume that only the genders male and female exist 
  
Edit: title is supposed to say ""can/should""",AskLGBT
She's gay. Does she like me? I'm straight and I only want to be friends.,"There's this girl that keeps staring at me a lot (I'm female too) and she's super nice to me, she says hi and everything. I haven't seen her doing this to anyone else. Her close friend also started talking to me out of the blue and I even heard them discussing me while they were looking at me. She sometimes stands next to me and I can tell she sometimes thinks about me, because if I'm gone she sometimes asks where I've been, etc. Does she like me? It would also be really neat if I could befriend her (just to be friends, nothing more) because she seems really cool and awesome but I don't want to come off as gay. ",AskLGBT
What was it like for you right after coming out?,"Hi all, 

New to reddit and also new  to coming out as bisexual. I came out to friends and my family over the last 2 months or so, and most of the reaction has been positive. My parents are accepting, but not very understanding, and mom is not taking it fantastic, but overall it could be a lot worse. I'm interested to hear other's experiences on what the aftermath was like the first year or so after you came out, and any advice you may have for a baby queer :)",AskLGBT
"If you are attracted to cis males and females, but also to FtM, are you bisexual or something else entirely?","Not that I care much for labels, but questions like these run through my head when I'm trying to sleep. I've always felt I identify more with bisexuality and wouldn't really feel comfortable identifying as pan because I am strictly only attracted to those three. I'm curious about others' thoughts on the subject.",AskLGBT
Confused about the identification of trans non-binary,"So I've had very little interaction with the LGBT community but I heard this term recently and I'm confused about what that means. 

To my knowledge, trans means a switch from one gender to another and non-binary means the person doesn't identify as male or female. I guess my question is how someone can be trans if they don't identify as male or female?

I may be completely ignorant, and I apologise if I am, but this is a genuine question.",AskLGBT
"Bisexuals of reddit, what feels better sex with men or women?",Could you also say your gender?,AskLGBT
Am I aromantic? Or just bad at everything?,"Hey all,

As of late, I've noticed more and more how little I get emotionally attached to people.

I had had previous thoughts about it, but I honestly don't know if it's me being aromantic, or if it's just apathy?

Help?",AskLGBT
Seeking your input for my startup project,"Hi everyone, currently in the process of putting together a startup project for a boardgame about sexuality. Amongst the many challenges I’m planning for the game to have, one of them requires data of a sample of population opinion’s on topics I gave credit to. That’s where I need your help guys! The link below will lead you to a survey I put together in order to collect those datas. The survey is of a serious yet hilarious nature. It has 25 questions to answer and takes about 15 minutes to complete. Your input will be highly appreciated if you decide to cum along ;) 

https://goo.gl/forms/2gTavFm1mAYpypQQ2

Cheers guys

Alex G.
",AskLGBT
please read... confused," I am a girl... I would rather be a boy? I don't feel like I experience     dysphoria... and why solve something that doesn't need to be solved?     Sure, I want to look like a boy in every aspect, and when I imagine     it... I feel happier- but, I'm also am ok with my female body. I would     just PREFER to be male. I want to look like a boy- that's it.  Honestly,  I   don't feel that stereotypes of genders matter, a girl or  boy can  act   how they want- so in no way do I base this off of social   experiences.   It's entirely physical. I just don't mind having a  female  body- sure,   every time I look at it I wish for something else,  but I  can handle what   I was born with. I don't understand- this has  been  going on (though   subtle) for about a year, but it really hit  hard  yesterday when I saw   videos of two boys who had transitioned- I  found  myself immensely   jealous. I don't know how to explain other  aspects-  some are too   embarrassing. I often find myself going out of  my way to  dress like a   guy whenever I can (usually costume parties  and shit),  but it isn't just   a costume to me? I enjoy those days a  lot. I don't  know if this makes   sense... I just don't feel like I  experience  dysphoria.... but I want   more than anything to be a boy?  (sorry for  any spelling mistakes) ",AskLGBT
"Same sex parents, can I ask you a couple questions?","One, no agenda here. Purely curiosity.

Two, no discrimination here. While we may not agree on everything, I don't give a shit what parents do as long as they love their children.

Three, no lifestyle or parenting style questions here. You do you and we'll find a better thread to discuss it in. :)

**On with the question:**

Two things. I was working with a lesbian couple last night on some Scouting related things, and I suddenly realized I had no idea how to refer to the son's parents in relation to him. It was easy to bypass, but I suspect it may come up again, plus I'm simply curious.

In same-sex parenting, obviously you have ""two moms"" or ""two dads,"" but from the child's perspective, how do you deal with names?

IE, you can't just say ""Mom, come here!"" and get the mother you want, they're both going to come running. 

Is it common to have like ""Mom"" and ""Mommy"" to differentiate? Or ""Ma,"" or.. err.. I don't even know other terms to use other than ""Mom,"" really. Do you just roll with ""Mom"" for both?

As an outsider to this, is it safe to just refer to either parent as his ""mom"" in short context? IE, ""I don't know if you can, Giuseppe, ask your mom?"" or would ""ask your parent"" be easier?

Men, same question if you would, but with male terms in lieu of female terms.

**A second question:**

Purely science based. In lesbian couples, I understand it's common for one parent to donate the egg and the other parent to carry the child. In a gay parent situation, only one male can donate, right? Or can both fathers ""mix"" the sample and thus the lucky sperm wins the egg?

(Is it obvious I know absolutely nothing about in vitro pregnancy?)

Thanks for reading, and thank you in advance for the answer. Have a great day!",AskLGBT
Can anyone recommend a person or organization experienced in conversation therapy within Canada?,Or better yet if you can please refer me to someone who can administer conversion treatment. ,AskLGBT
Looking for people to help with research for a personal project of mine,"Hey everyone, this past semester in school, I built a proof-of-concept LGBTQ youth support chatbot. I want to take it a step further, but I’m interested in doing some research first.

I’d like to hear from a few high school / college students who identify as LGBTQ. If you wouldn't mind taking this survey for me, it would be incredibly helpful!

[https://docs.google.com/forms/d/1LQuiBMFiF\_4g1z06XsucZdex8nJDw7q32piuvY8FC8Y/edit](https://docs.google.com/forms/d/1LQuiBMFiF_4g1z06XsucZdex8nJDw7q32piuvY8FC8Y/edit)

  
 I'm also looking to talk with people over the phone, so if that's something you'd be up for, feel free to message me.

  
Thanks!",AskLGBT
"A nonbinary friend of mine shared this on Facebook, and I'm wondering if I'm misinterpreting its message. What do you think of it?","[The shared post in question](https://i.imgur.com/jpsxUCq.jpg)

I fully understand the stigma behind the labels of normalcy (eg. cishet is normal while LGBT is abnormal and therefore bad) that many experience. However, this series of posts seems to be very anti-science and comes off as ignorant. 

For the ignorant part, I'm mainly referring to the statement that ""Nobody is trying to figure out why people are cis and het, it's accepted as the norm."" This comes off as obtuse and dismissive, as if reproduction has not been a part of the human life cycle for thousands of years. 


For the anti-science portion, the second post about ""solving gayness and transness"" confuses me. I understand if this person felt as if their life were being treated like a novelty or experiment and felt ostracized as a result, but why *wouldn't* we as a society want to learn more about the biology and psychology of a growing section of our population? Wouldn't we want to have better knowledge and tools to provide healthcare and transition therapy? Wouldn't we want to work toward eradicating diseases that disproportionately affect LGBT people?  I don't believe there's a pressure to ""fix"" LGBT people, especially since there's nothing wrong in the first place. A majority of scientists would probably agree and would be against any kind of inhumane treatment on someone. 


I agree with one of the first points this post makes in that we should be allocating resources to combat homophobia and transphobia in society, but I feel like an educated population plays an important role in that. 

Like I said before, I'm not sure if I'm fully understanding this person's point. And I don't want to bring up this discussion with my friend so as to avoid coming off as transphobic. 


What do /r/AskLGBT think of it? ",AskLGBT
Lesbian Worries,"I'm a closeted lesbian under 18, and I'm constantly thinking about my newly discovered sexuality. Every time I do think about it though, I go into this weird state of stress. I usually start biting my lip or my nails. I feel sort of like I'm out of breath, it's like a sinking feeling. I have fleeting thoughts of talking about the feeling when I'm near someone I know, but then I quickly shy away from it. I feel like I have to keep it a secret even though everyone I hold close to me would still love me just the same. Is it because I'm afraid they won't believe me? Has anyone else felt like this before? ",AskLGBT
I’ve created a Discord Server where you can come in and chat with others. Welcome to The Island!,"I’ve created a Discord Server where you can come in and chat with others. Welcome to The Island! 


 [Mods, feel free to remove if it does not meet the rules.]

I am LBGT &amp; created an LBGT safe space &amp; support discord online. Welcome to The Island!

Hello,
I created an LBGT safe space &amp; support discord online. I am LGBT myself [nonbinrary/asexual/aromantic] and I know how difficult it is to find support in the Discord community - so I made my own.



We have around 700 members and would love to welcome you! We offer:

· Game nights 

· Semi-active voice chat and TWO music bots

· Sweet emojis to use with your nitro or without

· Awesome people to talk to

· Wonderful, LGBT friendly staff

· Support for a wide variety of issues; a wide variety of people to talk too 


https://discord.gg/CUsbgUg
",AskLGBT
Help science by answering a survey about sexuality! 👉👌,"Hey peeps, currently in the process of publishing a boardgame about sexuality and am looking for volunteers to answer a (serious yet hilarious) survey about the topic. The datas will be used in one of the challenges in the game. Pm for more details. Cheers!",AskLGBT
Septum piercing?,"I want a septum piercing but everywhere I look up guys who have one are gay, so my question is does it has a meaning in the gay community?",AskLGBT
What do you call your partner?,"So I've been dating this person for a few months now. I currently call the my boyfriend despite that not being their prefered pronouns. They use they/them pronouns and I want to use a term that respects that but I've never been to fond of the term ""partner"". It sounds so formal for a person who's supposed to be super important to you. Not that I think people shouldn't use it the term but I wanted to find a term that more accurately describes who this person is and how the relate to me. ",AskLGBT
"(Serious) Do people who use neo pronouns like ""xe"" actually exist or is it just a strawman?",,AskLGBT
"Something that's concerned me for a while: aside from biology, how does one distinguish gender?",,AskLGBT
Fag(got),"This word... I don’t know what to do. I’m young, in the closet with some of my straight friends, and they love to use it, meaning annoying of course.

I feel like I should take offense, but should I?
Is it wrong for them to say it? Is it stupid for me to be upset?

Also.... sometimes people actually do make fun of other people by calling them gay and saying the like dick and such...
Should I be offended by this?
Is this an attack on my homosexuality or an attack on another mans heterosexuality?

TLDR- Help me figure out what’s worth being offended about, what’s offensive, and what’s not when it comes to people calling each other faggot and gay.",AskLGBT
I need help from a fellow LGBT?,"I am 20 year old English-German, bisexual male, who has just finished his undergraduate degree in the UK. I am looking for somebody (preferably male), willing to be my spouse for the purpose of immigration to the US. Yes, Europe is better than America in many ways, I am aware of that. But the US has some serious issues and I can't watch this country go to the dogs without doing anything. *""No/too expensive healthcare, disparity, crime/guns, (overly/fanatic) religious people, unaffordable education , terrible/cheap food, broken work-life balance, racism/homophobia and* *TRUMP!!!""* just to name a few. I would like to shake things up a bit and make a difference :) There're also a few more opportunities for people in my field ""multicultural/languages etc"". However, since the unfair migration laws (which are gonna get worse thanks to a certain someone) make it almost impossible for foreigners to even obtain a temporary work visa, I have to resort back to this way. No intimacy required and a we would make a prenup. We would however, ""need to share a life"". If somebody is willing to go through this and enable a person with good intentions to come over, please don't hesitate to comment or PM me. Of course I am willing to disburse you for your efforts :)",AskLGBT
What am I?,"So I identify as Female, and I usually say I an straight to not over compicate things. But I am attracted to masculinity, so: guys, ftm, nonbinary, and females that are more masculine or androgynous. If anyone can help me that would be great thanks bye 🏳️‍🌈",AskLGBT
Do you know or is there always some confusion?,Did you know your sexual orientation is before you tried it? If not did trying it make it clear? Are you always feeling confused or do you just know?,AskLGBT
Mom with questions.,"I'm the mother of a trans child with a million questions and perhaps some anxiety about what the future holds. 

What do you wish your parents could have done for you as a kid, or what did they do or say that helped you? 

 I wasn't surprised when it was brought up and so when I hear ""just love and support your child"" that doesn't really tell me much I already loved her. Not everyone has met her with such feelings though.

 I have wondered about trying to find youth trans groups in our city so she has a group of peers that might understand what she is going through.  

About the only thing I know and understand is that this is out side of my wheel house and I would appreciate any thoughts that people who might understand better.",AskLGBT
Weird Question involving sexuality and villinaous characters in Writing,"So, I know that portraying all your baddies as ""coded gay"" is wrong. However what about having characters who happen to be very horrible people, and are also gay.   
Asking as a Game Master, since I have an idea for a villian to deal with but the problem is he'd be gay.   
I have plenty of LGBTQ+ NPCS who are nonvillianous and even very good.   
I feel like making all the bad guys 100&amp;#37; straight all the time might be just as problematic.   


I myself am a pansexual demigirl, but not socially aware enough and always 100&amp;#37; terrified of making any notable human bad guy anything but SUPER MALE SUPER STRAIGHT AND SUPER WHITE. I'm moving out of this with having a female big bad to set my party against (mutated dragon from the realm of demons who wants to open a portal to the abyss in the material world)   


Sorry for the rambling, but I just want to be inclusive but not offensive and I'm kinda giving myself a headache trying to figure out the ""right"" thing to do.   


Help?",AskLGBT
Getting out of a homophobic country...,"Is it as impossible as it seems to be at this moment?

I'm a 25 year old gay guy living in a pretty horrible country in the Balkans in Europe, and moving to a more liberal state just seems impossible. For one, the country I'm from (Macedonia) isn't in the EU, so moving legally is pretty difficult. And second, I'm an English major, which means that there's not much I can do professionally (I feel like it'd be different had I been a doctor, architect or CS major).

I've been feeling trapped for half a decade now and the depression and anxiety seem to keep me from moving forward. I don't know what to do or how to get out of here and it's such a suffocating feeling, that when I'm not worrying about wasting my life in this place, I feel numb. Like I'm not even alive, just existing.

Has anyone gone through a similar thing? Any tips about what steps I should take to start getting out of here are welcome, because honestly at this point it feels like I have nothing...
",AskLGBT
Advice on relationship with controlling boyfriend,"Hey,

I'm 24,m, and in love with my boyfriend, 21,m, for 10 months now.

We've met online and dated since then, he lives nearby so we saw eachother on a daily basis. I've also dated other people (while dating him) for one week, but then I stopped contact with the others and only focused on him.

So we started our relationship and it was great. We've done lots of things, went out a lot and did lots of things a couple does.But I started to realize that he is really controlling. I've been an open book with him about everything, about my previous experiences with boys, about my previous relationships, that I cheated on my previous boyfriends. I've also had a lot of one night stands, which I wrote about with a good friend of mine a lot when it happend ( a year before I met my boyfriend).He also looks daily into my smartphone to see what I've been doing and also asks about stuff. I'm not complaining, as I want to make him feel safe, as I have decided to keep my past behind and just live with him.

Now what's beginning to make me feel uncomfortable is that he keeps on saying that I cheat on him. There won't a day pass, without him (often just jokingly saying), that I cheated on him, that I wrote with another boy or that I met someone. Be it during my lunch break, at work or after work.

He also started to move into my flat really early, like 1.5 months after we came together. It's great coming home and seeing him there. Whenever my work was over, I felt a lot of joy because I would see him again.

But there are lots of stuffs which always makes me feel umcomfortable. He reads the chat log with my good friend, and then complains about it, sometimes calling me dirty and disgusting. He gets really mad and then behaves as if I just told him that I cheated on him. For me those things are something of the past but he still sees him as if they just happend.Also I was a sex addict, went regulary to gay saunas to meet other gay boys and have sex. I also wrote about that with my good friend so my boyfriend read that too.

We've talked about it a little bit, asking him how I can make him feel safe and not worry about it, he just says I need to marry him.

Which is the other thing he talks about a lot. we are only 10 months together and he still complains that I haven't asked him to marry me. I can't think of anything good as an excuse why I'm not marrying him now. I always says that I will marry him (I indeed want to), but then I just say nothing. If he asks why I'm not marrying him now, I can't say anything, because there is no reason to say ""no"", because he would say ""so you do not love me?"".

He is also someone who gets easily angry because of anything. If I made the dishes wrong, if I folded the clothes wrong, if there is anything in his way, if he did not eat for 1 hour, if he is bored, if I did not answer him directly. Often I just wait for him to stop being mad, as I can't do anything against that except for saying ""sorry, that won't happen again"", but it will happen again as I am little bit clumsy and forget about details.

Also I go to conferences because of my work, so he can't always come with me, and he complains about that. Either I don't want to have him with me or he just says ""that sucks that we're not together the time"". For me it's an opportunity to learn more people and improve in my job, get more experience for my job, but I always have in the back of my head that he does not like it, so it makes me feel umcomfortable because I want to make him happy and like what I'm doing.

Another thing is that we do not have a lot in common. We like the same movies, but he does not like gaming and I'm totally into gaming ( I even work for a gaming company). So I always have to game when he is busy (mostly when he is sleeping, which is one hours before I go to sleep), otherwise he would complain, no directly as in ""I don't want you to play"" but in ""what am I supposed to do""? So we just cuddle and watch tv. Worst on sundays, when it's raining. Can't go outside, so he is amazingly bored, and I'm playing a game, so he is kinda getting on my nerve, because he got nothing to do. I would do anything with him but he and I don't have any idea what we could do.So I also can't really do my hobbies, playing games, driving with my bike, or making games, as those things can only be done by myself (I tried to introduce them to him but he's not interested).

Another thing which happend yesterday and which is the reason I am now writing, is that I was at a conference of my workplace, we did an annual meeting party. A guy from the same place I worked at looked at me intensily when I got into the bus. I did not think of it a lot, but at the party, he often looked at me and started to smile, I smiled back and he kept on looking. So I was confused what to think. We played a game and he sat with us, just looking at the game and sometimes our eyes met and we smiled. We also talked a little bit and when we went back with the bus I sat next to him and had my hand next to my thigh, so it was the nearest point to him. He did the same thing, and our hands touched. We moved our fingers and touched eachother hands, and one time we also hold hands while sitting in the bus.

At the end, I stopped because we arrived and my boyfriend was waiting for me. He did not notice anything and I haven't told him about that yet. I know it was wrong, but I thought, wouldn't I be happier with him? He works at the same company, shares the same interests, maybe also wouldn't call me digusting because of my past?

But this made me kinda confused. Am I doing the right thing, staying together with my boyfriend? How can I improve my situation with him, so that he does not talk about cheating that much? Or should I not stay with him?

I'm so confused and need help. I would appreciate every advice you guys could give to me,

tl:dr I'm in love with my boyfriend, he is controlling me because I have cheated on my ex boyfriends and dated while dating him, I can't pursue my hobbies, he get's mad quickly and I've met another one at my working place and we hold hands in bus.",AskLGBT
Questioning person asks from masculine lesbians/ tomboys: Why you want to look masculine?,"Hi there. I'm AFAB and I've been questioning my gender for about a year now. I need to rule some things out to make any progress. Currently I'm pondering between binary trans guy, nonbinary trans guy, transvestite (with some issues) or butch/ tomboy (with some issues). I experience symptoms that could be gender dysphoria (don't have any diagnosis) due to my feminine body, especially the shapes and face. Binding have been a positive experience for me, even though I'm not confident enough to do it on daily basis. My sexual orientation is bi/pan (I guess). But I'm unable to date with anyone due to my identity mess, even though I wish to do so.

So my question is, why do some lesbians/ tomboy women bind? Is it related to aesthetics, wanting to look ""sporty"" with minimal fat percentage? Or do some lesbians/ tomboys actually wish they didn't have breasts, or at least had small cup size? Moreover, why do some (LGBT) women dress up masculine in general? Do you wish to be seen ""as a guy"", or does it bother you if strangers confuse your gender? Are you happy with all the femininity of your body in general but just prefer to dress it up with masculine fashion?

Thank you very much for helping to clear things up :) And my apologizes if I offended anyone!",AskLGBT
Anti-Gay vs Anti-Flamboyant?,"How do you deal with people, even gay people (like Dolce and Gabbana and Armani), who think being flamboyant, dressing femininely, not being manly, is wrong?

What’s the difference between being homophobic and flamboyant-phobic?

How do you explain that for many queer people acting outside of gender norms feels normal to them? 

It’s not a statement to me to act flamboyantly, although I know for some it was/is. For me it’s how I am, and I don’t know how to convey how homophobic it feels for people to say they are fine with gay people but hate seeing them “show it.” 

I know you know what I mean.
Help! I need to explain it to them!

Edit: I need help help to explain it to other people.  How can I persuade them that “acting gay” isn’t bad?",AskLGBT
My friend came out to me as pansexual and I would like to understand what exactly that means,"Recently my friend told me that they are pansexual and i looked up what it ment but im still confused. im asking just so i can understand this since im very new to the whole thing and i really want to make sure I understand and not look dumb
thanks! &lt;:",AskLGBT
I'm bisexual but not attracted to androgyny. How do I communicate this w/o sounding transphobic?,"At this year's Pride I talked, well argued, a lot with some mutual friends. As I understand it, the currently accepted definition of ""bisexual"" is ""attraction to all genders."" The only problem is, I identify as bisexual but am not sexually or romantically attracted to androgynous people. I don't dislike them as people, I just don't want to take them to bed. 

I tend to go for really feminine women or really masculine men. Maybe my libido has been irreparably shaped by the patriarchal South, but I'm just not aroused by the middle ground. For example, my first real relationship lasted 8 years. My girlfriend was really traditionally feminine. She had long hair, makeup on point, gorgeous sense of fashion based around traditionally feminine colors &amp; styles, personality was bubbly &amp; outgoing. She taught me about traditionally girly things like rom-coms, painting nails, bubble tea, etc. (We broke up bc she wanted to stay in the closet.)

Fast forward four years and I'm dating a man, after several short-term relationships with both men and women.  My current boyfriend is almost the exact opposite of my ex. He's really masculine, definitely the assertive one in our relationship, well-built, likes working out, huge sports fan and D&amp;D fan, and has a definite butch fashion taste. Looking back all my boyfriends and girlfriends have been very normative in their gender presentation.

I get along fine with androgynous people, including trans people who are in the middle of transitioning. It's just my brain goes ""Look, a buddy!"" instead of ""Look, a hottie!"" My friend group has suggested this is a form of transphobia. I'm seriously considering if this is true so please tell me if so. 

I'm also not sure attraction is about genitals. For example: Buck Angel and Jonathan Van Ness, two men. I think Buck Angel is hot. I think I could be buds with Jonathan Van Ness. I might be open to dating trans people in the future, but only if they were really masculine or really feminine (which does mean able to pass).

Am I technically bisexual? Am I being transphobic- and if so what can I do to change?",AskLGBT
Can anyone recommend any movies/series/etc. with good LGBT representation?,"My 13-year-old sister came out to me today and told me she likes girls, and I want her to have representation. I don’t want to overwhelm her and act differently around her, but I’d like some things to recommend her so she has plenty of representation. I just don’t want her to ever feel alone or “not normal”.

Also, if this is the wrong approach, please tell me and suggest other things I can do. ",AskLGBT
Can you think of any pro transgender arguments?,"I currently don't have an opinion on transgenders. My gut says that it's right but I can't think of any logical argument for it. The two most common arguments I've heard are: Who does it hurt? The answer to that is yourself and the people around you. As you go on hormones it shifts your chemical balances and can lead to problems in later life. It can also cause depression and anxiety and your friends and family don't want to see you like that. The other argument is what if I was in your position? The answer to that is I would just stay as a girl I'd be lesbian and I'd look on the bright side. The answer to my second argument is poorly answered and I know that but I can't phrase it right. 

Tldr: I don't have an opinion on trans people but would like to know arguments for pro trans.",AskLGBT
Best &amp; Worst Moments as a Gay Man?,"Hello All,

I'm currently crowdsourcing anonymous stories to use as I'm writing a play about coming-of-age as a gay man. However, my own life is boring as absolute fuck, so I was wondering if y'all would share your best and worst moments of growing up as a gay man. If you're interested in more context about the play I'm writing, shoot me a message and we'll talk :) ",AskLGBT
"What does the LGBT community think about the mass immigration of leechers, criminals and muslim terrorists into the country?","LGBT people view of Muslims: http://barenakedislam.com/wp-content/uploads/2016/05/13353_862364043824027_3577948761410441743_n.jpg

Muslims view of LGBT people: 
http://i.dailymail.co.uk/i/pix/2015/08/14/13/2B5C28E200000578-0-image-a-2_1439555792851.jpg",AskLGBT
Do gay boys and gay girls hang out a lot?,,AskLGBT
Do you think owning the word fag and being unafraid of it is a better solution than word policing?,"Please don’t crucify me, I’m as pro lgbt as the next person here (my town is very accepting) but I can’t help but feel some of the lgbt stuff is bordering on thought policing and even (no I’m not alt right) free speech?

Could gay people own these words as black people do? Would that ultimately help them overcome stigma?",AskLGBT
Silent Gen. and Boomers: Is there more gay in-fighting today than decades ago?,"Following LGBT discussions online, it seems like everyone is at each other's throats these days. I'm curious if things are especially bad now or if it's dropping off and just hard to see without historical perspective. Can gay people older than me (in my late 20s) weigh in?",AskLGBT
Straight man attracted to preop trans women?,"Howdy, i identify as a straight man and just recently found out im attracted to pre op trans women. This doesnt really bother me at all in terms of who i am or my identity but i quickly found that this can easily cross the line into fetishizing. 
Now i think attraction is pretty universal and everyone has things that they find attractive, hair color, piercings, build, ect. Is this the same thing? When does this cross the line? Is there an ethical way to go about this? And how is this generally viewed in the community?
I have pretty intense anxiety and obsessive compulsive disorder focused around being an ethical ally and just generally not a shitty person. Im pretty immersed in a culture and scene that really values being progressively minded, as do i. Please let me know your thoughts. I really appreciate it. ",AskLGBT
Parenting LGBTQ teens subreddit?,"Is there a subreddit for parents of LGBTQ teens? I have tried searching and haven't been able to find one yet. 

For the record, not a struggling parent. I am happy that my kid is happy. Just looking for someplace to get feedback on some nuts and bolts issues (sleepovers, dealing with parents of significant others who are not out, managing some school/sports issues). ",AskLGBT
How does one outwardly represent as non-binary?,A lot of clothes and looks and aesthetics we are culturally coded to see as feminine or masculine. How does one “look” non-binary?,AskLGBT
How do genderfluid people handle love relationships?,"A friend of mine just told me she (?) thinks to be genderfluid because she feels sometimes a boy, sometimes a girl, so I'm trying to understand better what it means, but I don't want to ask her directly because she's very confused and emotional unstable at the moment, and I'm afraid I could hurt her unintentionally by being too direct.
So, how does genderfluid people have relationships? Do they have stable relationships with someone or they have occasional relationships with people of both sexes?

(Sorry for bad English)",AskLGBT
Bottom For The First Time,"I’ve been with my transgender girlfriend for 3 years. Lately she’s been asking for me to bottom for years now but I have never been comfortable with anything or anyone close to “that” area as I’ve always been a dominant top in all my relationships. My girlfriend is very quite “gifted” even more than I am, so I’m little scared. I love her and I’m seriously considering to do this for her with our anniversary coming up I can’t think of a better time but I think I need some advice on being a good bottom. ",AskLGBT
First Pride MN (Twin Cities): Tips and tricks (general and specific)?,"Hey everyone! Hope this is an okay place to ask this.
I'm 20 [M] and bi and this year I plan to go to the Pride Fesrival in Minneapolis it'll be my first one so I'm supper excited! I was wondering if anyone who has been before could give me advice as I'm going it alone  (friends busy with work and life). I'm also wondering what cool and interesting things to look out for.
Thanks in advance and I'm super excited to go!",AskLGBT
Question re: Nike BETRUE Collection,"I have a question I’m hoping will not come off as too stupid or ignorant. I’m a straight male, but have quite a few friends who are lesbians. I try and do what I can to show support to the LGBTQ community. My question is this. Would wearing shoes from Nike’s BETRUE collection as a straight male be considered inappropriate? I’m a runner, and in the market for a new pair of shoes, but don’t want to inadvertently upset someone. 

In case anyone was curious, these are the shoes I’m considering. 

[Nike Epic React Flyknit BETRUE](http://store.nike.com/US/en_US/pd/epic-react-flyknit-betrue-mens-running-shoe-l23fvN/pid-12289369)",AskLGBT
"What does it mean to be a ""fancy lesbian""?",,AskLGBT
Pronouns,"Hi all,
So, I have a small conundrum, and I'm hoping someone can advise me on the most respectful way to handle it.

I have a coworker who works in another department, so I don't know them well. I work on some projects with them, but most of the communication is over email, so again, I don't know this person very well.

If I had to guess from the way they present themselves, this person is FtM trans. But they could be just very butch (this in not an insult at all, I'm a femme cisgender bi woman, and I loves me some hot butches. But of this person is butch, they are VERY butch.) Or who knows, could be just a fairly androgynous person of either gender.

Their name is no help.

So I'm sure this sounds totally ignorant and superficial, but I honestly have not run into the situation before where I was interacting with someone without a good clue about their preferred pronouns.

I don't want to misgender this person, but I also genuinely don't know whether to say ""he"" or ""she"" or something else when writing email summaries (like I spoke to X and he/she/ze/whatever they prefer said...) So I always just use this person's name, which sounds like an okay compromise but looks ridiculously formal in actual practice.

So, is there any way to ask this person what their preference is without sounding like an asshole? I just want to respect them as a person and not offend them. I also feel like an idiot for being happily queer and still not knowing how to navigate this. Help?",AskLGBT
Volunteering at an LGBT helpline as a non-LGBT person.,"Hello all! I was wondering if you could help me navigate a difficult space. I have recently been considering volunteering as a support person at a helpline, and have been considering an LGBT line as it is close to my heart. I've been there for many of my loved ones during the coming out process, difficult families, religion, sex problems and sexual pride all as a very close friend or sister, and ally. But I know this is not the same, and I will forever not be able to fully know the LGBT experience.


This is where I need your advice and viewpoints. I feel close to and care deeply about LGBT issues and have seen the pain and confusion they can cause, especially to young people. I have experience in mental health counselling, and am a kind and sympathetic listener. I would love the work and I think I would be great at it.


But does not identifying as LGBT mean I can't provide what these callers need? I would hate to take something I am intrinsically not qualified for. I am also cautious and concerned by white-girl-saviour/gay-best-friend tropes and though I feel I have fiercely analysed my motives, would I be pushing into a space that simply isn't mine?

Or is kind, understanding, and trained all I need to be?


If anyone has volunteered at a helpline, did you find your personal queer experience essential to how you responded to callers?



TL;DR: Is it inappropriate for a non-LGBT person to volunteer? Would I be pushing into a space I shouldn't be in?",AskLGBT
"Writing LGBT characters as a straight, cis person?","Hello! Thank you very much for taking the time to read my post. I'll try to sum it up as clearly and simply as I can:

I'm an aspiring writer and potentially a comic artist as well. Though I'm still in the earlier part of the teen years, I already have lots of ideas for stories that I'd like to finish and perhaps publish someday, when I'm older and can do better. Since I know diverse casts are important, I try my best to include characters of many different races, sexualities, genders, etc.

However, nowadays, I've been seeing quite a few LGBT people saying that you should tread very carefully as a cis, straight writer trying to create LGBT characters \(which is a given\), and if you aren't close with any LGBT people irl, you should probably just steer clear of the topic altogether. Well, the only LGBT person I'd say I know is an internet friend who identifies as agender, and I think I get where these people are coming from. As someone who's East Asian, I think I might also feel iffy if somebody who didn't know any East Asian people and had never been to any East Asian country tried to write about people and places like that.

But then I also see people with different opinions, and I keep getting an uncomfortable feeling that it just wouldn't be right to not include any LGBT characters at all, in any of my stories \(especially since I don't think I can avoid this by never mentioning any sexual orientations or gender identities\- people would probably just assume the entire cast is cis and straight\)? So now I feel conflicted...could I ask for your opinions and advice, please?

And some points that I would like to mention:

1: The reason I don't know any LGBT people outside of the internet is because I live in Korea, which is a very conservative and old\-fashioned country in some ways, so most people either don't come out or only tell extremely close friends about it, I think.\(Also I just...don't know many people in general OTL\)

2: I don't really write about the discrimination and struggles LGBT people face in the real world because I know I can never write that accurately and respectfully, and also because my stories are all in the fantasy genre, set in worlds where discrimination based on skin color, gender, sexuality, etc., doesn't really exist. So I usually just do something to make their orientation or gender identity clear and then don't mention it again unless the plot requires it for some reason?  
Ex:There was a character I created a while back; she's a French woman who plays a sort of anti\-hero role in the story. She's also a lesbian, but I only plan to address that by giving her some brief dialogue where she mentions she's not into guys\- and she has a complicated relationship with another female character who she has romantic feelings for. Her feelings for the other character continue throughout, but I don't have any plans to openly talk about her sexuality again within the story because I get the feeling that nobody wants or needs me to aggressively shove that in the reader's face. Would you say this is an acceptable way to proceed?

3: I do try my best to be respectful and aware while writing, but I don't know how good my 'best' is, really. As I mentioned above, I grew up/am growing up in an old\-fashioned country where, though people are growing more tolerant, you'd still be hard\-pressed to find parents who would accept their children if they came out to them, and there's only one openly gay artist in the Kpop music industry \(and he is largely ignored by the pulic, media, and other artists\). I wasn't taught about these issues at home, so I ended up figuring it out myself from the internet. And as I also mentioned above, I'm very young, and probably don't have as good of a grasp of things like this yet.  


So if you think I should stil try to include LGBT characters in my stories, would any of you perhaps be interested in helping by proofreading my stories or talking about the characters I create? Letting me know when I go wrong? If there's anybody who's up for it, please let me know \^\^  


Thank you again for reading, and I sincerely apologize if I said anything hurtful or offensive in this post.",AskLGBT
I'm not sure on what to call my sexuality,"Hi fellas,

so I've been wondering what to call my sexuality. It's nothing that special, I'm a heterosexual guy and know that I wouldn't endulge in a same-sex relationship (be it romantic or sexual). However I really really like penises. Like if I were not in direct contact with a man but just his penis, I'd gladly have intercourse, and I also like Strap-Ons a lot. So is this bisexual? Half-Bisexual? Something else on the LGBTQ+ scale? I have really no idea. 

Sorry if this sounds kinda frank language-wise, it's neither meant offensive nor derogatory. I wish you all a very nice day and take care ♥",AskLGBT
Should sexual identities change based on other people's confusing gender identities?,"Hi, pansexual male here. This is something I've been wondering about for a long while. Let's say you have a situation in which someone meets someone that challenges their sexual identity. The situation I originally thought of was this: 

Say I'm gay. I've identified as a gay man since I was old enough to understand such things. I have no interest or attraction to women whatsoever. In fact let's say I'm slightly misogynistic. Don't hate women but can't stand them.

Then I meet someone. They appear to be a man and I'm attracted. But eventually they reveal that they're a transwoman that has chosen to not transition due to life circumstances.

So this transwoman and I really kick it off,  we get along great, the chemistry is palpable. We decide to make things official and date.

Problem is, I'm proudly gay, and this is a woman. Even though they're completely indistinguishable from a cis man, this is a woman. Am I no longer gay? Do I, should I, have to change my identity based on someone else's mental state?",AskLGBT
Has anyone figured out they were bi after thinking they were just gay?,"This isn't a personal question or anything, I'm just curious. I've heard of people who have thought they were bi but actually ended up being gay, but not really the other round?

I'm sure it's happened, but I guess it sounds kinda odd to me. Anyone who could share their experience?",AskLGBT
Straight Men Wearing Nail Polish,"Howdy, apologies if this is a stupid question, just curious to get some peoples opinion on it.

I identify as a straight man. Recently i started wearing nail polish if there was a party i was going to, or a show that was happening. I just think a really light pink or purple looks super cool with a jean jacket and a nose ring or something. Purely an aesthetic/ style thing.

I was wondering if you \(or if you think others\) might consider this some type of appropriation of queer culture. I feel like sometimes the line between appropriation and diffusion/appreciation can get pretty blurry and as gender roles and stigmas get broken down accidental ""posturing"" might be seen more and more. I've read a lot of articles and ""call outs"" on social media recently of celebrities jacking queer culture and posturing as whatever \(Aaron Maine from Porches had a piece in out magazine that comes to mind, or whatever was going on with Zayn from one direction and that Vogue story\), so i was just wondering what you thought.

Anyway let me know! Thanks!",AskLGBT
Am i actually gay or am i just fooling myself?,"Guess i'll make this a long story short. About 8 months ago I was a straight male and was very confident in my gender and sexuality so i thought. Then i had a friend that came out as a trans female and that triggered a whole wave of inner questionings. I have always been kinda feminine and when i was 12 used to pray to god that i would wake up a female. It died down at around 14 and i basically said eh it was just a phase. now I'm 19 gonna be 20 in 2 months time and from 12 to 19 I've had girl friends and sex with said girls and i enjoyed it A LOT. but fast forward to 2017 and when my friend came out i suddenly had no attractions to females and i didn't want to top anymore like not even a little just the thought of topping makes me sick now. I'm a total bottom and i even came out as trans and went to gender therapy. I've since decided with the situations in my life transition isn't my best choice and I've decided to be a cis gay male that fills the bottom position. But its not sitting well with me I""m trying to make myself straight again but it wont work I'm trying and even watching porn but nothing is working i need help what happened to me!",AskLGBT
Why do people like Call Me By Your Name so much?,"(I AM HETEROSEXUAL)

I read the synopsis and it made me incredibly uncomfortable.

I'm going to see Love, Simon soon, and I think I'm going to love it, because it sounds like it has a great story. Call Me By Your Name also appears to have a great story, as well as breathtaking scenery.

The difference is, from what I can tell, I find Call Me By Your Name to be excessively sexual, bordering on disturbing. 

I don't have a problem with the gay sex scenes, even though I don't like sex scenes in general.

My problems generally lie in the peach scene.

This is the part that I'm most confounded by. Regarding the peach scene, I think the original premise of Elio masturbating and finishing into a peach and then Oliver eating the peach (with the contents still inside!) was very unnecessary and excessively explicit.

I understand that it is important to illustrate the intimacy of a couple, but I haven't seen that level of explicitness illustrated in *any* movie, straight, gay, anything. This could also include the swimsuit scene.

Not only that, but people who have seen and loved the movie use the peach as the symbol for the movie, as if it was their favorite part. Does this stuff, like, get people going? 

I really just don't get it. This part reads like a disturbing fetishistic fanfiction, and the movie almost won *best picture*.

Please, someone enlighten me on this. I want to know why people walk away from this movie with tears in their eyes, when it sounds like something that would make me nauseous.
",AskLGBT
Is there such a thing as being sexually fluid?,"I had a friend in high school who self-identified themself as being “sexually fluid”. They (don’t remember which gender identity they chose chosen) would date/hook up with people from all ends of the gender and sexuality spectrum at different times.

Examples:
•For a few weeks, they were dating someone cishet.
•For a couple months, a transgay partner.
•For an entire school year, sleeping with different women (both trans and cisgender).
•Hooking up with drag queens and GoGo boys at a gay bar when they reached legal age.
•Going steady with a cis-boyfriend over a summer.
•Having a crush on a queer teacher while simultaneously dating a pansexual polyromantic couple.",AskLGBT
"Advice: I bullied someone as a child about being gay, they just came out","No bs, just looking for some insight and advice from this community. 

When I was younger \(2nd or 3rd grade\) me and this person \(both m\) were competing for the attention of a girl in our class. Push came to shove and I was losing because I couldn't draw as nicely or something dumb. As retaliation, I got a piece of paper and wrote ""gay"" on it and pasted it onto the back of his shirt. 

As years went along \(it's been about 14 years now\), it became apparent that he was becoming more comfortable with who he was. We happen to be facebook friends and recently, he posted about officially coming out and publicly sharing his relationship status with his partner. 

**TL;DR:** I feel guilty about a childhood incident where I made fun of a person using ""gay"" in a homophobic, derogatory context who now has come out.

\-\-\-\-\-\-\-

Am I overthinking a small incident? Is this worth apologizing for? It could very well be that they don't even remember, though I can't seem to shake the notion that this act of bullying might very well have been the start of a tough road for someone not being accepted as they are.

I understand this probably isn't uncommon, but I would appreciate some insight from whoever is willing to share. ",AskLGBT
Bisexual preference for partners,"So I am gay 100% but I am texting this guy, he is slightly (3 years) older than me and he is a great person, today we were talking about future plans and he was not sure he wanted to move where I wanted to. So we continued and it turns out that his main issue is that he does not know if he wants to be with guys or girls. I am sad, I need advice on how to help him. It must be a hard situation for him but at the same time it makes me feel like nothing.",AskLGBT
Is sexuality a choice now?,"I am a straight dude and I am kind of confused about sexuality. 

I saw a post on the front page about how bisexuals get shit on by heterosexuals and homosexuals and it reminded me of how a huge portion of the LGBT fight was for society to stop thinking a persons sexuality is a choice. But nowadays it seems like people are saying that your sexuality is whatever you feel like it is and it can change multiple times within a lifetime. 

I saw a snap chat a year or so ago on national coming out Day where one person said that they were straight 3 years ago, bisexual 2 years ago, homosexual 1 year ago, they are now transsexual, and that might change by next year. Is this a choice or is it someone discovering their sexual identity? I have read that now your sexual identity changes throughout your life, but is that discovery or a decision?

So is a persons sexuality a choice now? If so when, how, and why did the transition from a person is born with their sexual identity change to a person choose chooses their sexuality occur?",AskLGBT
Sex vs Gender?,"So is sex what you're born as, male/female?

Then sex orientation is what you're into, straight/gay/bi/pan/etc?

Then gender is what you personally feel you are. What you actually are regardless of sex, trans/gay/etc?",AskLGBT
For gays and lesbians; do you enjoy the romance genre -- and reading or watching heteroseuxal romances?,"For gays and lesbians; do you enjoy the romance genre \-\- and reading or watching heteroseuxal romances \(Movies, TV shows, or books\)? Or if you do enjoy romances or the occasional romance, do you scrounge around for homosexual romance material?",AskLGBT
What is the cause of the difference in appearance between heterosexual and gay faces?,,AskLGBT
What is the history behind the overlap of lgbtq culture and african-american culture?,"It seems to me like there is a lot of sharing and overlap between the two. Especially when it comes to vernacular. I understand that there's a lot of intersection because these two groups of people are not mutually exclusive but it seems like that wouldn't be enough to account for it. I'm certainly not accusing anyone of appropriation. My best guess is that it comes from a shared sense of oppression, but I really am ignorant about it. Is there some historical overlap that I'm missing out on?",AskLGBT
Can straight and gay people be attracted to non-binary people?,"I mean you can't know someone's gender before knowing what they look like, right? Unless you were meeting up with a friend of a friend... What makes someone attracted to someone genderqueer? Can't believe I couldn't find a google-searched answer. Sorry if this sounds offensive, I'm trying to refrain from having these questions on my account in case someone goes spying on me. :/",AskLGBT
Is it okay to read/write mlm if I'm not mlm?,"For context, I am a bi ciswoman who enjoys all sorts of romantic stories because I'm a total romantic sap

When I was younger, I got roped into slashfic with my love of a few certain ships, and at the time I was obsessed with any ounce of lesbianism I could find. But then I found yaoi. Or rather shounen-ai. The sexual things had never appealed to me, I just liked reading fluffy romance between two boys. As I got older I became more conscious of what I was consuming, I'd only read things that had depictions that I didn't think were harmful, and avoided the common pitfalls of showcasing the same-sex couples in ways that imitated heterosexuality. Which takes me to my modern consumption, I read things that are straight, mlm, and wlw (When I can find them, they seem to be harder to find, especially in comic form :c) 

But then I realized...
That many of the authors of the mlm I read were women. And maybe it wasn't exactly their story to tell. And then I thought again. Maybe It wasn't my story to read either. 

It's not that I can't identify with mlm characters, I can. They are human, and I am queer so I can relate a little in that sense, but they are still completely different from my own experiences. Although I'm not fetishizing them, I may be romanticizing an experience that really shouldn't be mine to romanticize.

Now personally, I don't think any marginalized group should have to be the only ones producing content that represents them, that's a lot of responsibility on the marginalized group, and I think it's important to demand representation from people in seats of privilege. I don't think a woman writing gay characters is a problem, I am just more concerned about writing gay romance because it focuses on the experience of the romance itself, and basically we get to squee from the sidelines without having to experience any struggle of actually being mlm.

Honestly, I'm pretty divided on what to think.

Should I limit how much mlm I read?

Should I read more from male authors?

Should I stick to straight and wlw mostly?

I guess I just want others peoples thoughts, because I really don't have a good answer, or I could be making a big deal about nothing.",AskLGBT
Is gender and sex the same thing?,Okay I'm gonna just put this out there I believe there is only two genders but people tell me sex and gender are two different things. I'm a little confused could someone help explain the difference to me. ,AskLGBT
does this make sense?,"Im a transgender female, yet im also genderfluid?
also, im pretty sure im pansexual, ace, and demi but i still do sexual things with my signifigant other?",AskLGBT
question about sex vs. gender. vs. gender identity,"I'm making a psychology questionnaire for my university.

I know that for some people, the sex they were assigned to at birth may not match the gender they currently identify with.

My first question in the demographics section will definitely be ""What sex were you assigned to at birth?""
(open-ended question)



But here's the hard part- What should my second question be?
I'm sort of confused about terminology-


I don't really know the difference between gender and gender identity, and which of these two should I incorporate into my survey?




Should my second question be 

""What is your current gender identity?"" (open-ended question)

OR ""What gender do you currently identify as?"" (open-ended question)

OR""What is your current gender?"" (open-ended question)

OR If none of these work, what should my second question be?

I want to be as accurate as possible. Thank you!  ",AskLGBT
I've recently discovered how much I can relate to the song Man of Constant Sorrow. What do you all think of my thoughts?,"Here's the link to the song, from the movie Oh Brother, Where Art Thou.

https://m.youtube.com/watch?v=9d2a

Just the name of the song was the first indicator. As a transwoman I've always felt like a ""man"" of constant sorrow. 

Let's look through the lyrics too. 

**""I am a man of constant sorrow.
I've seen trouble all my day.""**

Makes sense to me. Generally sums up my life since puberty. 

**""I bid farewell to old Kentucky.
The place where I was born and raised.""**

When I heard these lines I imagined Kentucky being replaced with my old name or old me, being born and raised as the wrong sex.

**""For six long years I've been in trouble.
No pleasures here on earth I found""**

Since puberty I've always had a hard time loving myself which impacted my mental and emotional health for years. It wasn't until discovering the woman deep inside that I learned how to love myself. 

**""For in this world I'm bound to ramble.
I have no friends to help me now""**

I've always felt like I had two people inside my head, battling each other for dominance. It made it hard sometimes to gather my thoughts which made me, well, ramble. And initially after discovering I was part of only .05% of the population I thought I was alone. But I have all of you with me!

**""It's fare thee well my old lover.
I never expect to see you again""**

I wasn't sure about these lines at first but then I remembered my penis. I've never necessarily disliked it. It works well and I've greatly enjoyed sex with it. But maybe, someday, it'll be transformed into something unrecognizable. Maybe not, who knows. 

**""For I'm bound to ride that northern railroad.
Perhaps I'll die upon this train.""**

At first these lines were depressing for me. I thought they were referencing suicide. But then I thought it could mean the ""death"" or end of boy me. Instead of just coasting through life, I'm hopping off the train of denial. 

**""You can bury me in some deep valley.
For many years where I may lay""**

*Deep valley* instantly made me think of vagina lol but I'm actually not sure what these lines could mean. Tell me what you think about them. 

**""Then you may learn to love another.
While I am sleeping in my grave.""**

Again, not sure. Maybe an emotional farewell to the parts of boy me that I actually liked. I was a good man, but it wasn't enough to keep me happy. Maybe this line is like breaking up with boy me.

**""Maybe your friends think I'm just a stranger.
My face you'll never see no more.""**

I love love love this part! At this point in the music video Clooney pulls down his beard to be like, ""It's a disguise, everyone!"" And once I start HRT and maybe facial cosmetic surgery, my old face will be changed and no one will see it again. Sounds kind of extreme, in a way. 

**""But there is one promise that is given.
I'll meet you on God's golden shore.""**

This is where the positivity comes in, the hope. The wholesome ending. It doesn't need to have religious meanings either, but it can if you want it to. Some people say that transitioning is a miracle. You never thought you could be happy but you discover the true you and you begin to learn to be happy. To *feel* happy. You have faith that life can get better. I wanna meet you all on that golden shore. 

And that's it. Those are my thoughts. Actually, while typing this, I had a handful of revelations. Writing or typing things out can be so therapeutic and clear out the clutter and confusion of your own mind. I feel better after doing this. So share, if you're comfortable. Reach out. PM me or others. I'm confused too but I'm learning, healing and getting better. 

Thanks for reading. What're your thoughts? I'm an open book so no question is off limits. ",AskLGBT
How do you know?,"Good evening, 

I have a question about a close friend of mine and I hope this is the right place to ask as I’ve no other option.. 

Did you ever deny that you were gay? If so, how did the denial affect your relationships? 

Recently I have noticed my friend acting in a way that suggests he is interested in men. I honestly don’t care if he does but the fact is I don’t know that he is (for sure) and I’m pretty sure he doesn’t either. He comes from a religious family where even the idea of it is shunned. Although his family already suspected he was gay at a young age; but due to being in a religious family/culture he denied it early... So you can understand the suppression. I love him to bits but he is projecting insecurities towards his close friends and has harmed himself regarding family troubles but him not getting better tells me it’s MORE than that. If it’s any consolation, I’m a psychology student and have learnt to be patient and observant with him but I’m only human and can only handle so much of my own stuff as well as trying to support my friend emotionally at the same time.

I’m so sorry IF I’m being out of line, I don’t know who else to ask or if I’m even asking the right questions. Please help me and educate me :( If you have any other questions please feel free to ask. ",AskLGBT
Avoiding harmful LGBT portrayals in writing,"Hi Reddit,

I am a white straight cis female who likes to write, and I've come across one of those ""you don't know what you don't know"" situations when it comes to portraying LGBT characters in my writing.

My problem lies in the fact that I haven't read many romance books written about LGBT characters, so I have no idea where to begin in what tropes to avoid \(I only recently  learned about the ""Lesbians Must Die"" trope and had to hastily scrap a plot\).

I'm currently writing a story, mostly just for my own enjoyment but with the possibility of posting it online somewhere, which is a gay romance/fantasy.

I rarely write romance in general. It embarasses me to write sexual scenes that I know other people will read, so on the rare occasions I venture into romance territory at all, I keep it all pretty PG. This means I end up with very soft, rather ""girly"" \(if you'll forgive the term\) romances in my stories, which I'm fine with, but I'm starting to worry it's leaning into troubling territory in this particular story.

*\(Edit: took out a paragraph here because I went on a tangent that ended up not actually being part of my central question\)*

Here is my big problem:

I don't want to fetishize gay romance for teen girls.

I am aware that this is a big problem in the amatuer writing scene: straight girls in their teens and early twenties writing M/M romances for other straight girl in their teens and twenties, pretty much turning an entire sexuality and lifestyle and reality into a hetero\-normative fetishization.

I don't want to be a part of this problem, but I just can't figure out how to write a romance between two male characters in the context of a light hearted fantasy story without it turning out like that, especially since my style of writing romance is so... well, nothing like the ways many 19 year old guys think or act.

My question is for those of you who read LGBT romances, written by LGBT authors or straight authors, directed towards the LGBT community or towards straight teenage girls, whatever: what are some tropes I should be making sure to avoid falling into? How can I make this a story about my two characters falling in love in an honest and meaningful way, and NOT have it end up reading like some guilty pleasure softcore Harry/Draco fanfic written by a midwestern 14 year old who's only knowledge of what it is to be gay comes from Hollywood?

How do I make sure I walk away with a genuine romance that adds to the reading enjoyment of the world, and not something hurtful, offensive, or just craptastic?",AskLGBT
Am I actually trans?,"I think I'm FTM trans, but I need second opinions. 

Age 4\-7\- I didn't know there was really such a thing as being a ""tomboy."" I thought if I dressed more masculine people wouldn't like me, so I dressed very girly and presented as ""cute."" I can remember something about it not feeling right, but I being so young didn't know what it was. I was always interested in boys platonically. I was friends with them more than I was with girls because I felt more comfortable with them, like I ""fit in.""

Ages 8\-9\- I began acting/dressing more masculine at age 8. I didn't care much about appearances and I felt happy and free. I didn't think much about my body. I got a pixie cut at age 9 and loved it until strangers started calling me a boy causing my mom to freak out. I then associated my feelings with disgust and started to grow my hair out and dressed more feminine. I thought I had to so that I would be liked. I always felt off, like something was wrong. I read a lot of books at this time and seldom read ones with female protagonists because I feel like I could relate to them and their issues. I loved books with male protagonists. They felt relatable, almost like friends. I watched some documentaries and from then on all I would write about was FTM trans kids. It helped me to let out my feelings/frustrations, and almost be someone else. 

Ages 10\-12\- I remember so vividly having to watch the female puberty video at age 10. I was obviously placed in the girls group and cried silently the moment I realized what was going to happen. This lady started talking about boobs and vaginas and eggs and periods. I didn't want any of that. I wanted my chest to stay flat, I didn't want a bra and I didn't want a period. I didn't give a shit about body hair though. I essentially panicked through this whole ordeal. My friends pressured me into getting a bra a week or so after this, and to my dismay and mothers pleasure I went to buy one. I was so uncomfortable and it felt so wrong. I didn't want to look like that, but I didn't tell anyone because it was ""weird."" I ended up layering the things on top of each other so I would look flat. I developed anorexia at the age of 11, and part of it was me trying to shrink my more ""womanly"" features. I didn't want them, but I didn't tell anyone that because I was just that cute little cinnamon roll and nobody would ever let go of that. I actually started questioning my gender at age 12. I also got my first period at this age, and it was a mess. I was at summer camp and I went to use the toilet and there it was. I stuffed toilet paper in my panties \(that I didn't like\) and went back crying hysterically. 

Ages 13\-14 \(present\)\- I concluded that I was trans when I was 13. At that point I hated my body, my chest, my crotch, everything looked wrong. I just wanted to look the way I wanted. I came out to my parents and they didn't take it lightly. Now, aged 14, I'm beginning my social transition. It's going really well and my friends are making a good, honest effort to use Benny and he/him. Despite my body looking more masculine than it has in a while in a lot of ways, I feel absolutely horrible about it. It feels so disgusting, I feel like one of those voodoo dolls made from a bunch of different materials. I've bound my chest for about 3 years now so my tits are kinda deflated, which is good because it makes it easier to bind. I look at my face and think ""that's a boy"" but then I just look down and feel like crying. I started wearing mens underwear recently and let me tell you, it was an experience. I felt great, like a kid with a new transformer or barbie. I felt like a man. I get really, really pissed when people birth name me. I'm good at containing it, I just hate being referred to like that. 

So does this sound like trans? I just need outside opinions. ",AskLGBT
A question on manners and reintroductions,"Apologies in advance if this is a dumb question. 6 months ago I was in a small class of 10 people. I knew them enough to maybe give a head nod if I would see them in school. Anyways I'm in a new class this semester and I went to see on Facebook who my classmates are. As I am looking I see this familiar face, but I couldn't place it. I scroll through the profile and see that this girl that I am in class with was a guy in my class last semester. Considering she is a ""new"" person do I reintroduce myself, do I follow her lead, or do I just act like I know her. (I honestly wouldn't recognize her if I saw her on the street) 

I know if someone gets nose job you are supposed to say ""I like your new nose"", but obviously I feel like a nose job is different. I've never been in this situation, I don't know what the formalities are, please explain. 

tl:dr old classmate is ""new"" gender and I don't know if I have to reintroduce myself.",AskLGBT
How can I know if I'm a lesbian or just bisexual?,"Honestly, all ""attractive"" guys look the same to me. I can never relate whenever a straight friend talks about how hot some dude is. I've considered myself bisexual for years, because I'm technically not disgusted by the idea of having sex with a man, it's just that I wouldn't want to and I would never initiate it. 
I have only ever been genuinely attracted to one guy ever, and even then I'm not sure if it was attraction or just me finding him aesthetically pleasing to look at, liking his outfits or his hairstyle etc. 
I've had a boyfriend before, but I believe the love I felt for him was probably more of a friend type of love than a romantic one, and even though I was fine with having sex with him, I didn't understand why straight girls love sex with men so much. 
Could I be a lesbian? Or just a bisexual girl with a strong, strong preference to women? I love women, I think all girls are beautiful and I can only really see myself settling down with a woman. I'm so confused :/",AskLGBT
another disappointment with someone. advice?,"here's a little background to set the scene: Theres this person i was talking to for around 2 months or so (they're 20 and I'm 21), and went out with 4 times. Let's call this person ""sam"". sam is biologically female and presents themselves more feminine, while identifying as agender. 

I'm a girl who prefers no labels and is simply attracted to all types of people, and while i was not used to using they/them pronouns and being agender concept, i didn't mind cause i genuinely liked this person. 

we ultimately met through knowing a mutual friend of each other. this mutual friend is their best friend. through getting to know sam, i discovered they have had a rough past and family background. 

they struggle with depression/anxiety, but they're working hard to better themselves which i admire. we were both on the same page of how we like to take things slow and are not ones to jump into anything physical too soon. we held hands briefly after the first date. we still kept in touch after dates, where they would compliment me quite a bit on my looks and such, text me goodmornings and ask how i slept. like they genuinely cared about my wellbeing. 

back to the compliments, i was not used to the frequency of them, and thought it may have been too much too soon, but then i thought they're naturally a really affectionate person. at one point they even said to tell them if they're coming across as too strong, and that they just like me and want to make it known. 

eventually they even started to call me baby and babe. there was one point where we couldn't see each other for a few weeks because of our busy schedules (even though we only live 20 minutes away from each other) and we both don't drive. 

i was honest with my feelings of how i wanted to see them at least once a week, cause i feel like thats a frequency thats not too much but not too little. but that i understand if that cant happen. 

eventually, the second time i saw them was with our mutual friend. the third time was finally a date to the movies. it was one of those movie theaters with those incline chairs. we laid pretty close to each other and they finally interlocked hands with mine pretty tightly, and it was one of the best feelings ever. i felt so comforted and at peace as it was something i was craving for quite some time.

i started to feel really close to them and my feelings started to deepen. 2 days was when i last saw them, and it was with our friend at the mall. during that outing, i admit i was a bit tired, quiet, and stressed cause i had to lie to my mom again of who I'm seeing and where I'm going. (she's very homophobic and intolerant to put it in perspective) .

 now, sam knows about the difficult situation with my mom, but they seem very understanding and doesn't phase their interest toward me. 

later on, my mom called and i answered and put her on speaker. sam and our friend overheard the conversation and were quite surprised on the homophobic and hateful things coming out my moms mouth to me, as she suspected i was out seeing this ""girl"". i knew i had to be home at a certain time, so i departed ways and ubered back home. an hour later, i get an unexpected text from sam saying they think we should end things after tonight. 

that my mom's dislike toward them is not okay. that i shouldn't tolerate her abuse and sell myself short just cause she's my mom. that they want me happy. sam continued to say that sadly, it just wasnt meant to be and that they hope i find my someone one day, but that for now i should focus on myself. . 

my heart sank and i was so confused, because everything was going fine with their affection and nothing but positive body language toward me. 

i thought this was so sudden, and maybe my mom made them suddenly change their mind.i tried to call sam twice, cause i was lost and shaken up, but they didn't answer so i just replied back with text. i didnt understand because i thought they liked me, and if you like someone, you usually don't end things just like that.

 if anything, from the very beginning, they told me they were afraid of coming across as too clingy or too much. sam replied to say they do like me, but that i don't deserve this

that in the end, my mom has never bothered them that much. its more them than my mom and that right now, they need to focus on themselves and that were not good for each other and i deserve more than what they give. 

that they wish nothing but the best for me. we did end the texts on good terms, and they still  watch my snapchat and instagram stories, and like some of my photos. i cant help but to be upset and hold on to a tiny bit of hope that they'll have a change of heart and just need time. i don't get it. 

i never wanted to jump to anything serious, so i don't know how they decided this so quickly after just holding my hand and resting their head on me. there were no arguments or awkwardness.if anything, from the very beginning, they told me they were afraid of coming across as too clingy or too much. all i wanted was continue talking and seeing them.

 i never asked for much. cause i really did like them.  its been 2 weeks, but its very tempting to just text them hi cause i miss them, but maybe thats not a good idea. 

 anyway, i don't know if deep down, that was their excuse of letting me down gently or its really something with them. i know they've admitted to be going through things. our friend did tell me that he assures me that they didn't lose interest.

 ugh, i just don't know how to process this. im tired of being let down. just as i was starting to let my guard down and even told them im a cautious person. 

its like i can attract peoples attention on a initial basis, but they eventually go away. even though people tell me im a lovely soul, beautiful, kind, funny, etc. its like its not good enough. i just want someone to see that i am worth it. i dont think im desperate, but it surely does get frustrating being 21 and not getting your chance, while also being pessimistic on whats the point even trying, when it wont last and ill have to go through a few heartbreaks before finding the one for me . im trying to be patient. i  rarely go on dates. ",AskLGBT
Confused about my sexuality.,"Throwaway just because I don't want this to be too connected to my personal life.    
So, I, as a male, have identified as straight for a long while, but I've started to notice that I find non-binary and gender-fluid people attractive.    
I can't seem to find the correct word for this sexuality, where I can say the one word and not have to explain more afterwards. I feel as if polysexual is too broad of a term. Is there a better term to use, or should I just deal with having to explain?
",AskLGBT
Having trouble with my gender?,"I don't know if that title is accurate but I can't think of a better one. I'm 14 and for about a year an a half now I've known that I'm FTM transgender. When I dared to approach my traditional anti\-LGBT Christian parents last year about it they refused to help me AT ALL. No matter how much I cried about my body, asked them to use my name/pronouns, refused to go out due to fear of being called ""ma'am."" It was never bad enough for them. So I pushed the thoughts out of my head and put all my energy into being the best cisgender girl I could be. 

Well I'm 14 this year and I came to the realization that ""Hey, I'm going to be a freshman in high school next year. People always comment on my mental and emotional maturity. I need to start acting like an adult and facing myself, my actual self, regardless of my parents or family opinions. Self\-respect is important and I just can't respect myself when my whole outward presentation is fake."" 

So I bought new clothes with the excuse that they're ""more comfortable."" I acted more like myself, regardless of it was ""feminine"" or not. I came out to my friends, who are all super accepting and ready to learn about trans and stuff. I asked them, even my guy friends who don't know jack about LGBT \(which is fine\) to use my name and pronouns, but I ended up being very, very submissive about it. If they slip up I want to politely correct them, but even though it makes me uncomfortable I don't say anything because I don't want to annoy them. And it's not like they're insensitive, even if they say ""no offense"" after referring to me with a female associated thing I immediately assure them that it's fine. How do I become comfortable correcting them without being rude? 

Then there's this kid called Josh. He's like the ""village idiot"" of the school, and he has absolutely no friends. But since I came out he's actually been bullying me. He tried to fight me even though I'm like 20 pounds more muscle than him and like 5 inches taller. He called me a pussy and made fun of me for being a ""dickless man."" He generally just picks on me more now because I'm trans. I just laughed it off but inside it really hurt. So what do I do about him? 

Thank you for reading this long\-ass post. ",AskLGBT
How do others deal with hurtful comments about their sexuality?,I've seen a lot of comments especially lately in the media and im just wondering how others respond? Or do you ignore and try to move on?,AskLGBT
Is meeting significant others solely restricted to dating apps?,"I don’t know if this is the right place to ask, but do LGBTQ members still feel like they get “natural” (offline/spontaneous) romantic connections with people they’re interested in? Is there ever a time where it’s warranted/appropriate to hit on a stranger in public? I live in a mid-sized community in California, and while I like to think I have a pretty good Gaydar, it seems very risky to take a leap and ask out somebody who basically has a 1 in 10 chance of being gay, and a much higher chance of being offended. ",AskLGBT
Why are Intersex people Lumped in with LGBTQA,"Now, this isn't to offend anyone but I truly am confused by Intersex people are lumped in with the entire LGBTQA coalition? I am a heterosexual intersex man, however there are those in the community who seem to get upset with me when I refuse to support certain hateful causes. Firstly, the ""i"" doesn't even belong there. If the whole  modus operandi  behind the coalition is to separate gender and sexuality, while asking for equality, why is the intersex lumped in? If an intersex man is gay, then he is a GAY intersex man; an intersex woman is a lesbian, then she is a lesbian; bi intersex person and Trans intersex person all fall under the letters within the coalition. Not all intersex people appreciate being lumped in! I personally don't like it, persons i know utterly despise it. Especially when we are being harassed and forced to protest and be hateful toward Cis\-gendered folks. Please do not misread like i am saying all persons within the LGBTQA community is like this, but i really want to understand why we are seen there, when it doesn't exactly belong there.

Please no rude comments, I really am trying to understand. Google has little to no helpful information on this, so if you genuinely know, help a brother out. Again, no disrespectful nonsense.",AskLGBT
"If someone has gender dysphoria, should you immediately support hormone blockers and surgery, or should you put them in therapy?",Just a question.,AskLGBT
Reaching out to LGBTQ people on the South Side of Chicago?,"I'm a queer librarian working for CPL on the South Side and I'd like to reach out to LGBTQ+ organizations in my area for programs and events, because we're under-represented and under-served.

Trouble is, I can't find much in the way of queer organizations on the South Side. Even gay bars are tough to find: Yelp doesn't show *any* south of Navy Pier. Does anyone have any leads on where queer South Siders meet (other than going up to North Side places like Boystown)?

Thanks, everyone.",AskLGBT
Gender and sexuality issue,"I am 26, and over the last couple months, it seems I have lost what was once a sky high, almost obsessive level (for example, I have a folder of over 1,000 photos of women, ranging from women in porn, on TV, and ones I know in real life, which I would often pleasure myself with) of attraction to women, and in its place, gained a small degree of attraction to males (At least I think so, I notice them a little more I think, but none of them have caused me to feel aroused in the same way women did), as well as gender confusion. Feeling like I lost that attraction has taken a toll on me, as it's one of the things I enjoyed most. I would always fixate on women in some form or another, usually sexual thoughts about them, romantic ones, and the occasional fantasy of being one, which I will go to again later.

This began after a chat in a fetish chat room, involving a gender change fetish. I had for the last few years, had sexual fantasies about being various attractive women. In regards to that chat, one user told me my attraction to women is envy, and that's why I am so obsessed with them, basically saying I want to be one myself. Ever since then, it seems my attraction to women has disappeared, and a mild attraction, or so I think, to males has popped up. Prior to this, I had actually been getting more confident with women, for the first time in my life. Also, I feel intensely depressed, and a strange sense of depersonalization, like my identity is gone. On the topic of gender, for the last few years, I had also taken a big interest in trans issues, trans timelines, the lives of women who transitioned, and was doing things like looking the effects of HRT, sometimes obsessively. I also a few times engaged in a chat on the random chat site, Omegle, stating I was female, but in a completely non-sexualized conversation. Some of this makes me wonder if what I thought was a fetish might be something more, that and the idea of living as a woman doesn't bother me. Also, the range of women I imagined myself as expanded over time, starting as the hottest ones, then going to more average ones. As for the sexuality aspect, in those fantasies, I would imagine myself in straight scenarios, lesbian, and sometimes, even non-sexual ones, the last of those being kind of telling. I sometimes wonder if this depression I feel isn't really a form of gender dysphoria. I didn't seem to have any noticeable signs as a child of being trans, but being told that I envy women and want to be one seems to have triggered something in me, also, me not feeling anything wrong with the idea of living as a woman is also suggestive. Currently, I don't know if this is a gender or sexuality issue at its core.",AskLGBT
"[schizo content warning] All these docs about trans and other things like bachas by RT, BBC, NetGeo, ...coupled by people like Jordan Peterson are freaking me out","Everything feels like a Blade Runner hellhole, no room to breathe, everything is high speed.

What does being ""gay"" even mean? [https://youtu.be/eM\-xe6wHjnw](https://youtu.be/eM-xe6wHjnw) \&lt;\-\-\- this freaks me out, a literal panic attack coupled with depression

In a video Jordan Peterson said that humans are like lobsters, we both have in our brains something that keeps track of our hierarchy position in society. Is being ""gay"" having a subordinate brain? \(Having a large irreversible amygdala and a small reversible hippocampus\)

Also, all these new terms sound like Newspeak. This is how I decode them:

""people of color"" = a rainbow flag, when something is threatening / can't be categorized then seeing them as ""gay"" will automatically make them not threatening

""non\-binary"" = someone who is neither ""white"" nor ""black""

""cis"" = someone who is normal like a ""white"" or ""black"" person

""gender fluid"" = someone who does not know their ancestors and is easily influenced by anything or someone who knows their very diverse ancestors too well and can take on their mindset and becomes a sort of silly troll smartypants

""trans"" = trying to mimic an ""exotic"", ethnically\-mixed woman because they are rare like a ""tranny"" or a way for a dominant culture to view women of a less dominant culture

[https://youtu.be/xnMag\_9bCEo](https://youtu.be/xnMag_9bCEo) \&lt;\-\-\- this affirms my decoding and scares the shit out of me

Isn't all this stuff societal or cultural specific? Then why is this subreddit on the world wide web? What does being ""gay"" mean?

I get panic attacks and depression from thinking of all this. I just want to find peace and comfort [https://youtu.be/s7GqDZiI7d4](https://youtu.be/s7GqDZiI7d4)",AskLGBT
Things I hate about LGBT.,"There are few annoying things LGBT community is doing and it looks like they are pulling an agenda.
Here are some things people involved in it should change:

Bias towards heterosexuals.

Example: Some people tend to question their sexuality. At some point in life a lot of people ask the question “Am I really straight, bi or gay?”. The only thing that makes the difference is the confidence which they are answering the question. 

One thing I don’t like about LGBT is the eagerness to put people in categories and growing their numbers.

It’s okay for a gay male to get through a confusion phase, acting as a heterosexual, having heterosexual relationships, sexual, emotional. It’s a phase and a denial.
However if you turn the things around and you’re a straight male going through the same situation, you must be at least bisexual and probably gay.
It sounds like the only people going through sexual instability is the gay community.
If you tell someone who’s asking a question “hey, you could be in fact straight and you experienced” the LGBT minions jump and attack you “how can you dare to say that? Being gay is not a phase!!” But that is not the point. The point is: Living as straight and ending up gay or bisexual it’s okay, you “didn’t” had time to figure things out. However living as bi, gay and ending up straight is OUT of the question. Because that hurts the little lgbt minions. Sexuality works both ways so my suggestion is:

You need to listen to what people say and stop categorizing people in order to grow the numbers and making you feel more comfortable.

I told a guy he’s probably straight on a forum and the lgbt nazi jumped on me like “it’s impossible” “no way” “gay is not a phase” even though being a phase is not what I said.",AskLGBT
am I bi?,"I think I'm a bisexual girl. Here's the evidence: when I was in preschool I was best friends with this girl I would follow around and told her I would marry her if I could, often I would want to be friends with girls who I thought were pretty especially if they had nice hair. sometimes I would think about being a guy and having a pretty girlfriend and thinking that it would be nice, not being a guy but having a girlfriend. I find girls attractive and I think sexually attractive too.

Now that I am more aware of non-straightness (thanks internet) I think I may be bisexual, but there's one problem: I rarely feel butterflies around girls. I feel them around guys I like but not so much around women. Am I just more comfortable around girls or what? And if I want to start dating women, how would I go about this without potentially breaking someone's heart? On top of my social anxiety I am way too scared to experiment, I don't want to hurt anyone so I want to be sure I'm bisexual before I do. Can I be bisexual even if I don't often feel the same ""butterflies"" around women that I do men, and when I do it's very masculine appearing women?",AskLGBT
Is it silly to ask for my pronoun?,"I'll admit I don't know anything about this. I'm assuming when asked what pronoun to use people say they or non-binary or fluid or something like that.

I have a big ass beard and someone said I can write my pronoun on my nametag. I gave a WTF look to her but... with a big as beard and clearly dressed as a cis man (jean and plain tshirt, short hair) could I be anything else? But really is there anything pronoun other than man/male for someone dressed like that with a big ass beard?",AskLGBT
"are there any examples of lesbians elsewhere in the animal kingdom? I'm specifically referring to sex acts, as I know there are numerous matriarchal societies.",,AskLGBT
Straight guy looking for advice? Sorry wall of text.,"So I am well straight as it says. No I am not bicurious or anything. Just I have had the worst experiences with the LGBT. Also the straight grouped of people.

As a little history since 5th grade (US public schools system) fellow students assumed I was gay. I am a major introvert and well it's taking a ton of my will power to post this. I treat everyone with the most respect. It does not matter what the person is or identifies. 

Apparently that constitutes that I am gay. Being nice to girls and women and not treating them like things. But any way.

Middle school a kid I went to school with since kindergarten Came out to me on the school bus ride home. It was not a hey I am gay and I like you. No he tried getting into my pants and stuff. I used the side escape door to get away after trying to politely say no. And tell him to leave me alone. Next day he never came to school and his family moved away. After that the hazing from the straight people in was horrible. Gym class locker was actually filled with hate mail and stuff much worse. 

Its not that I hate him for it. Rather wish I could have told him sorry to cause him such heart ache. 

Well fast forward to high school. Yeah the harassment about rumors of me being gay was just as bad. I got to be good friends with one of my teachers who was Openly Lesbian. Also the one who ran the Straight and Gay Alliance group. So that got the rumors going more. Heck I remember sitting in study hall and two girls gossiping about me and I was sitting next to them. They didn't even realize that I was the one,that were talking about.

Well along the way my small group of friends gained a gay upper class men who would cross dress and stuff.  Hey I don't judge what ever makes you happy. But he later on got very handsy with me at first hey what ever. Its harmless then it got worse. I respectfully asked to cool it. I was not comfortable with it. He did and things were cool between us.

Then a year later at a friend's birthday party he was caught trying to drug my soda. He was asked to leave and he left the city and went to live with other family or something. But he gave a story I faked it all and I bullied him. 

Well that set the LGBT group in my area to believe I bullied him and what not. So I ended up getting a lot of hate from both sides. At,that point straight people had rumors that I am a confirmed gay guy and all that stuff. Gym was hell had my locker removed and my stuff put,in the toilet. And much more. Then the other side assumed that I was homophobic and the SAGA group asked me to not come to that class room during lunch. 

I am extremely uncomfortable with LGBT stuff. My ex who came out as Bisexual last year and I was proud she finally came out. But I tried to explain my past history and all. She took it was not going to support her. It is really hard for me to trust LGBT groups. From my past experience and all. 

So would you consider me a biggot or what ever? I voted for gay marriage everyone has a right to be happy no matter ones sexuality or idenity. I don't hate on people being open with their sexuality. Just wish people would understand why I get uncomfortable and know I do not hate.",AskLGBT
How do other redditers managed SNS during and after divorce?,"\(1\) How did you negotiate digital spaces \(e.g., Facebook/Instagram/etc.\) during and after divorce?

\(2\) Did you post about your divorce? Why \[not\]?

\(3\)   In what ways did you change your digital practices during and after  divorce? \(For example: Blocking behaviors: who did you block? why? How    did you handle shared network connections like in\-laws and friends?\)

\(4\)  Did you feel inhibited or uninhibited on SNS during and after divorce?  \(For example: sharing more or less content than before? What kind of    content?\)

\-\-\-

\*\*TL;DR;\*\* :  How do other redditers managed SNS during and after divorce?",AskLGBT
Should A Straight-Passing Asexual Avoid Dyeing Her Hair Rainbow Out Of Respect For The LGBT Community?,"If I were to dye my hair rainbow, I'm sure strangers would read it as a declaration that I am a gay woman. I am certainly not embarrassed for anyone to think that, but I'm thinking it might be like a form of cultural appropriation to knowingly signal an identity which I'm not. What should a good ally / intersectional feminist do? 



",AskLGBT
"My bi crush has a girlfriend, what should I do?","Basically, I'm a straight man, but my crush is a bi girl. I've been loving her for months now, but due to me not having much luck with women before, I hesitated a lot. I think I could have had her actually. But, I just found out that my crush has a girlfriend, but I love her. What should I do?",AskLGBT
"My best friend's mother found out her daughter is bisexual, and grounded her. What can we do?","Throwaway account here (guy), I don't know where to post this, so I'm just posting here.

So my best friend (16) is bisexual, and she's hiding it due to various concerns. But she was seen making out with a girl, and after that, she told her mom that she's in fact bisexual. Her mother doesn't like it, so she grounded her, for unknown amount of time. She can't use her phone that much, and she can't even go out, nor can people visit her. Due to this, she's very sad nowadays, I even think she's depressed now. I've discussed with her that I'll support her in any way possible. I'm actually very angered of her mother's actions, and I want to see things being alright once again. My question is, what can, and should we do?

On a side note, I think I love her, lol. Might consider joining the LGBT community myself, I'd do it for my best friend.",AskLGBT
Why is my son obsessed with Asian guys if he's straight?,"My son is 13. He used to say that he was gay(or some other flavor of queer, depending on when you asked), but since starting middle school he started saying he's ""normal"" and that he only likes girls. Which, whatever, we can roll with our kids figuring themselves out, but I'm worried that he's just saying that to fit in. He also suddenly started choosing more basic clothing when he was always really fussy about his wardrobe before(not suggesting that's an exclusively gay trait at all, but just worrying that it's a sign he's just trying to please his peers). He still obsesses over male celebrities and chooses which actors he likes in a movie based entirely on whether he thinks they're attractive or not. He still has boy band posters on his wall. He still talks excitedly over his interactions with boys at school and doesn't seem to notice girls at all. 

Am I overthinking it? I'm afraid I'm just looking for clues instead of following his lead because that had become our normal, but I'm afraid to just blindly accept that he's suddenly straight when he could be hurting inside about something. ",AskLGBT
How do you guys feel about this? Do you support this or not?,,AskLGBT
"Is being homophobic, or disliking homosexuals bad?","I think no mostly. Like if your saying ""All gays should die"" then that's bad, but I mean just disliking gays. I don't entirely think its bad because your not required to like anyone. Here's what I think, you can dislike gays, but don't try to make them something they aren't. (I'm fine with gays)",AskLGBT
What sexual preference is this??,"First let me state that what I am saying about myself is true and serious. I am 48 years old and would generally consider myself a cisgender straight male. I grew up in the 70s and 80s where we understood what gay was and cross dresses. But it's a new era and there is a new understanding for all of us about our own identities. 

Probably 10 years ago I would have expected this question to be scoffed at, especially by the LGBTQ community.  But. Well I'm curious if this is a thing and what the community has to say about this. 

As I said I would normally say I am cisgender straight Male.. attracted to women. However.  I live in one of the large LGBTQ communities in the US.  I noticed several years ago being drawn to lesbian couples.  

Oh sure, there's the usual.. fantasy,  curiosity etc. And why I would assume to be pushed aside and laughed at.. nice try straight man.. not into you.. bug off!

But recently I've become to learn about more specific genders. FTM. For example.  And I've come to the shocking realization that some trans men, identify as gay men. 

This is astonishing to me. 

First let me be specific.  What am I attracted to. Women yes. Straight feminine women, yes I am. 

But even more so. Masculine women. Girls who could pass as young men... almost.. almost pass. But their face is still hairless.  

Now, when I was growing up the suggestion would be.. maybe you're gay and into young men. But I assure you, I am very self aware.. and no.. I do not feel anything for men or boys who resemble masculine or boyish girls. 

For me, a ftm who has made the decision,  come to the realization that he is a boy, but has had no surgery yet or even hormones are the most attractive people I see. 

Where I live there is a large community of people born female who I see but do not talk to. I see many of them getting more ""manly"" as the years go by. I dont know if they are taking testosterone or just trying to look more male. But they just draw me.

Before the last year or so. Being a very uneducated straight guy,  I would have assumed all of them that look this way are lesbian who want nothing to do with me. 

Before you judge that, I am an older straight Male.  A girl who wants to be a man and looks as much as a man as she can ""is clearly gay"". Or so the rest of society was told. 

So now. On social media,  I reading about and meeting ftm people who want to be with men as partners! 

I have stated I am a straight male. So I will admit if they take enough hormone and remove breats, I become less able to be attracted to them. 

So.. am I anything? Am I just a straight male? I want their bodies to remain female biologically.. mostly. But I am more into the person if they are more boyish..even naked. Less curvy etc. 

So, let me apologize if I have offended someone.  I'm certainly not telling YOU how you should look or how far you should take your transformation.  I dont mean to imply that there's anything wrong with being whoever you are inside and out. 

I'm just curious.  What am I? I think I'm mostly straight.. but is there a term for men into short haired,  boyish faced, boyish body females or ftm, who also prefer men? Is that a thing? Or am I just out of touch with something?",AskLGBT
Are trans-women lesbians actually heterosexual?,"If a trans-gender woman with functional testes or stored sperm impregnates a cis-gender who self-identifies as lesbian, is it offensive to refer to the couple as heterosexual, or can same-sex couples conceive children now? I’m aware of the difference between gender and sex. Also, I’m not transphobic, just wondering if the academic definition of sex no longer matters.

Given you accept the premises of my question, which you should because they are not opinion-based, what I’m really asking is if “lesbian” and “gay” have been redefined in our culture and are no longer perfectly synonymous with “homosexual.” Honestly, I’m just curious about this. Please don’t dismiss my question as everyday cis-normative ignorance.",AskLGBT
Question about this article on a 3-year-old gay child,"I was reading this article on Pride.com and wasn't really understanding it. 
https://www.pride.com/viral/2018/4/17/internet-head-over-heels-adorable-openly-gay-3-year-old

My understanding was that 'gay', 'bi', and 'straight' are about romantic and/or sexual attraction (which no 3-year-old could possibly have a handle on), and that labeling people 'gay' or 'straight' based on how feminine or masculine they act is just reinforcing stereotypical gender roles. Doesn't officially labeling a 3-year-old 'gay' for acting feminine contradict all of that?",AskLGBT
A gay friend fell in love with me.,"tl;dr - a friend fell in love with me, what to do

hi. I'm not sure if that's the correct subreddit, but I think this one is the more appropriate.
I'm a straight boy. I have a gay friend and we started to become close (in a friendly way). Recently, he has been acting like he feels something more and it's been visible, as we have classes together. He came to me yesterday and said how he feels about it (knowing I'm not interested in a romantic relationship). I don't know what should I do, my main priority being to hurt him the least. We see each other every day and I'm not sure if I should bring the contact to minimum not hurt him more or rather try to keep things 'normal'. The thing is, I feel kinda disturbed with the whole situation and I'm not sure if I like this guy that much anymore (I'm not homophobic or anything btw, that's just the way I cope with unwanted affection from others) and I'm afraid my actions would not be sincere.
What do you think I should do?

ps. sorry for my English not being perfect as it's not my mother tongue.",AskLGBT
What is *the* current gay music group/band?,I used to love BearForce 1. The gayest band I know. I also loved ABBA and Village People. But what is the current gayest musical group at this point?,AskLGBT
How do non-dysphoric trans people know they’re trans?,"I’ve been reading up on the whole transmedicalist vs anti-transmedicalist debate for a while but still haven’t made my mind up as to what idea I side with, so I suppose what I want to know is how someone can know they’re trans if they don’t experience dysphoria?",AskLGBT
A study I found shows that children born to gay parents are more likely to be gay themselves. Does this fit with the idea that people are born gay?,"I believe that being homosexual is a generic trait and not something that a person can control. So if being born to gay parents makes you more likely to he gay disproportionately to the rest of the population, how does the genetic theory hold up? 

Link to study: https://www.ncbi.nlm.nih.gov/m/pubmed/20642872",AskLGBT
I've just been the victim of a homophobic hate crime. Any resources that can help?,"Me and my lesbian friend were both hollered at on the subway. Some douche thought it useful to yell slurs at us. He ended up slapping me.

The cops are supportive and he'll probably be charged with assault and harassment 

I just feel a bit violated. Any resources I can patronize?",AskLGBT
What's the correct way to describe someone that's not transgender?,"Bisexual male here, I'm not transgender. What's the legit LGBTQ word for it?",AskLGBT
A question about genderfluid.,"It seems that genderfluid is something that mixed in gender with gender expression. So their gender is....dressing that gender makes them that gender??? I thought clothes were tied to gender expression. Also if dressing like a girl or a guy make you a girl or a guy, do cross-dressers exist?",AskLGBT
"Assigned Female at birth, but Identify as gay male?","A cowoker told me that they're a gay male, but born female. But they act and dress very feminine. Almost Harjuku girl style. So my question is this person considered trasns or something else?",AskLGBT
Can you define man by LGBT definition?,"By and large most definitions of man are an adult human male. Male defined as the sex partner that fertilizes a female. 

However these definitions are not defined the same way by the LGBT community as a man can be a traditionally defined woman that lives as a traditionally defined man would. Thus, it becomes even more confusing when nonbinary is introduced. 

For the nonbinary concept to exist, one needs to have a foundation of what man and woman means and thus know that they do not identify with them. 

The problem is I never am answered when I posit this question. It is usually met by downvotes and no responses. ",AskLGBT
"My tween came out as bi, which we are supportive of, how do I gracefully navigate some of my concerns?","Oy, this got long....
My daughter came out as bi when she was 11 (she is currently 12) because she had a crush on a fellow female 5th grader. I like to think we are being supportive; we embraced her when she came out, encouraged her to read/watch LGBT friendly books and movies and we treat her girl crushes the same as her boy crushes. However, I was concerned that due to her age she was attempting to take on a unique persona (she was putting anything LGBT on a pedestal which I felt was unfair(?) to LGBT folks just trying to be treated like people, not a novelty) and I told her that her sexual identity is one aspect of her personality and to be wary of labeling herself while she is still discovering what her crushes mean (she was just getting over a boy crush because she realized the boy was a downer as she got to know him).  I told her that her crushes may mean she wants to be bffs with someone or want a romantic relationship, and I meant that for any gender. She told me I wouldn't say that if she was straight which, I don't necessarily agree but it made me rethink my approach.  

Any advice for a mom trying to provide the best support for her bi tween?",AskLGBT
How are gay vampires not problematic?,"After watching the Maven of the Eventide’s videos on Carmilla, I am left with the question: how can vampirism be an acceptable allegory for homosexuality? The defence is that vampires are seen as evil and predatory, like LGBT people, but narratives which portray vampires as sympathetic can be progressive and relatable to members of the LGBT community, who also struggle with being outcasted. However, vampires *are* predatory by nature, and there’s good reason for humans to shun them, while there’s no good reason for homophobia and transphobia. Even if the vampire is “vegetarian”, only drinking from animals, or finding a blood substitute, there’s often an arc of rejecting the instinct to attack humans and choose to be good instead — an arc that most certainly does not apply to LGBT folk. Considering that, is it ever possible to make vampires as unjustly discriminated against as homosexuals?",AskLGBT
"What's your opinion on the movie Love, Simon?",,AskLGBT
"When coming out the closet to family, did you try tell your extended family or just parents?",,AskLGBT
"if society ever found a ""cure"" for the way we are, do you think it would be forced upon us?","this goes for everyone in the lgbt community, trans, gays, lesbians...etc for trans in particular though, i mean a cure as in being ok with your assigned gender and biological sex given at birth instead of transitioning. just to be clear, i dont believe any of these things are a disease or mental illness, just the way we are :)",AskLGBT
Straight male with a question about representing gay characters in a script I'm writing,"   Hello, I'm currently writing a script for a short film, but I've become a little nervous that it may be viewed as disrespectful to members of the LGBT community. Basically, it tells the story young man who is afraid of continuing a relationship with another male he truly loves because of his fear that others may find out about his sexual orientation. Throughout the story it mirrors the greek tale of Narcissus, who turned down love in favor of his reflection. Both the tale and my script end with the lead character turning into a flower as a result of their refusal of love for self image.

   While Romans would use this story to to tell a moral against self obsession and egotistical tendencies, the Greeks would use it more as a moral against love of self image in a more communal sense, which is the angle I'm coming from in the story. 

   I understand fully that coming out is incredibly complicated and difficult for many people in the community, and while the story makes it very clear that the lead isn't selfish or narcissistic in anyway because of his decision, the negative association many have of the character of Narcissus may mislead what I'm trying to get across.
I in no way would want people to think I'm equating people who are not ready to come out as selfish, or demonize it in any way.

   I'm just wondering what you all think about this, because even though I'm going in with good intentions I wouldn't want to misrepresent or insult anyone. If this association insults anyone just let me know. Any input would be appreciated!",AskLGBT
"In a gay relationship, can either partner ask the other to marry them?","Straight guy here with what is possibly a stupid question, but it's something I'm legitimately curious about. 

Yesterday, I found out two of my friends, a lesbian couple, got engaged. A few months ago, a couple of guys I know got engaged too.

In a (excuse the term) ""traditional"" relationship, it's nearly always the man asking the woman to get married. In a gay relationship, can either person ask, or what?",AskLGBT
"First gay experience coming up, what do I do?","So I’ve been bi-curious for awhile and I’ve slowly become more comfortable admitting that and am no longer ashamed of it (grew up where it was looked down upon). 
I’ve been trying to work up the courage to experiment with another guy. I have chickened out a few times already but I think this is the time I go through with it. I feel comfortable and ready. I met a nice guy on tinder and we are going to hook up sometime in the next couple of days. What do I do to prepare? Do I need to douche or something? Should I ask if he’s a top or bottom? Do I bring anything with me? I’m excited to try gay sex but don’t want to fuck it up too bad.

I told him it’ll be my first time and to be patient and he is cool with that :)

Edit: I really want to try being both a bottom and a top",AskLGBT
Gender identity and sexuality question?,"If a trans man met a woman identifying person who claimed she was gay, would he be offended and accept that the partner saw them as a woman? Or would they then ask their partner to stop repressing their straightness",AskLGBT
Your opinion on Dr John Money.,"My question is how people in your community feel about Dr John Money, his actions and the consequences there in. I feel it is a relevant question since he was one of the driving forces in the usage of the word gender and how we define it today. 

The main controversy surrounding him being the David Reimer case. David was born with male sex organs but due to complications with a circumcision those were more or less destroyed. Money convinced the parents of the child to put them on hormone treatments, rename the child Brenda and raise them as a girl. 

The part where this turns bad is when David/Brenda and their twin brother came out against Money with claims that he forced the two to ""rehearse sexual acts"" upon each other with David/Brenda acting as the ""Bottom"" (their words not mine). David/Brenda spent years on antidepressants until they eventually overdosed themselves on them. The Twin brother also committed suicide by shotgun, parents and the word of the twins before hand pointing to the actions of Money as the cause.

He lead the charge in many ways when it came to gender reassignment/identity/roles and wrote many books on the subjects.

In the end my question is how do you all feel about him. 

(I know every group of people has a person or people in them who are abhorrent and this does not mean the group as a whole is in any way reflective i just wanted people opinion on the matter that i myself do not have as i dont have too much to do with it.)",AskLGBT
why would you want to sodomise a man,like its so degrading and demasculating. i think gay people are fucked cause 1. they want to do that to a man and 2. they let another man do that to them. ,AskLGBT
Trans men,A lot of my friends and romantic interests are trans men I'm a gay cis male and one of my friends is saying behind my back that I'm fetishising trans men what do I do bc it's not true I just happen to like who I like ,AskLGBT
Question about the origins,"Hey guys,

I hope this question does not offend you, my intention is not to deride LGBT. 

Anyway,

How did it start, biologically? Isn't sex (thinking at a primal level, like between monkeys or dogs or something) purely for reproduction? As humans, we have the capability of reasoning, and we can develop feelings of love. Some more ""intelligent"" animals can do that as well, forming mutual symbiotic relationships. But isn't this feeling of love based off the primal desire to mate with a suitable partner?

Since homosexual relationships can never produce children, at least not yet, why, biologically, are some people naturally attracted to the same sex?",AskLGBT
curious about ...,"if a father of a child is homosexual, will the child more likely be homosexual? 
is there a possibility that the child may be straight?

i'm wondering about myself and the possibility of me having kids in the future lol",AskLGBT
I am new here and have a question about the pronouns used for Agender or non-binary.,"I am not sure where to begin..... So I will start with the story and will clearly mark the question.

I have been watching online streaming services for some quality shows. One of these shows has a non-binary person on it, let us say Ash. Ash is full of energy and Ash is very fun to watch. Ash dresses the way Ash wants. Which is wonderful and makes the shows fun. 

When I first started to watch I was uncomfortable. I could not place a finger on why. It was not the looks of Ash, it was not Ash's personality. So why was I uncomfortable....then I figured it out.

It was the pronouns. I have a hard time using a plural pronoun for a single person. I am a very analytical person. Everything has their place where they belong, in my home/world. I like my speech to be the same way. So the use of them/their being used to describe a single person gets under my skin.

Question: Is there a set of pronouns that is seperate from he/his/him, she/hers/her, and they/them/their that I can use for non-binary people? Do I need to ask the person permission to use these or is it a common courtesy to use them once I know they are non-binary?

I am really trying to be accommodating to the other genders that I run into on a daily basis. 

PS: If I have the title wrong, I am sorry and would like to know the right name to use.",AskLGBT
Do I count as Bi?,"I am a male who is attracted to females, and I am also attracted to Trans-females, but not males (trust me, i've tested this theory out)

Does this make me Bi, Straight, or 'it depends'?",AskLGBT
"Monosexual trans redditors, did who you're attracted to change after transitioning?","Also, is pansexuality more common among trans folk? All four trans people I know are pan.",AskLGBT
What exactly does it mean to be an ally?,"In the past, I have **always** considered myself an ally. I never really thought much about *exactly* what it meant, but I care deeply about LGBT issues despite being a heterosexual cis white male.

However, I recently had an experience where this was called into question. I got into a completely civil argument (with someone who happened to be a person of color, but the discussion had nothing to do with skin color). When we could not reach common ground after several back and forths, this person accused me of being racist and refused to reply any further.

Well this was deeply upsetting to me, because I consider myself very much *not* a racist person and I was quite sure that nothing I said during the course of the discussion could be construed as racist. It seemed clear to me that the person in question had called me racist because I was a white man disagreeing with a person of color, and I would not allow my argument to be dismissed based on the color of my skin. However, when I talked to a friend of mine later (who is much more involved in and knowledgeable about the LGBT community than I), he said that as an ally I can't do that sort of thing (disagree with a person of color in a public setting) and that what the person of color had done (called racism to silence me even though I had not said anything racist) might have seemed unfair to me but was completely legitimate, and that as an ally I had no right to object to that charge of racism. We talked about this for a while, and the more I pressed, the more shocked I was. Apparently, it is not only unacceptable for a white person to question a person of color in public or object to false cries of racism, but it's actually not acceptable to do *anything* that could be perceived as invalidating their experience, no matter how extreme (my friend, who is normally very reasonable, was very hesitant to admit that I would have been justified in being upset if this person of color had *physically hit me* at the end of our discussion).

It seemed to me that taking these restrictions upon myself was something that I did not want to do. So I asked my friend what exactly I lose out on if I do not identity as an ally, specifically with regard to how I would be less effective at doing activist work and promoting LGBT interests. And his answer was... fairly unsatisfying. He couldn't give me any real answer, except that LGBT activists are not willing to take someone seriously if they refuse to identify as an ally. Which I've no doubt is true, but it doesn't really matter *to me*, as that's not my field and anything that *I* might do to promote LGBT interests, I could plausibly do without anyone ever asking me if I identify as an ally. 

I guess what I'm asking, then, is this: what exactly does it mean to be an ally? Does it involve any serious restrictions on your ability to question the behavior of people who happen to be people of color? If it does, what reasons (aside from being taken seriously by a certain type of person) are there for me to identity as an ally and subject myself to those restrictions?",AskLGBT
"Does heterosexual sex gross homosexual people put, or is it just ""meh""?",,AskLGBT
What was it like the day you came out?,Like to your family assuming as a teenager? What did you do before you came out? how did you come out? what was it like after?,AskLGBT
Trans folks is my facebook friend doing this for attention?,"So this was just someone who I went to highschool with, this person is an intelligent individual who goes to an Ivy League and they came out as trans a couple of years ago. This person is also from a country in South-East Asia where coming out as trans would be problematic but has since acquired citizenship in Iceland.

They identify as a trans man, yet have made what seems to be an invisible effort to appear/pass or even to live as a man. I am not trying to cast doubt on this persons trans-ness at all and I understand that gender, like sexual orientation can be a spectrum. I am just trying to understand how it is possible to call yourself a trans male and identify with trans peoples struggle, yet present as entirely female: show visible cleavage in selfies, complain about transphobia in a swimming pool by entering a male change room while still having a very feminine body. I am unsure as to whether they have started hormone therapy or anything but this person just posts a lot about their trans struggle while living their life as a seemingly normal cisgender heterosexual female (her partner is a cisgender male who identifies as male)

I will admit that I do not have any trans friends but this confuses me as a gay male and I want to understand what other trans/gender queer people think about this. I have blocked the faces out from the pictures but [here's](https://imgur.com/a/bFzzy) a small album of the ""transphobia"" that this person experiences as well as pictures of them in a photoshoot wearing a dress and boots calling it ""genderfuck"". 

I just would like some clarification/input from other trans or gender-queer people on what they think of this. Is this person using being trans as an excuse for attention or to be ""different""? Does this invalidate the struggles of trans-women and men who are discriminated because they try to live their truths? As a trans person do you think you would have been able to do the things she does (take ""risque"" pictures with the body you don't feel comfortable in) and post it on social media?

tl;dr  Cisgender heterosexual female identifies as trans man, yet seems perfectly okay with her female body",AskLGBT
Questioning my sexuality?,"Hi everyone. New to this subreddit. Lately, I’ve been questioning on wether I am Pan/Bi or if I’m just straight up lesbian. I have a boyfriend who I love very much, but there are times where I think about dating a woman like I did when I was younger. This has been going on for quite some time and I was wondering if anyone else has this same problem?

Thanks in advance &lt;3",AskLGBT
Is agender the same as androgynous?,"I'm tempted to think not, but I don't see a clear consensus in the material I read online.

I've done the Bem Sex Role Inventory three times. Every time I got a score very close to the centre - once just in the undifferentiated section, once just in the androgynous, once just in the feminine (never in the masculine!). I tend to think of agender as more like undifferentiated rather than androgynous.

Is there a definitive or at least widely accepted view? ",AskLGBT
Should I come out to my family?,"So recently I came out as bisexual to my fiancee. Shes ok with it, I dont cheat on her or anything but its something i've had to hide for a long time and I believe my hiding it to be the cause of my depression/anxiety. It feels great that I can be honest with the person I love most...

The problem is that I tried to come out as a teenager to my mother. I was still unsure at the time what was going on, suddenly I was going out with a guy etc etc. She basically went on a rant saying being bi wasnt real, it was just a phase, it was disgusting and to not tell my dad as he wohld disown me. I ended up finishing things with that guy and drove it out of my mind until years later when I moved out and lived a kind of second life. 

I want to be out... mainly because I want to make it clear that if my son comes out in later life I wont have him subjected to what I was. I'm very close to my parents and they adore my son so I dont know whats best... have this out now when theres time to heal before he grows up, but risk having to cut them out of his life or cross that bridge if we come to it? 

Sorry, you didn't need my life story :)",AskLGBT
Zappa?,"I am a straight woman. I live in a quite homophobic Eastern European country. However, I do not consider myself homophobic, but I know that I did not start out non-homophobic and I know that because of my environment I am very ignorant still. 

I also quite like Frank Zappa. Today I was listening to ""Bobby Brown"" and ""He's so gay"" and started wondering, whether they are offensive to LGBT people. How do you feel about it?",AskLGBT
There are lots of LGBT stories on my podcasts lately. Am I getting a taste of my own cis male medicine?,"I listen to several sci-fi and fantasy fiction podcasts, and over the past few months it seems like, more often than not, they’ve featured LGBT protagonists and themes. Some are explicitly about the experience (love stories, identity stories, coming out stories, etc.) but some just have gay characters fighting monsters or raising kids or raising monster fighting kids or whatever else sci-fi and fantasy heroes do. 

I’ve enjoyed them, but it does feel  weird when the majority of stories aren’t about me, so to speak. I’m a little embarrassed to admit this, but I even feel like an agenda is being pushed upon me, despite the fact that it’s an agenda I support. 

So am I getting a hint of what it’s like being queer in a straight world?",AskLGBT
Why is there an L *and* G in LGBT?,"The title of the post is pretty self explanatory. Gay means someone attracted to their own gender while lesbian specifically means a woman who is attracted to other women. Why include both?

Also, why the fuck do ""allies"" get a spot on the LGBT+ spectrum? They're just people who support-or just don't *outright* hate-us.",AskLGBT
Is it ok for me to take part in a drag queens event?,"Hi, straight dude here. Have said I would take part in a drag queens event, but I'm starting to doubt whether it's really a good idea as a straight dude to do this, whether it could come across very badly or insensitively. There are gay people doing it as well, if that makes things any different. 

Thanks for any replies, just trying to get some views on this ",AskLGBT
im a little confused :/,"i really just got reddit for the purpose of expressing what i’m feeling, what it means, and ask people what i should do or think of it anonymously. so i’m a teen girl... and i’ve always been straight, i guess. it’s just that... there’s this one girl i know and she’s bisexual and really open about it, i’m really happy for her. it’s just that sometimes i can’t help but feel attracted to her. it’s really weird for me cause it’s only happened with her and i don’t know if that means that i feel things for girls in general. the thing is that when i see a specific type; kinda darker and more dominant (kind of like more of the stereotypical guy type in a relationship; best way i know how to explain it is like i’m the little spoon and my s/o is always the big spoon type thing). i like a michelle jones from spiderman homecoming type or a rosa diaz from brooklyn 99 type. kind of like a tomboy. i don’t know if it’s because i compare them to the stereotypical men or that i just like girls, specifically this one. it’s just been confusing me so much and i just need clearing from someone. please tell me what you guys think",AskLGBT
What about heteroflexibility?,"Hey all!

I [19M] was wandering about something I heard from a friend. He is gay and he is dating guys for years now. 
We were talking about things in the past with a couple beers and he mentioned he was heteroflexible before really coming out. I've never heard of it, so I finally got the guts to ask.
What is heteroflexibility all about?

Maybe somebody could give me an answer✌",AskLGBT
Alan Partridge and transphobia,"(content warning: transphobic slurs)

For those unaware, Alan Partridge is an English comedy character created by Steve Coogan to be a somewhat egotistical and callous TV and radio personality. At some points in the sitcom ‘I’m Alan Partridge’ he makes reference to ‘ladyboys’ (from making up a drink under the same name, to calling them ‘fascinating creatures’ to complaining ‘it’s confusing), seemingly for comedic effect. Alan, despite his nature, is rarely depicted as a villain and more of a dubious and deeply flawed protagonist, so the question arises- were the writers of this show simply looking to create shock at Alan’s abrasive nature or were they legitimately being transphobic and looking to make fun of trans women?",AskLGBT
How do people know their orientation from early ages?,"Not trying to deny that they can, it just kind of baffles me. I myself am bi, thought I was straight for a few years, but before all that I had no interest in men *or* women at all.

Am I the odd one out or is it a person-to-person thing where some people just feel attraction in childhood while others don't? If any of you have experienced childhood attractions how did it feel? Did it differ greatly from now?

Sorry if this is the wrong place to ask, let me know and I'll delete this post.",AskLGBT
Amigay,"Currently a teen, and always liked women, but recently I decided to look at naked gay pics and got hard just like straight. Now I watch straight and naked guy pics. And like naked pictures better. Weirdly I don't get hard on gay porn. I would probably never date a guy. Am I gay?",AskLGBT
Should I speak to a trans co-worker about bathroom complaints?,"My company recently hired a transsexual female to male. I'm unaware of what step in the process or any specifics, but he prefers to be referred to with male pronouns, goes by a male name, the works. In my company we have a mentor system and I've been his mentor during his onboarding process. I've gotten a few complaints from several of our co- workers about his use of the men's bathroom. My company is very LGBT friendly, but we live in a rather conservative area and some people feel strongly about this issue. I've confirmed with HR that we will not be asking him to use the women's bathroom, and the plan is to basically ignore the complaints. I'm of the opinion that he would not appreciate knowing that there was so much attention paid to his use of the bathroom. There are private unisex bathrooms on a different floor, so there is another option if he'd prefer more privacy, but I'm unclear as to whether or not to even mention that there was a complaint. Should I tell him, or since the company isn't taking action should I just let it go?",AskLGBT
Is 'homo' a derogatory word,"I just said it in a reply and I feel these negative vibes off it. I understand it's just a shortening of 'homosexual'. I've only really heard it used in disgust or hate directed at LGBT. I find it distasteful, I just wanted to hear your thoughts on it.",AskLGBT
What is the best way to cast a person pre/post-transition?,"I strongly believe that trans roles should go to trans actors. If a character is meant to go through transition on screen (for example, in a serialized drama) would it make the most sense for the person cast to be trans themselves, &amp; for the role to include playing their character pre-transition?
Not a casting director, just a writer, working on a character that made me imagine this scenario.

edit: changed ""wouldn't"" to ""would"". I'm not trying to sound presumptuous. ",AskLGBT
ISO: LGBTQ+ who attended summer camps as youth,"Hi! 

I am a nonreligious, long-time camp volunteer with a YMCA in California. While we have Christian roots, we have been intentionally moving away from the single-faith traditions and a core group of volunteers is looking to propose a series of reforms to make our camp culture more inclusive and culturally relevant. 

One area we are looking to change is the emphasis on gender binaries and heterosexual norms. There are a lot of obvious moments where this is true, such as when campers are addressed or given directions based on gender. Such as, ""Boys to the boys side. Girls to the girls side!"" and ""Boys sing this part, girls sing this part."" However, I imagine that there are also moments that, as a cis-woman, I may have missed. 

We are hoping to create a series of LGBTQ-informed proposals to present to our camp directors. Our goal is not only to make camp a safer and better place for our LGBTQ+ campers, but to also promote inclusivity and equality as core values for all our campers. We have reached out to former campers of our camp, as well as fellow volunteers who are members of the LGBTQ community. However, we'd like to get as much input as possible.. .

I would love to ask the members of this subreddit for some of their experience and for input on how to improve our camp.

&gt;What were some moments at camp that made you feel happy? Accepted? Included? (We'd like to keep and expand on any positive opportunities)  

&gt;What were some moments at camp that felt exclusive? Made you sad? Made you feel that maybe camp wasn't ""for you""? 

If anything comes to mind that wasn't addressed in my post, but you feel is worth sharing regarding your summer camp experience- please do! I'd love to listen and learn. Thank you very, very much for your help. ",AskLGBT
What would it be if you have a desire to be the opposite sex but do not currently identify as the opposite sex or gender?,I don't know a lot about this stuff.,AskLGBT
Advice for how to support a sister,"My sister started dating a girl about six months ago. We grew up very very conservative in a conservative community and she and I are the only ones who have left it completely. She never thought she was gay or bi, despite any woman unmarried past 21 is obviously gay in that conservative community. 🙄 I’ve always thought that I was supportive and doing the right things, but today I realized that I’ve never been through something like that, so how would I know if I was doing the right thing or not. I am the only one who knows I’m the family, so I want to be extra sure I am doing the right thing. 

Things I’ve done: 

1) Talked with her about therapy and how good it can be to work through any big issue. She has had good experiences with therapy in the past, and we’ve talked about /my/ therapy to deal with life issues, so it’s not like I’m trying to force her into therapy. Her new jobs insurance doesn’t cover therapy, so I’m trying to give her other resources, but I haven’t been able to find a resource for free therapy. 

2) Emphasized that this is completely normal. Anytime she talks about how it’s wrong or bad or evil, I talk to her about why we think that way. I talk to her about our new community, and how homosexuals aren’t demonized or even remarked on because it is so normal that some people are gay and there are millions of people who think she is totally normal. 

3) Been welcoming to the girlfriend and tried to “normalize” the being-in-a-relationship-with-a-girl. I am trying to help her see that it isn’t different from dating a guy in how I see it. 

4) I listen and try to help with any relationship or identity issue. Mostly I just let her talk and ask questions to get her to see where “shame” or “fear” is coming from. The advice that I’ve given is: 

A) she doesn’t have to talk to anyone about things she doesn’t want to. She feels like she is lying to family, but I’ve told her that she wouldn’t feel like she owes it to anyone to come out to them. She should “come out” to people if/when she wants to. This is about her: not them. 

B) her girlfriend is hurting because she’s with a closeted person, and I know that’s hard for my sister. She doesn’t want to hurt her girlfriend but she doesn’t want to “come out” if maybe she’s bi or won’t end up with a girl. I’ve told my sister she doesn’t have to “decide” what she is RIGHT THIS SECOND and TELL EVERYONE EVERYTHING NOW while also talking to her about how being closeted with someone who isn’t is a sustainable plan, for happiness long term. 

IDK. Am I doing the right things? Is there more I can do to help? This is the first time I’ve been in this situation. 
",AskLGBT
"I'm bisexual, but genitalia turns me off.","I'm a 19 year old cisgender-male, and can honestly say I am turned on by both men and women. However, I am utterly confused by peoples attraction to genitalia. 

I hear people talking about Vaginas and Penises like their these **amazing** things (I believe Louis C.K. described the vagina as a 'beautiful wonderful flower') but any time I look at either of those parts I feel either nothing or straight up *disgust*, they look like these weird Lovecraftian alien orifices. 

I can't say I'm asexual because I am plenty turned on by the rest of the human body (except feet, because... I guess I'm sane that way) and *enjoy* actual sex. Is this normal? Is their something wrong with me?

Also, small second question: Is gaydar an actual thing? How do I turn it on, because I'm flying blind unless you have a fucking rainbow flag sticking out of your back.",AskLGBT
How/why would their be different names for one's body parts?,"I'm a bi cis woman and I went to my local sexual health clinic for birth control. When I was there they had questions like which pronouns do you use which I understood, but then I was asked if I refer to the following body parts as the mouth, vagina and anus.  My confusion is that those are really just what I biologically have and since this is dealing with messing with my biology by being on birth control wouldn't it be necessary to use those terms. Is there other terms used for people who are not comfortable with their biological body parts?",AskLGBT
What does it feel like to have gender dysphoria?,"**I'm legitimately interested, and I'm very thankful I don't have to go through this.sorry if it sounds like I'm being pretentious**

I'm a teen and my friend has a lot of dysphoria about their gender. It's really hard to relate to them, with me (a cis female) not going through that.  Up until recently I was very confused by the concept. ",AskLGBT
"Is ""gaydar"" real and how does it work for you?",Just curious.  A bunch of my gay friends say they can usually tell when someone's gay.  I can't.,AskLGBT
Questioning my Orientation,"I've identified as bisexual and dated nearly every gender under the sun. However, recently I've began to question things since I finally have become sexual in relationships. I've realized I'm sexually attracted to penises, not vaginas. It doesn't matter the gender of the person, so long as they have a penis I view us as sexually compatible.

Now I run into a problem here. I feel guilty about it and don't even know what it's called.",AskLGBT
What are the most sub-textually queer or most iconically campy films from the pre-stonewall Golden Age of Hollywood (~1930-1969),"Other than *The Wizard of Oz* of course, which goes without saying. ",AskLGBT
"Is there a good resource on the differences between gender non-conforming, gender atypical, gender diverse and gender variant?","Hi. I don't know if this is the right place, so if it's not, feel free to point me in the right direction.

Is there a good resource on the differences between gender non-conforming, gender atypical, gender diverse and gender variant? I feel like one of these (or perhaps similar) describes me, but I can't really figure out the semantics.

I've been doing quite a bit of Googling but seem to be getting conflicting answers or answers that seem like two or more of these are synonyms (in different pairings each time).",AskLGBT
"Question about who makes the first move, and sexual assault.","With sexual assault/misconduct being in the news a lot (and the Aziz Ansari case in particular comes to mind) - there's a hypothesis I want to test - but I'm wondering how it applies to same sex couples. 

I would posit that in heterosexual interactions generally: 

- The man has a higher libido
- The norm is for the man to make the first move. (Confidence is attractive, etc). 

What I think this does - is it does have the man going out on a limb a bit - making a sexual advance (whether asking a colleague to go for a drink afterwork, or leaning in for a kiss, or coming out of the bathroom naked), without knowing for sure how the advance is going to be recieved. 

If the responsibility for unwanted sexual advances are on the person making the move - then naturally it's going to tend to be men who held responsible. 

Now of course - we talk about encouraging seeking verbal consent, how to read subtle cues, etc and I think that's where the solution is at, but that's not what I'm wanting to talk about here. 

What I'm wondering is - for same sex interactions - does this dynamic similarly exist? 

As a heterosexual male - I would say that 98% of my sexual interactions are ones where I make the first move. Even amongst sex positive partners who are really good have giving verbal consent cues ('I'm really into this') etc - it's still me who makes the physical first moves (initiating kisses, etc). 

I'm wondering how it is for you - do you tend to initiate sexual interactions or receive them, or both? 

Regarding sexual misconduct in the same-sex community - is there an archetype (ie. people who tend to make the first move) make unwanted sexual advances?* 

*It's just come to mind that I'm thinking of a particular kind of unwanted sexual attention here - which is where people push boundaries in the face of cues of discomfort or that the attention unwarranted. I'm excluding cases of  people who drug drinks, or use threats of violence or authority. ",AskLGBT
Being the awkward last friend to come out. Advice?,"(I made a similar post in LGBTeens but thought I might get some better advice here...)

I'm a closeted lesbian. All my friends have been openly LGBT+ for years. They always make gay jokes, talk about crushes and have always been perfectly settled with their sexualities and genders.

I really want to come out to them but feel like I'd be intruding if I did. They've thought I was straight for years (talking to me about crushes and going 'you won't be interested, you're not gay enough' etc. and me agreeing because I didn't want to come out yet). If I suddenly turn around and come out, they might think I'm lying to try and fit in, or they'll think I'm confused because it's so sudden. It's hard to explain the fear but it just feels like coming out will make me the very awkward third wheel on their tight-knit clique. I think I would be unwelcome.

Is there a way to come out that *doesn't* bring loads of attention to the fact that you've been contradicting yourself every time you said you were straight?",AskLGBT
Transmedicalist/anti-transmedicalist arguments?,"I wasn’t sure where else to post this, but I’m interested in hearing arguments from both sides of the fence here, as most of the results I’ve found upon looking this up are biased towards transmedicalists",AskLGBT
"My bf (26) of three months is interested in having sexual experiences with men, and I'm unsure how I feel about this.","I (F24) have known about his bisexuality since about half a year before we started dating, because we were already close friends then and he told be about it, even though he hasn't come out to most of our other friends or his family yet. When we started dating, he pointed out pretty soon that he's still interested in having such experiences, but he would understand and accept if I didn't want him to. I wasn't really surprised or offended by that, and told him I had to think about it, but it's been three months now, and I still can't decide what would be better for our relationship. I keep wondering what the bigger ""sacrifice"" would be - me allowing a ""half open"" relationship even though the thought kind of scares me or him restraining from exploring this part of his identity. I can't really say how much I would mind if he had sex with men, as long as it is ""just"" sex, but I know for a fact that he has also had a more romantic interest in a guy about a year ago. So I guess that emotional aspect makes me feel a bit insecure about all this. Other than that things between us are great by the way, sex and everything else, so I really want to figure out how to deal with this so it works out for both of us.
Do you have any similar experiences and what did you do about it?

Edit: I didn't really state this clearly - he hasn't been intimate with a man yet, so he doesn't even know if he'd actually like it or not.
",AskLGBT
I need some advice,"Hey guys I was wondering if I can get some advise on this: so I’m in a very happy relationship with my boyfriend, (I’m 26, he’s 24) but we’re not very sure about his sexual orientation/gender identity. He has always identified himself as a gay man, since he is only attracted to men and he is happy to be one (body wise) but he’s always thought he is a girl because of his personality. in fact I call him my princess. Again he is perfectly happy with his biological gender and stay as a man. Anyway, I was hoping we could get some advise since we were discussing the topic.  Thanks y’all!

EDIT: I realised I wasn’t very clear in my first post (sorry I am new to reddit) but what he and I both want is some guidance on what his gender identity is. He likes me to use female pronouns with him and treat him as a girl but equally he says he is genuinely happy to remain as a man biologically. this has caused great confusion for him though he is absolutely happy. I want to know more so I can help inform him about it. I don’t want to change him, I really like this about him. Just want info on what this means. ",AskLGBT
Coming out as trans with a family?,"Hi everyone! I've never posted in this community before, so please let me know if this post is not appropriate.

So I was just reading this nice [article on Upworthy titled, ""My wife surprised her coworkers when she came out as trans. Then they surprised her""](http://www.upworthy.com/my-wife-surprised-her-coworkers-when-she-came-out-as-trans-then-they-surprised-her). In short, a Zoe's first day at work as a trans woman, her whole office surprised her with a ton of support for her transition.

My question is on the first paragraph:
&gt; My wife, Zoe, is transgender. She came out to us — the kids and me — last summer and then slowly spread her beautiful feminine wings with extended family, friends, and neighbors.

Pre-transition, this family was cis-male + cis-female + children. Now it's currently trans-female + cis-female + children. Wouldn't this have to involve a ""double coming out"" or something.

1. Transition from cis-male to trans-female
2. Cis-female wife now being intimately attracted to another woman (trans-female)?

Or, in other words, does one person coming out as trans compel the other person to come out as lesbian/gay or bisexual? If not, won't the original cis-female wife be unattracted to the trans-female wife?

-----
Disclaimer: I hope I don't have to write this, but I'm pro-LGBT rights and a big proponent of ""whatever makes you happy"". *I'm truly just trying to learn and understand more about this situation*. Clearly this family made it work, and I'm happy for them. 

I'm just wondering if it can be reasonable to expect all cis-wives to be accepting of a husband transitioning to a female. 
",AskLGBT
"Always change my feelings after orgasming, bi/questioning","So I grew up thinking I was straight, never having any attraction towards men. But from an early age I liked butt play, putting fingers up there and everything. It felt so good. For a long time I felt really guilty after I played with my ass and orgasmed, like it was dirty, but I think that was as a result of having been brought up around people with a negative view of lgbt. 

Now I have kicked that guilty feeling and enjoy the whole process. I am still very attracted to women, and not to men, their bodies just don't do it for me. The thing is, I really like other men's penises, and I quiver and get hard just thinking about taking a nice, hard dick in my ass. I want to try it sometime, but I don't find the rest of the male body attractive at all. Sometimes when I am really horny I go on tinder, switch it to men, and try to find a guy to match with and fuck. But as soon as I climax, I am overcome with this feeling of being repulsed by men. I think since I only like men sexually, once that desire is quenched, everything else about them just seems unattractive. 

I don't know what to do :( ",AskLGBT
Any advice on connecting with my younger 21 yr old brother that came out on Christmas ?,"He won’t make eye contact, or play video games , or work on cars , or laugh at my jokes . He doesn’t add me on Snap or return my texts. I gave him the hugest hug and teared up when came out for how brave he was and how honest with our huge family he was.


Dude, it’s breaking my heart my co-pilot won’t let me in.",AskLGBT
BF is trying hard to convince me into an open relationship but I don't want it.,,AskLGBT
Have you ever fallen in love with a straight person of the same gender? How did it turn out?,,AskLGBT
Is it okay for lesbians to use the word faggot or vice versa with the word dyke,,AskLGBT
Because of a strange conversation with a friend- how do you define bisexuality?,"To start with, I'm bisexual. Specifically hetero-romantic. I was able to finally embrace that aspect of myself two years ago and came out shortly after to most of the people in my life.

I've lucked out. All of my friends were super accepting of it and supportive. And even though I've yet to have an experience with a guy- and may never, as it's not a priority for me- I'm proud to be able to say it. I'm not straight, not gay... bisexual.

And this is where one of my closest friends comes in.

I remember back before I came out, she (a bisexual women) had made a strange comment that I had kind of brushed off because at the time I was still wrestling with my sexuality. It came up again the other day and started an argument that got rather heated.

See, she was a member of the LGBT Center at the college we went to, and apparently what they teach there (and the further we got into this debate the more she emphasized that she was taught this by an LGBT group) is that bisexual people are both straight and gay.

Before, I thought it was odd. Now, I found it kind of insulting. It took me 26 years to be able to say I'm not straight, and now she's saying I still am? I didn't emphasize the issue I had with it because I didn't want her to think I was getting too emotional about the topic, but eventually she just decided the argument was over and she was too frustrated. I even looked it up in front of her to see if that was a view that was held anywhere, and I can't find a thing.

So I wanted to take a pulse on the LGBT community on here. Is this a common view? Is it a strange local quirk? Is it a very weird case of bi erasure? I don't even know if I'm going to bring this up to her again, but at the very least if she brings it up again I want to be better educated on it, so I can either just accept it or properly explain to her why she's mistaken.",AskLGBT
Having problems with differences in income,"Alt-account, because my boyfriend knows my username.

&amp;nbsp;

My boyfriend and I have been together for the past two years, and we truly love each other. He makes almost 8 times more money than I do, which had never a problem since I make decent money too, but recently he has learned that I am still paying my student loan, and we have spent the last weeks fighting nonstop because he wants to pay it for me, and not in a million years will I expect or want that. I have two jobs in order to share bills 50/50 - each one of us transfers half of the total amount to a shared account, and whatever is left is ours to spend as we want without having to ask permission to each other. In my country, most banks will give you twice as long to pay the loan as you spent in college, so in my case 8 years, since I took a 4 year course. I've already paid 5 of these and have 3 more years to go, and we don't intend on getting married before this, so it's not like he's thinking of my financial situation because of that, and I still have some money to spend on other things after everything is paid. He says he doesnt want me to have two jobs and that he would prefer I spend more time with him, which I can understand, but then from my side I'd feel terrible not paying for my half, so quitting my second job or sharing bills proportionally to our wages is not something I'd be willing to do, either.

&amp;nbsp;
 
Help?",AskLGBT
How do I tell my roomie (who hasn’t come out yet) that I know he’s fucking all those guys he brings home and that I have no problem at all?,"I just came home to him running naked to his room and maybe we can avoid this kind of situations if he tells me beforehand that he’s bringing someone in.

Edit: grammar",AskLGBT
Why is there such a high percentage of trans people in the computer science field?,"It seems that almost every trans person I talk to is majoring in computer science, programming, software development, etc. And a lot of the famous trans people I know about (who aren't models/actors) are in the tech field. I'm trans, and I'm.....also doing programming. Anyone have any ideas why this is?",AskLGBT
"Im a fellow lesbian, how did you guys meet and eventually date other girls in your area?",,AskLGBT
Am I bisexual if I date someone with they/them pronouns?,"I’m a (straight, I think) male and they were born as a biological female. They don’t have a gender and they go by they/them pronouns. If I were to date them, would that make me bisexual?

It’s not like I’m trying to avoid being bi or anything, of course. I just don’t know :/

Thanks!",AskLGBT
"If someone uses they/them pronouns, would you use plural verb forms to refer to them?","As in, when referring to a single person, is it ""they are a nice person"" or ""they is a nice person""? The former sounds more natural but the latter is more correct I'd think",AskLGBT
I'm not exactly sure if I'm ADHD or battling the most toxic people in the world,"I am dependent on ADHD medication and I guess you can be both gay and ADHD, but I always needed antidepressants to go with it and my libido came back (interested in women) but without antidepressants I'm just eccentric which my older brother claims is homosexuality (because he is most likely) yet I only find myself wanting to sleep with women? Anytime I try to take my stimulant meds without antidepressants I'm like the most angry person in the world and want to lash out at my family. They are either suppressing my sexuality because my older brother is stuck in the closet or I am in fact gay and don't realize it (yet never was interested in sleeping or getting with men). thank you for the input, not exactly sure what to do but work with my psych",AskLGBT
I don't know,"Hello, throwaway for obvious reasons here. Let's start with this: I'm a male minor (highschool) with a girlfriend and I'm going through a rough patch right now with some mild depression and anxiety, and I'm questioning my sexuality right now. Maybe I'm confused, but I was thinking about how I've been attracted to females and feminine looking people, but not people who look masculine. Not sure what to think, I think I'm straight but I'm not sure, I just like girlly or feminine people. Thanks",AskLGBT
"Participate in research examining sexual relationships, communication, and sexual health from Carleton University!",,AskLGBT
Not sure if I want to or can try to Cross-dress,"I'm heterosexual. I'm male and I have an interest only in girls. I started thinking about seriously buying my first supplies for the first time, but that was last week. Since, I've reconsidered and now I don't feel like I should. I tried to find the answer myself but I can't hammer it out.

It sounds like it feels right. I’ve often felt I’d be more fitting as a girl. Male fashion is disinteresting. Also, as a teen I've had fantasies of crossdressing or gender-bending.

Right now, I live an empty social life. My Mom expects me to work so I can get good grades. She's been at it since high school, so I never really had any friends. 

I'm not sure, but I think what finally brought me here was that maybe, If I CD'ed, I'd be a new person and would be able to socialize properly. I've realized the problems associated with it are real, and any newfound confidence is not guaranteed.

I don't know whether I could even put forth enough effort or even enjoy it. I'm a College Freshman, still friendless, and I'm not thriving. Luckily, I do live in a liberal environment and would feel at home. I have 5 problems that I'm not sure about.

1) It's expensive and requires a lot of stuff. I've planned out my first outfit and it already costs upward of $50. I'm already spending 80% of my budget on food. Also, there's so many accessories and clothes involved, I wouldn't be able to hide them if my Mom visits.

2) About my Mom. I've blessed to belong to a culture that supports hyper-heteronormativity. To make things worse, it's also culture that creates women like my Mom who are both jobless, friendless, and reliant on me for all emotional needs. She's hyper-religious, but my religion has fair codes for CD'ers. But it's not like she'd know. I'm afraid of being rejected by her. Since I don't have friends, then I'd really be alone. My Father will support me, but not her. She simply lacks the life experience to come to any rational conclusion.

3) My academic situation inhibits it. I was so ready to try it this week, but my mother has me visit her almost every week. I'm very happy that she'd drive for miles, but it also dampers my free-time. Also, I'm not sure about how I'm performing in College. I was an ace in high school, so my parents want me back in my hometown if I fail. Right now, I've put forth serious effort to improve, but I don't know if I can remain living by myself. I know if I do go back home, I'd have no chance. 

Also, I live in student living with hyper-masculine roommates. I don't interact with them at all, but I'm afraid that they'll treat me worse if they find out.

4) I'm afraid of not ever passing. Lots of women say that you shouldn't care if you do or don't, but I'm already afraid that I'm going to look hideous. I feel like my confidence is already weak and I'm not sure I should do it. Even if all i need is practice and advice, I'm in no place to keep on buying more supplies, nor to solicit advice. I personally don't care about passing per se, but I don't want to be someone who singles herself out.

5) My parent's culture. My entire design for life is to get a job so Mom can find me a mate. My father wants out, so no matter what, after these 4-6 years I'll be a family man with 2+ dependents. If I don't, I won't ever get a match, and be blacklisted from my entire family tree. 

If anyone knows a little more, or has been in my situation, I need your advice.",AskLGBT
What in your opinion is the best LGBTQ related song?,,AskLGBT
Lesbians and cats?,"I'm female, asexual (mostly attracted to men but I've had my fair share of crushes on women), a cat lover to the bone and I'm curious, where does the stereotype that all lesbians love cats come from? Is it a part of your identity / culture?",AskLGBT
Are septum piercings part of queer culture?,"I'm not queer but want to get a septum piercing. I realized that everyone I know who has one is queer. It's also quite common in punk/hardcore communities I'm in. What I'm wondering is would it be disrespectful/ an invasion of queer culture if I got one? I asked some of my friends (who are queer and some of whom have septum piercings) and they didn't seem to know. I looked it up and couldn't really find anything either. 

EDIT: basically would it be disrespectful for a non-queer person to get a septum piercing?",AskLGBT
"I'm bisexual in the bedroom, but straight otherwise. I can't shake the doubt that I'm suppressing romantic feelings towards men.","I'm a man, 27 years old. 

About when I turned 20 I started becoming more accepting and comfortable with the fact I was into both men and women. Due to my moderately religious upbringing, I had been insisting to myself that I was straight as an arrow, which I now realize never was the case. 

Though, at the time I found it odd that I only felt attracted to men sexually, not romanticly. For example, I've never had a crush on a guy or been in love with a guy. At the time I figured that it may be a process, that maybe I was suppressing romantic feelings toward men and that reflex would wear off eventually now that I was more accepting of the idea. I'd just relax, wait and see and explore this new realm of possibilities.

It's now 7 years later and little has changed. When it comes to sex I'm up for anything, basically. And when it comes to love and romance I've still only been interested in women. Sex is very much a factor in romance for me, but when it comes to men I'm only interested in casual sex. 

I feel fairly relaxed that ""hey that's just how it works for me"". But sometimes I still wonder if I'm just kidding myself, even after all this soulsearching. I'm not really sure what I'm asking or what replies I'm expecting. Is this common, I guess? Am I overthinking this and this all is just my usual self-doubting never giving me a break like it always does in all aspects of my life?

Thanks, and sorry for the wall of text.

TL;DR: I'm bisexual, but only consider myself romanticly attracted to women. Is it possible that I'm just kidding myself, or is this just how some people are?",AskLGBT
My sexuality,"I’ve always been straight, but I want to know if someone can be attracted to men and women but only romantically with men. I know I’m not sexually attracted to guys but I wasn’t exactly uncomfortable with everything else up to that point. My two conclusions are either I’m straight and really comfortable with myself or I’m bisexual but not sexually attracted to guys. Or if I’m just subconsciously looking for validation from people idk",AskLGBT
Am I good enough for hrt?,I’m 5’9 and weigh 160 pounds. Is that a good height and weight for hrt and how do you think it would effect my body?,AskLGBT
What am I?,"I’m (21m) attracted to women in a sexual way, but can’t really feel a spark with them. I’m also attracted to some men and get butterflies about it and I don’t know if it’s because I’m scared or if it’s what I like. I also feel very feminine and sort of get butterflies when I think about being a girl. Sometimes I want to dress as a girl and I enjoy feeling like a girl. I’m just so confused and would like some advice. I’m very unhappy with myself and want to figure out who I really am.",AskLGBT
Androsexual dating a nonbinary,"So ive had this stuck in my mind a while.
is someone identifies as androsexual (sexually attracted to men) and they start dating someone who is nonbinary or in any way genderqueer (that represented mostly male), is there an appropriate reaction to finding out they have a biologically female body? like wouldnt that effect the relationship? ",AskLGBT
A Question,"So me and my sorta friend, who's pan (I'm straight, if that matters) were talking about the different LGBT flags. I said that I liked the straight ally flag. She said that we don't deserve to have a flag because all we're doing is being decent people. I kinda felt hurt, it felt like she was making me into a homophobic person, which I definitely am not. But the point is, I felt like that's like saying you shouldn't have a bisexual or pan or gay or lesbian or whatever flag because you're just being yourself. Could some of you people give me some thoughts on this? I just like the flag because it represents the fact that people who are straight can support people in the LGBT community. 

Thanks!!",AskLGBT
What the Hell am I?,"Apologies if any of this is TMI, but I'm not sure what all to include

I (29F) know that I experience sexual and romantic attraction, but actually having sex has always been kinda weird for me.  I definitely prefer masturbation over having a partner, even though I've desired many people.  I can't cum from receiving blowjobs, which was an issue in a prior relationship.  I don't know how much of this is related to dysphoria vs. sexual preferences or orientation.  I was addicted to porn for a long time before realizing I'm trans, at which point my desires almost immediately plummeted.  My porn consumption further fell while on finasteride, and I've stopped watching it altogether since starting HRT.  I've been pretty happy about this, and was ecstatic when my penis could no longer become turgid, whether from arousal or the need to urinate (even that first pee in the morning!), but lately it's returned somewhat and I'm becoming frustrated

I'm attracted to multiple genders, though not with the same frequency or intensity (those seem to vary inversely).  As far as genitals go, I've never found vaginas arousing, but penises can sometimes be nice if I'm into the person.  I *really* like an androgynous appearance, especially something like [this](https://i.pinimg.com/736x/06/eb/fc/06ebfc30aeafdfee51d2a4cb4dc59653--androgynous-people-androgynous-style.jpg)

Oh, and I haven't had sex in years.  Even when I would watch porn almost constantly, I never thought it was a big deal to go without sex, though I did need some release.  It feels pretty liberating to not even need that anymore.  Regarding porn, it was always pretty soft: I liked partial clothing, like erotic outfits, and just seeing people being intimate.  Anne Rice novels are even better, being pretty much the epitome of sexy for me",AskLGBT
"Participate in research examining sexual relationships, communication, and sexual health from Carleton University!",,AskLGBT
Why am I so confused with my sexuality?,"So I'm 24 years old, male. I grew up relatively privileged on the East Coast to a loving family. I was pretty shy and antisocial from ages 9-15, but remained pretty popular and social then on. From an early age, I found all things sexual to be really taboo - nothing really openly discussed in my household and my parents kept it pretty traditional.

In my head, I constantly compared myself to others and quickly found myself lacking the confidence to have sex or intimacy of any sort, fearing that I was going to perform poorly and embarrass myself. I was literally 17 years old, fearing that I was too old to learn sex, yet had no one to talk to this about, because I found sexuality so taboo. It literally took me 21 years to allow myself to have any true intimacy beyond making out.

Somewhere around freshmen year of college, I came to the conclusion that I was gay. I was always more interested in the male body, but only pictured myself with women and liked the idea of being with a woman over a man.

It was around 22 that I came out to my parents. Although I did it rather poorly (via text), their reaction was not great, regardless (they told me it was okay to go back to liking women if I want). Moreover, I told several friends and they reacted greatly, which was good. That being said, I never was fully convinced I was 100% homosexual. 

After college, I felt a fresh start was necessary, so I moved out west. Despite developing a solid, trusting, and open group of friends, and I'm presumably straight to all (I come off very masculine as well).

While slow, I eventually began to explore being with men, mostly sticking to casual hookups and a lot of dates. I never left the dates feeling like I could picture myself with a man, even in the short term. I feel like I am only able to build fraternal, friend-like bonds with men, while I feel like I am able to connect on a more intimate psychological level with women (if that makes any sense).

In all past attempts to try being intimate with females, I suffer some stage fright...it works, just takes a bit longer. However, I feel like everything is working in my mind, aside from my d*** not getting up.

Anyway, now I find myself incredibly attracted to a female friend of mine. There is a ton of sexual tension between the two of us, and I want to have sex with her, but fear impotence will creep up on me once more, ruining all. 

I'm sorry - I'm not entirely sure what I'm asking here. I have no issues with homosexuality, and I feel I am homosexual, but I also feel like my attraction to men is only physical, while my attraction to women is mental.
",AskLGBT
"Guys, I'm super confused on things.","Ok, so I'm thinking that I'd like to be a guy. I like how guys are perceived and would like to be perceived that way, and remove my boobs. But I'd still like guys, and would still like to be a girl in sexual situations. How was this for you guys? Did you want to be the other gender fully and sexually? And how did you know you wanted to be it, that it wasn't just a whim?",AskLGBT
Struggling in America,"I’m a female , and I’m also not a part of the LGBT community. So I do accept  the fact that I may not be the best person to speak on this. However I do want to actually get some insight on the topic, because I ran into a conflict with one of my friends. 

So my friend on campus tells me she is planning on setting up an lgbt program for the residents at our college. Then I asked her what made her want to do that (she’s never spoken about lgbt issues before). Then she said because they are struggling, so then I asked “how are they struggling ?” , now at the time that I asked this question I didn’t realize how that may have come off but i honestly asked it from the perspective of genuinely wondering how they are struggling at least in the scope of America. However,  after i asked this question she got angry and went off on a rant. 

At the time I wasn’t thinking about Middle Eastern and Caribbean countries. I was thinking of the attitudes towards the LGBT community in America and in that scope from what I’ve seen they are celebrated, they have a privilege that gay people in other countries don’t have, and that is to say that they are gay or identify with a sexual orientation other than being straight. They can be flamboyant and be who they desire to be . They dominate make up and fashion industries. So when I asked how they are struggling , all of that was going through my brain. 

In the Caribbean men cannot even say that they’re gay or they fear for their life. If anyone even thinks that they may possibly be gay they could be killed. I’m not saying that this has never ever happened in America but it’s not a widespread fear that gays have in America. I know this because my husband is from the Bahamas and he’s told me stories of the attitudes in that area. 

Trans people are the only group that come to mind when I actually think of someone who is a part of the LGBT community going through a true struggle. Trans women and men more often then not end up in situations where they fear for their life based on their identity. 

However, from what I can see being gay lesbian or bisexual, in America in todays society is more so celebrated than demonized. The most that they may have to deal with is someone judging them or someone possibly making fun of them. In other countries these people that are part of the LGBT community are not worried about people making fun of them for being gay , they are  worried about people finding out that they are gay in the first place because they know they could possibly get killed or seriously harmed. 

Once again I’m not a part of the LGBT community so I understand that some of you reading this may disregard everything I’m saying just based on that one fact. 
I’m not a ignorant person who just stands strong to my opinions and never actually wants to be educated on something that I may not know. I’m always open to hearing other perspectives and I can accept that my perspective may be off. ",AskLGBT
Help a college student conducting a survey on LBGTQ+ social media usage?,"Hi all! I'm an undergraduate student at the Univesity of Colorado Boulder and I'm conducting a small research study for my Information Science class on how people who identify as LGBTQ+ use social media. If you're willing to donate a few minutes of your time to help with my project, please follow the link below. Any and all input is greatly appreciated!

Survey link:
https://goo.gl/forms/ysIVuJV5CXhFnKjl2

Since I'm aware that sometimes people worry about how this information will be used, here's a little bit of background: 
I'm doing this as part of a semester-long project that is meant to teach us about various data collection methods. Your answers will be completely anonymous. Also, the findings will only be used for educational purposes and won't be published in any public research papers.",AskLGBT
In a relationship but may be falling for someone else... (x/offmychest),"Hi everyone. Please prepare for a stream of consciousness that will likely make little to no sense:

I'm currently in a 3-year relationship with a guy that I am very emotionally attached to. However, I met a guy this year who's the literal definition of perfect. The moment I saw him, I was blown away; I've expressed these feelings to him, and it turns out he's really into me as well. We're in the same grad program, have nearly all the same interests outside of class, and we just mesh really well in general.

I eventually came clean to my boyfriend and told him I was developing feelings for this other guy. To my surprise, my boyfriend told me I should hook up with him to get it out of my system. So, I asked this other guy what he thought (explaining I had a bf, etc.), and we ended up going through with it. The only problem was that the sex was the best I've ever had *by far*.

I've been trying to talk myself down out of these feelings (e.g. - I only just met him, only know the good but not the bad or the ugly, etc.), but it's just not working. I'm beginning to wonder what I should do at this point, because the solution might not be to stay with my current bf; he and I are extremely different, which I know is good, but meeting someone so similar to me is wholly refreshing and intriguing.

Another complication: I'm not graduating for over a year, and this guy is graduating at the end of this semester, so there's a chance we might not even see each other again.

I just don't know what to do. People are saying ""stay with your bf,"" but I don't want to feel like I'm settling or anything.

Help please!",AskLGBT
Friend recently told me she’s bicurious...,"I’m a gay man, have no idea about this stuff, and want to be helpful and a good support to her. Can anyone point me in the way of some good resources to help her out? She’s only confided in me, but I feel very naive!

I am much better with this stuff when male friends have come out as gay to me, not so much now!

Thank you, any help is appreciated.",AskLGBT
"How can I [M 26] win back my long-distance friend [F 21, queer] &amp; her trust?","I met a girl online on a forum. We liked each other, she gave me her phone number and we started chatting via WhatsApp. I developed feelings for her. After several months I told her that I fell for her and asked her if we could meet in person and maybe go on a date to see if we click. She said that there is nothing straight about her and she does not date guys, but she feels sorry for me and that we can still be platonic soulmates. I suspected that she lied or trolled and that she wanted to friendzone me and just keep me for attention.

I would rather cut ties than be friendzoned if she lied to me about the reason of her rejection. But if she told the truth about not being into guys, then I still wanted to be her friend.

I thought if she was telling the truth about being gay, then I could comfortably continue being her friend. But if she lied to me, then I wanted to cut ties and stop chatting. I had to find out.

I started snooping her forum posts to see what she wrote about her sexuality. I eventually found her Tumblr blog which confirmed that she is not straight, and she was telling the truth all that time.

But my ""research"" made her feel uncomfortable, and she said that the stuff I did is unforgivable. Now she doesn't want to be my friend anymore, even though I want it. How can I fix my mistakes?

I know that she did not lie to me about the reason why she didn't want to date.

She blocked me on WhatsApp, we argued on the forum. We've been arguing a lot. Lately she told me: ""The stuff you did is unforgivable. I think leaving each other alone is the only way we can make peace.""

We are from different countries/cultures which I think also contributed to our mutual excessive suspiciousness.

My country is less LGBT-friendly than her country, and I was not raised in a culture which teaches men how to treat non-straight women. I was confused, I never fell for a lesbian before.

How can I ask for forgiveness and win her platonic friendship back?

TL,DR:

I thought a girl was trolling when she said she was not into guys when I asked her out on a date. She said we could still be friends. I didn't want to continue being friends if she lied, but I wanted if she told the truth. I googled, found her blog about sexuality. She told the truth. But now she is pissed at me for not trusting her right away and causing a lot of drama. She blocked me, we argued. Can we reconcile? How to win her back as my friend?",AskLGBT
"Questioning but afraid I'm still being ""that"" cis person","Throwaway account because my friends are redditors.

I am a 24 year old cis female and for most of my life I have identified as straight. Recently I've started to be attracted to some women. I guess you could call me panromantic. HOWEVER, I don't have any interest in a romantic relationship that is not also sexual, and I am not sexually interested in anyone that does not have a penis. So basically I'm interested in anyone with a penis regardless of their gender identity, but I feel like a douche bag for it. I absolutely believe that no one should be defined by their genitals and that genitals do not determine gender. I feel like by only being attracted to those with penises I'm essentially reducing people to their genitals and it feels disrespectful. Advice?

Edit: Changed some wording to a way that doesn't assume what genitals a trans person may have.",AskLGBT
What question do you hate hearing the most about being gay or lesbian?,,AskLGBT
Looking for the right term,"I'm a cis-male who normally would consider myself heterosexual.  However, the more I think about it, I'm also attracted to trans-women.  So I guess I'm attracted to the outward presentation of femininity.  Does that still make me heterosexual or is there a more specific term?",AskLGBT
Would like to learn more.,"I do not belong to the LGBT community, so I would like to know, what are you most afraid of in this community?",AskLGBT
I have some questions about how gay people are depicted in fiction.,"1. Isn't it kind of offensive to the LGBT community how these people are depicted as stereotypes? I am straight so maybe I am just ignorant, but I feel like, if I was gay, I would be offended that the gay characters are always some side character that gives relationship advice to the straight main characters. I feel bad that this is how the majority of gay characters are treated.
2. How do people in the LGBT community feel about straight/cis-gender actors portraying LGBT characters? Wouldn't that be offensive? Again, I think I am misunderstanding something because I am not LGBT. Sorry if I come across as ignorant.",AskLGBT
Is there anything I should know before going to a queer wedding?,"This week, two great friends of mine are getting married to each other. They're a lesbian couple. This is the first time I go to a same sex wedding ceremony and, although I'm bi myself, I'm not that familiar with the LGBT community yet. Is there anything that makes it different from a straight marriage I should be aware of? Anything I should (or shouldn't) say or do?",AskLGBT
i want to be a gay guy,"i am a female in my teen years. i have been struggling with my sexuality identity for a couple years now. i am definetely attracted to guys, but i cannot see myself in a sexual or romantic relationship with a guy. this has lead me to believe that i am asexual and aromantic. but i am not 100% sure. recently i have been almost envying guys because i love their fashion and i want to have short hair. I have realised i want to be a gay guy??? maybe it is problematic because the gay ""lifestyle"" has been kind of glamorized by the media so maybe that's why i want to be a gay guy? i have no idea. But if i imagine myself as a male being with another male, it doesn't disgust and disturb me as much. ",AskLGBT
What's a good LGBT activism group?,"So I've been giving money to the HRC for a while now, and they've gradually been getting more and more on my nerves. I'm looking to get spammed with information about LGBT related issues and activism opportunities, but they keep spamming me with things that have **nothing** to do with LGBT anything. Stuff like,

&gt;BREAKING: Trump threatened 75,000+ LGBTQ Dreamers! Join HRC in protecting DACA

and

&gt;Now is the time to stand up &amp; speak out against gun violence.

I'm trying to support a group for LGBT rights, not one for every liberal cause imaginable. FFS, I agree with what they're trying to preach and it's still annoying as hell. 

I'm looking for a group similar to the HRC that won't try to push random shit as inherently LGBT related issues. I see this stuff as super unproductive, and just want to know if there's a place where my money will go towards what I expect it to go towards. Thanks in advance!",AskLGBT
As a parent of a lesbian teen I would like to ask other adult lesbians what they wish their parents had done differently for them growing up.,,AskLGBT
Do trans people argue that gender is biological?,"I'm kind of confused about the LGBQT argument on gender. On the one hand, many say gender is a social construct not tied to biology. We should be able to fluidly move between genders. But then I hear trans people saying that their gender is tied to biology, which justifies why getting sexual reassignment surgery should be covered by insurance. 

What's the reconciliation of this seeming contradiction? Sorry if I'm not coming across as respectful. Thanks

Personally, as a CIS male, I am receptive to the gender is a construct argument. I have somewhat of a post-modernist streak, so I would argue ""sex"" - which some people defined differently than gender - is also a social construct. I always thought this was the LGBQT position, but then I ran into this article and it confused me: https://thinkprogress.org/endocrine-society-transgender-health-coverage-4e0dfc96c652/?utm_content=buffer4dcd1&amp;utm_medium=social&amp;utm_source=facebook.com&amp;utm_campaign=buffer
",AskLGBT
Why is the LGBT community so obsessed with labels,Why can't we just forget about labeling people and like the people we do. Why do we need to make things so complicated.,AskLGBT
Is there a non-gendered equivalent of Sir/Ma'am?,I work in the service industry and therefore address people formally. Is there any equivalent I could use to remain respectful and formal in a fine dining environment without using sir or ma'am? What would you like to be called in those situations?,AskLGBT
Is sexual attraction about genetilia?,"

 Sooooo, as a straight(-ish) cisbrown brosef, I would easily date a transwoman post-op , but I'm not completely sure if I would  pre-op. I've never been opposed to idea of dating anyone, but I'm not sure if I am universally sexually attracted to both peeens or vegeens. So I wonder, is sexuality almost completely dictated by  what flops(or doesn't) out of someone's groin?And is it possible that this is cultural??? And if so ,what does it mean to be gay or lesbian or straight?? What does it mean to be any gender, if at the end of the day it boils down to personality difference, which happens between  people of the same gender too? 

DISCLAIMER: I KNOW THAT IT IS IMPORTANT TO BE ABLE TO IDENTIFY AS LGBTQ+ RIGHT NOW AND  THAT THE EXPERIENCES YOU HAVE ARE  DIFFERENT, RELEVANT AND IMPORTANT .Also sorry if the question is stupid, itd be nice if you could at least point me in the right direction.thank you, lovelies.",AskLGBT
I need help talking to my GF about my gender-fluidity,"Hey~
I've been with my girlfriend for almost 5 years now, we are both in our early 20s, and I'm having some trouble talking to her about my gender-fluidity. It's not like the entire thing would catch her off guard, since she's known that I'm pansexual and that I can be rather femme. I really enjoy wearing femme fashions and occasionally I speak and act a bit more femme as well. Sometimes it really doesn't seem like she minds, and sometimes she even has me try femme clothing/makeup on. I think she doesn't mind it in private and on rare occasions, but the more often I dress or act more femme, the less she appears to like it. I'm starting to feel like I'm more comfortable and honest with myself when I look/act femme, and I definitely feel more confident in my body and style... I don't think she likes the confidence that I receive from embracing my femininity, because to her, it likely feels like she's losing her boyfriend. I can't really blame her either, we've been a very hetero-normative couple for our entire 5 years together. She is also a queer person (probably pansexual) and she loves other queer people, myself included. I just don't think she's attracted to this part of me, and I see it causing issues for us down the road, as I seek to embrace my femininity more. I really don't want to lose her, but I can't force her to love me and be with me like nothing's different. I could really use some advice... Thank you guys &lt;3",AskLGBT
coming out as agender,"okay, so i don't really know how to come out, but i really really want to so people use my name and stuff. i already came out to my boyfriend, my parents and my sister but without mentioning i'd like to go by a different name because i have really bad social anxiety. i'd also love to come out at school but i don't really have any close friends or potential allies if things don't go too well. i mean recently a friend came out to me as gay and he said i'm the only person at my school who knows so i offered to be there when he needs someone to talk, but him being an ally for me feels like so much to ask from him because we're not too close. i also don't know how stuff would be about bullying, i have a lot of experience with bullying probably due to being autistic and people just notice i'm somewhat ""different"" and i don't know if i could handle going through all that bullying stuff again. if i do come out i'd probably do it through text. we have a whatsapp group with all the 11th graders and i thought about writing it in there, maybe when i have two weeks off school so i don't have everyone coming to me the next day. for the teachers i thought about just writing them an e-mail, but i don't feel that the teachers would be a problem anyway. firstly i'd probably tell my boyfriend, then my closer family and then hopefully my school. but how do i overcome my anxiety? how do i handle bad comments/bullying? do you think i should get an ally?",AskLGBT
"Non-binary people living in countries which use patronymics and matronymics, how do you approach that part of your name?","Just something that tripped my curiosity. Scottish Gaelic names use Mac for ""son of"" and Nic for ""daughter of"", usually just limited to Mac regardless of gender in English-speaking areas, but I've never heard a neutral or non-binary equivalent. I'm also familiar with a few cases of transgender Icelanders switching from -son to -dottir or vice versa, but that doesn't address those who don't want to use either of those.",AskLGBT
Okay... Where am i on the gender spectrum?,"Hi there, sorry if this is the workforce subreddit... If so please direct me to a more a appropriate one, thank you :)


TRIGGER WARNING: EXPLICIT DISCRIPTIONS 

So, normally I would identify straight off the bat as a gay male (or should I say ""gay"" off the bat 😉😉). However in the last 6 months or so I've been noticing some things about myself in regards to how I feel about my gender like, I feel more comfortable being referred to as they/ them, I find thinking/feeling that being just male is a bit restrictive and finally most importantly somedays I feel more masculine and others more feminine (this being reflected in the way I act and how I choose to express myself with clothes). 

However what's led me to make this post is something else which has come to life... While exploring more my sexuality, Ive found that on my more feminine days I wish I had vigina and that I could touch myself there.... And I find it that I want to kinda play with that area where my balls are/just under there. And the prospect of being fuck, not in the asshole but in something else (which I can only assume would be a vigina, I can't quite discribe the feeling in words) is really appealing. 

Then on my more masculine days I'll revert to wanting to have traditionally 'gay sex' 

Anyways that's that I think I might be gender fluid ? Or what else do you think this maybe down to ? 

Let me know and feel free to AMA 

Xxx",AskLGBT
"Asexul People who have an SO, how did you get together?",,AskLGBT
"I read that ""commitment ceremonies"" are traditionally for those who can't legally marry, do I have any right to call my straight, cis, ceremony that?","This could be a silly (long winded) question but the word popped up in a search I was doing and I liked it immediately. You don't have to know much about it, I appreciate opinions as well as facts :)

I hope to have an intimate ceremony, ideally just my fiancé and I. 
Afterwards I want to celebrate with our large families and friend groups, have a hand fasting ceremony, and liked the idea of that celebration being called our commitment ceremony, since we would already be legally married long before this party. 
I am bi/pan but don't feel like I've lived that outwardly enough to speak for the community, if that makes any sense haha
Anyway, to sum up: I love words, cherish their meanings and origin, so I wouldn't want to tarnish the word in any way. I don't want to take a word that isn't mine. 

Thanks! ",AskLGBT
I don't know if I'm straight/gay/bi and it has been causing me a great deal of anxiety for years [25m],"Whenever the subject of my (lack of) relationships or my personal preferences about a partner come up, I feel sick. Being anything other than straight really causes me anxiety and makes me feel worthless and embarrassed. I don't know if I'm barking up the wrong tree by posting in this sub, but I know that I'm not the only person who could be going through something like this. 
For reference, I lost my virginity and had my first girl friend when I was 23 years old, and that was a mostly long distance relationship that ended after a year and a half. 

It's driving me crazy that I feel like this and I don't know what to do about it. I'm afraid to come to terms with the fact that I might not be straight, and feel to shameful about it to want to pursue happiness in it.",AskLGBT
A question about asexuality,"Do you have an inability to have sex or do you just not like to? Like is it possible for you to be aroused or does the idea repulse you?

Basically, if you were in a relationship with someone who was not ace, would you be able to be intimate up to a point or does anything past kissing make you uncomfortable? ",AskLGBT
I need some help,"I'm bisexual and a closet transgender girl, and even though i am LGBT, i dont really visit that many LGBT forums or sites, and as such i don't know that much about the rest of the community. So i was just wondering if anybody could help educate me on any words/terms that i should or shouldn't use. I don't want to risk triggering anybody bc i hate making people mad or offended.",AskLGBT
Confused with no straight answers.,"OK so I need help. For a while, I forced myself into relationships with boys because that was the norm. I hadn't even heard of anything LGBT because my dad sheltered my life for a while. But then I learned. Now, years later I'm more confused than ever. So I'm very complicated. Guys are cool and all, but I don't really think they are anything past cute or good-looking. I'm absolutely disgusted by heterosexual s*x and I could never and I mean NEVER even attempt it. Like male bodies aren't appealing to me. I find woman more attractive and more desirable. I prefer them over men. I don't know what category I would fall under though. I'm really confused if I'm gay or bisexual because I like guys in like a crush/puppy love type of style. I just feel stronger with girls. Please help me I'm so lost and my parents aren't the...best people to refer to. ",AskLGBT
am i aro/ace,"i get freaked out and disgusted when people call me ""cute"" or something. I think ""just cut the bullshit and tell me what you want from me"". Flirting is very phoney and tiring. Romance in general is. I would love to be in a relationship where me and my so are best friends. But none of that holding hand stuff. I also get turned on and find some people attractive, but i hate the idea of ME engaging in sexual activity. ",AskLGBT
"If a woman is sexually attracted to a (particular) pre-op transwoman (that just came out), but would not be sexually attracted to this transwoman post-op, is she, given she is also heterosexual, bisexual?","thanks!

edit: should have written ""also attracted to men"", instead of ""also heterosexual"".

edit2: why was my question downvoted? have I said something offensive?",AskLGBT
Is it normal to experience gender dysphoria a bit later?,"I'm a 20 year old man and for the past two years I've begun to experience what I believe to be gender dysphoria. It's like depression, which I experienced a lot when I was in high school due to my parents splitting up and having few friends, but I only feel it when I begin to think about how things could be different if I were a woman. As a matter of fact the only times I feel depressed now are when I think about it. I'm afraid to tell anyone about being possibly uncomfortable in my gender because when ever i read stories about gender dysphoria people frequently talk about how it was something they  had always felt and I'm not sure I did. When I think about how I felt about my gender as a kid I'm pretty sure I just remember thinking ""I'm a boy"" and when I thought about the way I dress I just tried to dress so no one would notice me. I don't ever remember wishing I could wear a dress or play with ""girl"" toys. I did always have long hair, from like age 12 to a couple of months ago. But I never thought of it as a ""girl"" thing. The only unique thing I guess would be that I've been playing almost exclusively as women in video games for 8 or 9 years whenever the option is available to me.

Sorry, I'm rambling. My point here is that I never felt it until I had graduated high school and had a lot of time to myself. I had felt weird about gender and sexuality for a reason and eventually found that I was bi, and I thought that was the reason I felt so strange. But at some point, maybe I watched a video of someone talking about their transition or something, I began to think about my own gender. And I wasn't entirely sure I felt like a man. Since then, which was about a year and a half ago, I have occasional ""episodes"" of what I think is dysphoria where I think about how I'll never been a woman and I'll never feel pretty and I just want to go to my room and cry. 

And that's another part of it. I hear frequently that dysphoria is constant and that they've had something like it since childhood but that's not the case for me. I'm not sure if I'm actually feeling it or if I'm just alone with my thoughts and misinterpreting my emotions. Like I just have too much free time and I've created this idea that I'm a woman trapped in a man's body. I'm too afraid to talk to someone in real life about this so I thought I'd ask the internet for their thoughts. 

*Sorry for how long-winded and ramble-y this post is.*",AskLGBT
how do you ask someone out when you live in a mostly homophobic city?,"hi I am a gay female person. also I am somewhat closeted. because I study in another city I am not out to my friends here. I don't feel like it is going to be a good experience, also not the safest. but now I have a crush on this girl who is a friend of my friends and you may guess where this is going... i have a feeling that she might be gay as well but i don't know how to approach the situation. do i ask my friends about her? but how will i do it without looking suspicious? do I just flat out ask the girl I like? what if she's straight and then all this good job I've been doing hiding goes to waste
i know it would be better to be out but the place i am living is not a good place to be out so that would be my last option",AskLGBT
"I most recently had a breakthrough in my self awareness, and now I need some help..","Lets see, I grew up like a lot of people, with a clear defined line in-between the genders.  Males do this, females do that.  Getting to where I am today is miraculous.  I come from a deeply religious family, but I always followed my heart, and now here I am.  So, in essence, my question follows this.  I am a male who has many female qualities.  I don't feel like a male, nor female, and I don't necessarily like being associated with either.  I've never explored this type of thing so I don't know what to think really, but I know I don't feel just male, or just female.  any advice on how i can pursue this question?  I'm also demi-sexual, and spiritually I can be attracted to both sexes, but physically only females. ",AskLGBT
How do I engage with my gender-queer siblings over their desire to converse with me about the woes of finding a partner?!,"Obligatory disclaimer: I'm a liberal, white male living in CA.

My sibling, whom I love and support deeply, periodically muses to me about how much they deserve and long for a romantic partner. They will tell me about the people who've solicited them/they've solicited, and the incredible specificity of qualifiers that the people didn't meet to measure up to their standards.

What, as a heterosexual white male, can I possibly say when my sibling engages me about this subject matter?! Everything I've ever said, however obviously supportive and allied with them, is shot down on the grounds that I could never understand or contribute to.",AskLGBT
Is there anyone out there who is happy with the sex they were born with but feel like they don't identify as the sex they were born with?,"I'm going to try my best in describing this, I don't mind labels, I guess I'm just looking for other people out there that feel the same or are the same and are happy, not looking to change. 

Basically I'm a female, I've had two children, I've breast fed. I would say I was a heterosexual tomboy, I prefer wearing shorts, trousers etc over skirts and dresses. I wear make up, but I don't put a lot of effort into my hair, make up, what I wear etc. I wear what is comfortable. I've been like this since forever. I'm happy with what I have.

However, I don't really associate/identify myself as a girl, lady or a woman, I know I'm a female. I watch lesbian porn sometimes, but I can't really imagine myself sleeping with a woman and if I did, it would be purely for sex as I can't imagine myself dating a woman and treating the relationship the same as I would with a man. I prefer males over female company, depending on the person (how we met, our hobbies and interests etc), I don't mind stereotypical-sexist-banter, if it's only banter and if they can handle reverse psychology that counteracts stereotypical males, and have a laugh. I'm really hands on, not afraid to get my hands dirty kind of person. ",AskLGBT
"Am Islamic, I feel disgust when I imagine homosexual acts, I can't lie to myself, so I'm searching for the reason of my disgust.",What is the path I can take to find out these answers?,AskLGBT
How Does Genderfluidity Not Contradict the Basic Premise of the LGBT+ Community?,"Let me explain. So based off of what I know one of the main premises/arguments for being gay, lesbian, etc. is that you were just born that way and it can't be changed. That makes sense and I understand that. So when you have people that claim to be ""genderfluid"" how does that not contradict that? If you can have people that can just change their gender/sexuality at will how can that argument still be valid?",AskLGBT
Advice for addressing wedding invitations? [xpost],"[xposted in r/lgbt]

Hi everyone! I'm a cis/het woman prepping wedding invitations to send out for my event later this year. We're using a formal style so everything is ""Mr. and Mrs."" but we also have numerous LGBT friends on the invitation list, both married couples and non. What would be the best way to address their invitations while still giving them the same respect and formality as the other invitees? I don't know an accepted plural version of ""Mr"" or ""Mrs"" to use - is there one? Would ""Mr. and Mr."" / ""Mrs. and Mrs."" work? ""Misters"" for our gay married friends? What should we use for our genderfluid invitees? What would YOU like to see on a wedding invitation you received?

Thanks in advance for your help!",AskLGBT
How do I tell if somebody is gender-fluid or non-binary?,I recently moved to a new area and I would like to not offend anybody by using the wrong pronouns. From what I have seen online and in person gender-fluid or non-binary people get called the wrong pronouns a lot. As a cisgender woman I have no experience with people calling me the wrong pronouns. I would like to know how I can tell what pronouns someone uses? (I don't mean to offend anyone),AskLGBT
"How do gay people feel about the ""other f-word"" being used as generic insults [Content note: slurs]","
By the ""other f-word"", I mean the homophobic slurs. Please note that I do not wish to offend anyone with this question. I just want to know how this is generally perceived within the gay community.

Although considered derogatory terms for gay men, it has become quite popular to use the terms ""fag"" and ""faggot"" as generic insults, not necessarily directed at gay people. There have even been derivative terms from this usage, for example ""furfag"" (insult for furries), ""faget"" (spacedicks terminology), ""ponyfag"" (insult for bronies), ""Eurofag"", etc.  

How does the gay community feel about such uses?",AskLGBT
"Pansexual trans man here, what options are there for international queer-friendly dating?","Even though I live in the age of well-known trans people like Caitlyn Jenner, I still have trouble meeting people who don't think me being trans is a huge dealbreaker, who aren't covered in the reddest of red flags. Dating long-distance/online is my best option either way, so I figure I might as well be open to dating outside the USA since I'm very interested in foreign cultures and languages anyway.

Does anybody here know any decent international dating sites for queer people, especially trans people?

I know there are those sketchy sites for people who want Russian brides and the like but two of those kinds I've sites that I've signed up for require a photo ID to verify myself and they're unaccepting of my trans status. I still have an F on my license and one site actually changed the gender on my profile to female (and removed the option to change it back) with the excuse that they want ""complete honesty"" even though I always state I'm trans and pre-op in my dating profiles. I'm not interested in paying out the ass just to message people anyway, especially if they're going to completely disrespect me.",AskLGBT
Fetishizing Homosexuality,"I'm a heterosexual cis female who enjoys shipping canon-straight males and reading yaoi + m/m romance (the majority of which, I realize, are authored by females). I'm guilty of regarding gay guys as something to coo over, as if they were cute puppies, and have followed, as fangirls do, the lives of couples simply because they were both men. 

I've been gradually becoming uneasy for a while now, after being audience to the way cultural appropriation discourse has unfolded over the internet, that perhaps I'm similarly misappropriating the gay identity for my own satisfaction. I hear you when you say we're fetishizing homosexuality, and am sufficiently alarmed with and sincerely apologize for how my subconscious sense of straight superiority must have wormed its way into my actions. I'm not questioning the callout, but what I'd like is a clarification of what exactly constitutes ""fetishizing homosexuality,"" so I can police my behavior better in the future.

1.) Is it only that these m/m stories are often tonedeaf and do not reflect the real struggles of the LGBTQI? So then, if it's written by someone more aware and knowledgeable, like u know an actual gay guy, would that then be okay?

2.) Is it that we only like the gay stuff that are cute and sexy, and call ourselves allies without truly contributing to the movement? If I say that I'm vehemently anti-homo/transphobia and call out even the barest, most casual hints of either, and that I actively campaign against politicians whose principles and policies hurt the community, does that give me a free pass?

3.) Or is reading these things and spazzing over these couples for the sole purpose of enjoying two men together, intrinsically wrong, even more so in the context of this highly heteronormative world? I realize that all along I've been patronizingly considering ""gay"" as a positive value in itself rather than a neutral trait that is not indicative of a person's character or a story's worth (in contrast to how ""straight"" to me is only a qualifier for who people are attracted to and nothing else), and that's what makes it a fetish to me. But does the existence of that fetish mean that there is no room for me to indulge in it anymore out of respect for gay guys?

Sorry I'm so extra. I'd just really like to gain a better understanding of how you feel about it. So any insights from the LGBTQI+ would be much appreciated. Sorry and thank you :)

Also, please call me out if I'm like, saying something offensive/insensitive or making it all about myself or whatever other shit we do but don't notice from our position of privilege.",AskLGBT
Asking about coworker's fiancé if I'm not sure he's come out publicly?,"Please forgive what might be a stupid question. I recently found out that a guy I work with is engaged to one of my former coworkers. I'm so stoked for them and would love to tell the guy I work with that I know his fiancé, but I'm not sure how to go about doing it. I'd hate to bring it up if he hasn't come out to others at work, and I want to be sensitive to his feelings. Should I just hold off until he mentions something? Wait until we have a one on one meeting?

Thanks, everyone. I love how educational this community is!",AskLGBT
"Is it easier being a lesbian in a rural, conservative community?","I know it's insensitive, but that stereotype is often brought up. Y'know, the rednecks who don't like gay men, but smile at two women kissing?",AskLGBT
Question about the community's attitude towards realising your sexuality,"I don't know if this seems ignorant or if I'm just being dumb but either way I'm out of the loop and want to understand this better-
Why is it that the LGBT community are insistent on the idea that when somebody is for example gay, they haven't ""become"" gay- they have always been that way. I don't understand what reason there is to believe this is the case; why is the LGBT community so insistent on the idea that it's not possible to become a certain sexuality? Sexuality isn't a natural biological thing like skin colour etc is it? So why can't you become like a lesbian or even transgender?
Hope I don't seem rude by asking this but I don't get it and am definitely open to an explanation
Thanks",AskLGBT
Gay or just confused?,"Hello all, This had been bothering me for a year now, I could use a different view on the situation.

1 - Who iam I? 23/M, living in Europe. Growing up, I was never the social guy, I'm very shy, never going out on friday nights, never dated anyone. Bear with me, this will be relevant soon.

2 - What bothers me? Few years ago, I stumbled upon gay porn website and out of curiosity I decided to watch some videos. I watched the videos, and ever since I've been known to watch some gay porn videos. I've also been looking away whenever someone shirtless comes closes, probably in fear of how my body will react. The videos are very taboo/exciting but I don't feel the desire to have sex with men. My fantasies involve woman and group sex(mmf) but never sex with another man. The way I see it, the videos are just entertainment.


3 - What confuses me? Remember when I said I was the socially awkward guy? I was ok with that at first, but recently I find myself needing close friends. I see other people going on vacation with their friends, having fun. But being close friend with someone will eventually end in someone being shirtless, and I'm scared of how I will react in that situation.


4 - The internet... Browsing the internet, looking for answers I found 2 things I can relate to. One was forum post, about man, wanting to be close with friends from the same sex, but without the sex. Things like, watching movie when being shirtless, hugging someone without being called gay.
The other one was post about sexual orientation obsessions in OCD on psychologytoday and lot of the symptoms match my feelings. This is the post in question: https://www.psychologytoday.com/blog/culturally-speaking/201201/sexual-orientation-compulsions-in-ocd


5 - What to do next? This is the part where I need help. I don't feel like trying the gay thing, but I also have hard time moving these thoughts out of my head. Did anyone had similar experience? Could I be secretly gay, or it's just anxiety? I understand that I'm the one that has the answers, but as I said in the begining, this is bothering me for a long time, I could use another opinion.
Thank you.",AskLGBT
Why do most people in the LGBT community have the Hitler haircut?,,AskLGBT
I'm a confused babe...,"TL;DR: dumbass guys in school make feel gayer. Wtf's up with that.  

I'm  confused with my sexual preference and how I feel about people since my sexuality keeps fluctuating. I keep creating stories of ideal guys to compensate, but now on summer break  I'm thinking of girls-- mainly if I don't really have any good interactions with dudes in my age group for a prolonged period of time-- leading me to start feeling more attracted to the same sex in many ways. So my assumption is that I'm just lying to myself about being attracted to girls, since guys in 9th grade are super douchey and stupid-- and I'm just not into that bullshit. But even then the attraction still lingers. So wtf. Should I just experiment. I dunno. I want advice.

Btw: sorry for the shitty writing and bad sentence structure. I hope only being 14 excuses me for that-- probably not.",AskLGBT
I really hope I don't offend anybody with this question. I've noticed that some lesbians seem to like a type of girls that look and behave 'boy-ish'. Are they then also physically attracted to men?,,AskLGBT
Am I a bad person if my biggest fear about transitioning is that I won't be beautiful?,"I'm male here, for a long time have been working through my gender dysphoria stuff. I assume that it's tied itself in a way to my self-esteem. I don't just want to be female, I want to be beautiful. I feel like a piece of shit.

For the record I would not describe myself as attractive as a male, I'm **not** worried about if I'll **still** look good",AskLGBT
I am confused about my sexuality.,"For most of my life I thought I was straight until I turned 11 and I got attracted to like 2 guy YouTubers I watched. But I quickly moved on from that phase and just thought it had something to do with puberty. When I was 12 a friend (who is a boy) touched me and I got aroused slightly. These last few weeks one of my best friends has been touching my penis a lot as a joke and I get a hard on. I have been confused about whether I am bi or straight. I am rarely attracted to guys, girls are just so much better for me but I rarely get attracted to some guys I am close to such as a friend. I watched gay porn the other day and it was revolting imo but when other guys touch me I like it. What am I? I need help. I am currently 13 almost 14. I am also attracted to trans girls but not trans boys.",AskLGBT
Need advice or insight about this,"So, my room mate gives me very asexual vibes(I am one myself) but he says he isn't asexual. 
But he said a very peculiar thing the other day which I can't figure out, hope to get help here.

He said, he can't/doesn't feel sexually attracted to people if he is emotionally/romanticaly  involved with them. Sexual attraction disappears of there is any prospect of emotional/romantic attachment ----(*)
Otherwise it's fine.(his words) 

Also, about sex/nudity (the way I understood it) he appreciates the female form. I think the aesthetics. 

He doesn't rule out sex from his life but   (*) is how he feels.

Is this unheard of? Any insights,suggestions??

Thank you.
PS - he is straight if one has to say something about it.
PPS - posted in r/asexuality, thought posting here could help too.",AskLGBT
"Why do trans people use the ""trans"" prefix?","Cis male here. Why do trans people refer to themselves as transmale or transfemale? Doesn't that delegitimize your gender? If you are a woman, then you are a woman. period. You aren't a transwoman. 

I think this linguistic play affects how outsiders see trans people. It's a qualifier that acts as an asterix on your gender. 

Again, I have no personal experience with this. I am not making an argument, but asking for the reasoning. Thanks",AskLGBT
What Do I Do If My Emotional Attractions Conflict With My Sexual Attractions?,"I'm a pansexual female. I'm attracted to people of all kinds of gender identities but I have a weird issue with males for some odd reason. I am definitely sexually attracted to them, but emotionally it's extremely hard for me to get close to them or feel comfortable. They could be the nicest guy and it would still be hard... Since my sexual attraction is almost solely dependent on my emotional connection to people, I often times find myself not being able to be physical with guys that I might actually be attracted to. I'm fine with girls though, maybe even sort of the opposite. It's hard for me to find a girl that I wouldn't be physical with. It worries me tbh, because there's this sweet guy that I really like, and he likes me too. He finally asked me out on a date and I'm excited. I'm attracted to him and we even made out once, and I wanted to give in and enjoy it but something in my brain kept saying ""I shouldn't be doing this"". I'm really worried because eventually if we keep going out things are going to get more and more physical, and I want to date him but I don't know... Straight encounters turn me off I guess. Gay/Lesbian couples are always cute to me, but straight couples generally annoy me and I find myself hoping they break up. I even find male and female gay porn arousing, but straight porn either bores me or it actually disgusts me for some reason even though I do like guys... I guess I just don't like them with girls??? Idk, someone please help... Should I keep trying with guys or does it sound like maybe I'm a lesbian? This problem has been making my love life difficult.",AskLGBT
How would homosexual procreate in nature?,"Do homosexual animals (like humans) just don't have the desire and instinct to have an offspring? My question is without modern technology, how would homosexual humans have offspring if they want to?

This makes me think that all homosexual are probably just bisexual, but I'm straight and ignorant about this.",AskLGBT
Question in text.,"Is it possible for someone to not be fully on board with the LGBT community (for any number of reasons, such as a lack of understanding, religion, etc), and still be an ally in the sense that they are against discrimination, maltreatment, violence, etc., towards the LGBT community - without coming across as a phobe?",AskLGBT
"Can you be close friends with someone of the gender or sex you are attracted to, WITHOUT eventually falling in love?","I'm trying to prove to my friends that it's possible(I'm the only gay one in the group).
Any stories would be greatly appreciated, especially 1-on-1 friendships. They basically are saying it's impossible to be CLOSE friends with someone (ie two gay men) without eventually catching feelings for them.",AskLGBT
Why is it so rare to see same-sex couples outside?,"Outside I can see many straight couples but I almost never see same-sex couples. It's definitely less than even 1% of the couples I see. Why is that?

Supposedly, attitudes have improved, and I don't suppose same-sex couples would have to fear for their personal safety. I'm not seeing stories in the news about violence, and the last story I can easily find for Windsor was in 2010. I'm in southwestern Ontario, Canada.",AskLGBT
Do you think Libertarians are homophobic?,"I'm a 16 y/o male and I used to date a bi girl. I'm a fairly outspoken Libertarian which isn't too popular of an ideology where I live and I was always criticized by her LGBT friends for it. My ex herself didn't make a fuss about it, but I could tell she didn't like it. I have nothing wrong with the LGBT community, but that never seemed to matter. I still have gay friends and whatnot, I've never been seen as ""an enemy to the gay community"" or something like that, but it's been fairly annoying seeing as I personally don't care what your gender or sexuality is.

So basically my question is, do members of the LGBT community consider the Libertarian Party to be homophobic? I always blew off the opinions of the people at my schools as ignorant teens under the mislead assumption that Libertarians are just Republican-lites. But maybe that's not it, which is why I'm asking here.",AskLGBT
Strictly to cis lesbians: would you date a girl with a penis?,"By lesbians, I mean not bisexual. I'm just curious to see how much genitals actually weigh into sexual attraction. This kind of question has probably been asked before, but fresh opinions probably aren't a bad thing. I'd also ask straight cis women, but this is ""AskLBGT"", and I kinda doubt there's an ""AskStraight"" with any real following.",AskLGBT
Not sure if I'm straight or bi ??,"Hey! So I'm an 18 yo girl. I've been with guys mainly but I've also made out with girls but never gone past that with a woman. Sex with guys is ok and I don't know if I've just never been with a guy that's ""good"" in bed (I know for sure my ex was not good lol) so I just haven't ""discovered"" good sex yet? Or if I just am not sexually attracted to men. The confusing thing for me, is I like kissing guys and doing everything else and feeling small and protected next to them, but sex is just eh for me. However, for several years I have watched lesbian porn when I masturbate and kissed girls and I am super excited / interested in having sex with women and the idea of it turns me on more than having sex with a man. I'm not sure if it's like a kinky thing, a phase, or the truth. Any advice? ",AskLGBT
"[M20Cis] I've been invited (and accepted!) to go with my bi friend [F19] to the Pride parade to show support, but she wants me to go to a gay bar after...","So, I'm a straight male.  I'm pretty confident in that after having been a good sport and making out with other guys during drinking games (I didn't mind it, but I recognized that it wasn't my thing).

I'm not uncomfortable with gays, or anyone of the LGBTQ community (I've got plenty of diverse friends), but I'm not sure whether 1) it would be borderline disrespectful to go to a gay bar as a straight person, 2) how comfortable I am having to consistently turn down people who may be trying to hit on me, and 3) whether, in my own personal pursuits of any potential women at the bar, I would piss anyone off.

If you guys agree with my hesitations and think I shouldn't go to the bar, I could use some advice on how to turn my friend down on that.  When I pointed out to her that ""well, this is a gay bar, and I'm straight...""  She just said ""Yeah!  You're gonna be hit on by women and men, and it's gonna be great!""  I mean, like I said, I don't know how fun for all parties involved that will actually be, and whether I'll just be wasting my (and everyone else's time).

Thanks for any advice you can give!",AskLGBT
"[18, Cis Male] I feel like I might be bi, but I'm only interested in relationships and sex with women. What's up with that?","Sometimes, I'll see a conventionally attractive man and think something close to, but not quite exactly, ""he's attractive/cute."" Incidents like these make me wonder if I'm actually bisexual or biromantic. But here's the thing: I only want a relationship, romantic and sexual, with a woman.

I am not attracted to male sexual anatomy. Penises and testicles gross me out (my own genitals partially excluded) to the point where I hate buying underwear because of the bulge-displaying models on the packaging, while the genitals, generally larger breasts, and overall form of the female body are incredibly attractive to me. I can't really imagine myself having anything more than a familial or platonic relationship with a man, even if I try. Even when I imagine being on the receiving end of anal sex (for the record, I am only interested in being on the receiving end of that), my partner is always a woman wearing a strap-on. Also, the thought of oral sex with a man gives me the creeps. At least for now, sex with a man is completely out of the question for me. And since I only want to have sex with my romantic partner, that means I probably don't want to date men.

But I don't know for sure. I know there's such a thing as purely aesthetic attraction, and I certainly feel like any attraction I have had to men in the past heavily leaned towards that, but I feel like it could extend just a bit further than that. It's not like I've been lying to myself all my life about being bisexual; I've been interested in solely women for as long as I've been sexually active (and by sexually active, I mean masturbation), and these weird emotions towards men are a fairly recent phenomenon. Even when I felt like I *might* be developing strong feelings for a man, I've just chalked it up to having a strong desire to be good friends with them rather than a desire to be more than friends. I do know my strongest feelings for men have been towards really good friends, but I don't think that's enough to call me biromantic or bisexual or bi-whatever.

Overall, I'm just a bit confused about what I'm really feeling. Does anybody have some ideas or perspective that could help me out?

EDIT: I just remembered something that could partially explain my feelings. I grew up among homophobic peers, meaning any sort of attraction to men beyond familial and platonic - including just acknowledging a man was handsome - meant you were gay. And it doesn't help that I got called homophobic slurs throughout middle and high school, and once was accused of being gay. Perhaps that anti-gay environment got hardwired into me, which could mean one of two things. Either I'm misinterpreting my aesthetic attraction to some men as something beyond that (because of the ""aesthetic attraction = gay"" thing), or I'm holding back my true feelings for men (because of the ""gay = bad"" thing). Replace ""gay"" with ""bi"" in the above and it's basically the same thing. Of course, this doesn't exactly make determining what I'm feeling any easier; it just sorta pinpoints a potential cause.",AskLGBT
How do non binary people have sex?,Seriously I'm curious?,AskLGBT
I came out the wrong person and now he's telling everyone (13m) help?,"So I'm a gay 13 year old at a Catholic mixed gender school in Ireland. I've come out to about fifteen people, mostly girls. Today in a class two boys were pestering me about who I liked. Boy 1 made up a list of people I apparently told him I liked. I didn't want rumours spreading about who I liked because that goes real bad real quick.

While I definitely didn't boy 1 I would say boy 2 is very trustworthy and hardly knows boy 1. So after some thought and making some promises I admitted I was gay. Is it bad to mention boy 2 has very strict Indian parents?

He started acting weird and then I realised I made a huge mistake. I said it was just a joke and started begging him to not say anything but he just laughed. He immediately told boy 1 when class finished like two minutes later. Last I saw them walking out the door as they talked.

Next I was panicking and talking to a friend who knows about me being gay and telling her the whole situation as we walked to our next class. Our next classroom was a good 5 minute walk across the school and my teacher is pretty lax about punctuality. Halfway there I noticed boy 1 walking by himself in front of us. I tried to keep him ahead and we walked behind but he noticed us and got behind us.
Thankfully this was literally about ten feet away from his classroom so I sped up my pace. He started kicking me and asking me about what I said in that class. I said I never said anything and he insisted. He had to go into his class and I walked on for my own class.

I was in fucking panic mode as I walked into my next class. I told some of my friends. One of them (well she's not really my friend) sad I was an idiot and it was my own fault (thanks Emma).

That was our last class of the day and no one in my class said anything to me. One of the boys at my table said people chose to be gay and also that AIDS is a disease sent by God to show gay people what they do is wrong and sinful (he's 13) but he always says stuff like that and he clearly didn't know about me.

Those two boys will tell everyone I know. By now I'm sure everyone knows. I'm too scared to look at my phone in fear of what I might see. I'm terrified. What's going to happen to me? Or am I overreacting? Boys in our school have short memories and quickly move into the next bullying material if you play it cool. But at the same time I feel like taking this opportunity to come out and be done with it. I'm tired of hiding who I am.

For all I know the boys won't mention it tomorrow. What should I do?",AskLGBT
"Redditors with same-sex parents, do you refer to both of your parents with the same name?",,AskLGBT
Pride month impostor syndrome after learning to be genderfluid,"I was looking at a banner for the events calendar for pride month in a newspaper &amp; caught myself saying internally I wouldn't belong at anything. I still haven't looked at the calendar. Typing that last sentence got me crying over the fear I'm feeling about all of this, including writing this post. I've done a lot of work toward overcoming fear of rejection in the past couple of years, but this is still a challenge for me. 

I think I'm learning to be gender fluid, which flies in the face of everything I've ever learned about gender being something you're born as. But all I've ever learned about gender flies in the face of my experiences over the past 4 months &amp; what I hypothesize about how the brain works. 

If we can think about gender &amp; focus on it, I suspect we can grow it. I think I've been doing this for 5 months now, ever since the accidental emergence of a female identity in my head. When she emerged, she switched into the driver's seat of my body &amp; I was the voice inside my head. We've since learned how to switch places intentionally. This is not Dissociative Identity Disorder (though several people in my family thought it was til I told them several therapists, one with experience in dealing with DID, have said otherwise &amp; would they please stop trying to diagnose me already?!). Nobody in my family asks me about her, I think because they're scared. They've only had to really deal with the LG in LGBTQ. My friends have received me in different, mostly supportive ways; one trans friend &amp; a gay friend stopped talking to me.

What I think about how the brain works: The brain is configured at birth (genome + epigenome) &amp; that configuration, combined with sex hormones (and a bazillion others) &amp; experience, leads to the emergence of traits. One of these traits is correlated with sex hormones &amp; we call it gender. The brain is also plastic, meaning it can grow new connections. I hypothesize one way this happens is through the application of an electrical signal called attention. If attention can touch a part of the brain, it can connect it to other parts.

I'm rambling now &amp; the only things I can think to ask are do I belong &amp; has anyone else gotten past impostor syndrome? How did you do it, if so?",AskLGBT
Is being gay a genetic disfunction?,"1st try my best to Not offend anyone

Ok so being Gay Most of the time is Not a choice but decided when you get Born if i understood it right.  So ist being Gay Not a genetic disfunction after Darwins evolution theory? The best Genetic Code will survive. But being Gay isnt or? BC youre less likely to get Kids and so less likely to Pass your Genetic Code. Sorry if disfunction offends anyone Here but English is Not my First language and I dont know how to say it in an other way",AskLGBT
5-year-old's pronoun,"My 5-year-old is friends with a child at school, J, with short hair. My son said J is ""kind of a girl but kind of like a boy."" It's a great school, so of course gender-fluid is fine with everyone. 

Today at school drop-off, my son was rowdy and I needed to say, ""Tell J you didn't mean to hurt... J."" Some Googling suggests you'd normally ask someone what pronoun they prefer, but a 5-year-old might not know the word ""pronoun."" In addition to knowing what pronoun to use, if my son is wrong about ""kind of a girl and kind of a boy,"" I want to fix that.

Should I:

- ask J's teacher about the pronoun?

- hope it doesn't come up again? 

- go with ""her"" and hope I'm not making a child uncomfortable?

I really like J and love that they are friends, but I'm just wondering about the best way to fill in the pronoun blank in this case.

Thank you!",AskLGBT
Please help not sure what to do,"So tonight was an interesting one, today my gf (23) of 6 years told me she might be gay. She said she's not really sure what she is, but she knows that she is finding men less and less attactive and women more and more attractive. I know she loves me and she wants to be with me. I'm not really sure how to react or what we can do to I Guess figure it out. Is this a phase is she gay, anyone know anything that could help? For the record if she is gay I am ok with that but its not like we can have the same relationship as we do now. I don't know I'm kind of rambling because I am lost thanks in advanced for any advice",AskLGBT
"I’m Christopher Schmitt, and as a biological anthropologist I’ve spent 65+ months studying monkeys in the Amazon and across Africa. I'm also gay gay gay. Ask me anything! • r/lgbt",,AskLGBT
"Why aren't things like asexual and pansexual, considered sexual orientations, instead of genders.",Sorry if the wording is confusing. Just ask me if you need clarification.,AskLGBT
I'm so confused/depressed/idk?!?!?,"Hello,
I am going to start with the fact that English is not my native language and for that reason, please forgive me if there are lot's of mistakes in this thread. 

Alrighty then... I don't even know where to begin. It was around 12-13 (I'm 19 now) when I started to realise that I like boys (Oh yea, I'm male btw.). By 15 I was about 100% sure that I'm gay and at 17 I started to come out to my friends and now lot's of my friends know about me being gay. I haven't came out to my parents because they are homophobic and I'm not ready for the worst. So yea. All was good. When in December, 2016 I met some new friends at a party, I came out to them because I was drunk. And now we are really close friends (all ""friends"" were girls). So now I have this best, best friend and she is a girl. We even laugh that we are more than best friends. She has told me that she wished I wasn't gay and we could be together and I always laughed about that. We have made out (when drunk) and I really liked it, I have made out (drunk) with lot's of girls, but I never enjoyed the experience. Back to the story... few months ago. I felt that I started developing feelings for her and I know she has feelings for me. We are chatting alot, talking of facetime, we spend   alot of time together, watch movies, cuddle and stuff. And the thing that I'm cofnused with and that is making me feel depressed is... what should I do? Am I really gay? Am I pansexual? I mean sexually talking, I'm not sure if I could have sex with a girl(atleast when I'm sober), but like when we last kissed really intense and romantically I got a boner and stuff... This is fu**ed up. It has been sitting in my mind for weeks and Idk what to do. Please help. Should I tell her that I might not be gay? Should I try to be together with her? Like ahhh.... Yesterday we met and we talked in my car, she was sleeping in my lap and I kinda talked to her, she was talking about how we are going to get married in Las Vegas :D  etc. And then she said, that she would want to be with me, but she does not want me to be unhappy (Because she has seen all the movies, where homosexual men(usually) get married in straight families and how their unhappy etc.).... HELP ME. Please. I smoke like 35 cigarettes a day now to calm my mind, that's not normal, my lungs hurt :D",AskLGBT
What exactly am I?,"So, interesting situation here. I know where I stand on myself, but I'm not exactly sure how the LGBT community would really refer to me.. While supportive, I don't really keep up with it all. Anyway, I'm a bit of an oddball when it comes to these kinds of things. First of all, I'm male sex-wise, and I'm straight romantically, [Currently in a straight relationship who is supportive of me] but bisexual when it comes to actual sex. As for gender, I don't really bother with the whole concept when it comes to myself. I am what I am. Typically just go with male when asked, and generally people would say I behave male. But I've also got some more 'feminine tendencies' and honestly, if I could hit a magic button to switch myself from male to female instantly, I would always push it without hesitating, for personal and nonsexual reasons. So, saying I could have access to this amazing and awesome button, after pressing it, my sexual and romantic preferences wouldn't change. I'm beyond hormone treatments and the like (agewise and while I'll admit I haven't done my research, I have extremely masculine facial features and I'd be surprised if hormones could soften those at all), so actually transitioning doesn't appeal to me at all. I don't want surgeries or medicines. [I'd rather have what I have than attempt to ""reconstruct"" it into something else... I don't think I'd be happy at all with the results] So I guess, I'd want to be the opposite sex (and probably mostly gender) if I had the opportunity to do it completely, but I don't hate who I am physically enough to want to take any of the options available. But I also feel like I would be twice as happy with myself and in general if there was that fabled magical button...

So, with all of that aside, what exactly would I be... labeled as? Because I feel like it's fairly complicated so I want to know if there are terms that describe this sort of thing.

Thanks.",AskLGBT
is having children heteronormativity?,"this seems like a weird question to ask but someone had claim that the reason some queer people don't have kids is because having kids is ""hetronomative""

as per usual, i mostly disagree as there's nothing heteronormative about 2 lesbian/gay parents having kids. same can go for any else part of lgbtq community.  ",AskLGBT
"What do you think about LGBT representation on TV? It seems to me that whenever a see an LGBT person in a TV show, their entire character revolves around them being gay. Am I mistaken?","Like when has a character ever been gay without it being the major story of their character? Is this just in my head? Of course characters who aren't doing anything sexual might be gay since who knows, but everything in movies is intentional so I don't know if that's a good explanation. Thoughts?",AskLGBT
What would you recommend me to do? I'm really lost on this.,"I'm so confused right now. I think that I'm done with men. I'm a month away to be 30 and I'm lonely as hell, never been in a relationship, I swear that I've tried everything.
I live in a really small country where being gay is still a taboo (not against the law though) but people are very religious and closed minded, so most guys want to live a double life, they ain't looking for anything serious but 'discrete friends' or one night stands.
Most people here a brown skin, so most of the guys are looking for a white stud taken from a Sean Cody video, something that I am so far to be.
I REALLY want to fall in love and to be intimate with someone, you know, to cuddle and stuff, there's so much in life beyond sex and all this gay hookup culture makes me sick, I feel like we're an Amazon product on those apps like Grindr where our value is taken from things that we can't control such our skin color or height. Another item more on the list.
I'm just fed up with this shitty game:
*When I feel lonely so I open Grindr only to get rejected a million times. And If I manage to find someone who pity me enough to have sex with me, then no matter how good sex went, they wouldn't call or text me back again the next day, like nothing happened. So I end up feeling worse about myself and wondering what the hell I did wrong. Another empty high. And here we go again.
The thing is, here we don't have any gay sport clubs or organizations to meet people out of sexual charged environments. The only way to meet guys is through social media, dating apps and a few gay clubs.
My friends say that I need to chill and enjoy being single and have much sex. But I've tried that and I don't feel good about hooking up with a different dude every weekend.
Empty sex is better than no sex at all. But I feel worse after engaging on it. Its a vicious cycle.
I don't feel 'dirty' or 'guilty' after sex, but I just don't get why some guys don't like to 'repeat'. Even if the experience was good. I mean, last time that I had a one night stand the guy came twice, he asked me to stay cuddling afterwards. Then he gave me a super deep kiss at his front door when I was leaving, so things were pretty well. But guess what? I texted him twice and never got a reply. A few days ago I tried again and he replied very nicely that he's been busy with his job and stuff, and when I asked when were we getting together again he just replied: I DON'T KNOW.
The other day I also had a date with someone and we went to watch a movie. Everything went great and he invited me to go for an ice cream when the movie was over and we spent all night just talking about our hobbies and stuff. Never got a reply again from him on the phone.
I just don't know what to do anymore. I'm so done with this. But I have needs, hookups are empty highs.
You know, all the process of sending dick pics to persuade a stranger to come to my place or me going to his, you know, people using fake names, that might be serial killers or something. You don't even know... It's just weird.
My straight friends are already getting married and having children, nothing wrong with that just we're on different paths, I just feel left behind in life.
I just don't get it, again, guys, I've talked to guys who after seeing my body and face pic they MUST see my cock in order to be worthy of their time.
If you like my body and face, and we're having a nice chat why everything need to depend on my cock? This is a very small island and everyone knows everyone so I don't feel comfortable sending nudes to I don't know who.
I don't know what to do in my life. I'm too old for this shit. I just wanted to be in love, in a monogamous relationship without all this crap. But it seems like material for the new Mission Impossible sequel.
TRUST ME. ANY SUGGESTION WILL BE REALLY APPRECIATED.
",AskLGBT
Linguistics question about non-binary.,"If a non-binary person is attracted to one gender, what do they call themself? Words like 'homosexual' and 'hetrosexual' imply that they have the same/opposite gender as the one they're attracted to.",AskLGBT
Does the community want multiple genders? or none?,"I would say I am a pretty big supporter of the LGBTQ community but one thing I have recently been thinking is the gender ""debate"". On one side have groups finding themselves as new genders such as Intersex and Non-Binary while on the other side you have people fighting for non-segregated bathrooms and community standards. So my question is do people want everyone to be viewed as just humans who can all share the samethings or even more divided into different groups?",AskLGBT
How to clean your ass before having sex?,"I don't have any of those special pump things unfortunately, so what other options do I have left?",AskLGBT
"""Gay is OK"" t-shirt","I was recently in Oklahoma and was gifted a t-shirt that says: ""Gay is OK"" in rainbow letters with the ""O"" as the [Oklahoma state flag symbol ](http://www.50states.com/flag/image/nunst059.gif) (Meaning, as I read it, Oklahoma stands with the gay community). I am straight and have a few questions: 1. Do you think that folks outside of Oklahoma will mistake the ""OK"" as ""Meh, gay is okay I guess""? (I would like to make sure I convey a full support of the LGBT community, not just that it's ""ok"") 2. Is it naive ( for lack of a better term) for an ally to wear something like this (this maybe a simple question but this would be my first piece of gay swag outside of equity stickers)? ",AskLGBT
Other people being out upsets me,"Let me preface this by saying I'm not straight - I'm a bisexual 18 year old and at this point and am still questioning even that l, wondering if I actually like men at all - and recently my friend who I thought was bisexual dropped that label and came out as a lesbian. 

This has been causing me a ridiculous amount of anxiety and though I know vaguely why I don't know... why. I know it's some sort of internalized homophobia, but I don't know why it's making me anxious and angry in particular or what to do about it. I can't stop thinking about it all the time, I almost feel like I'm losing my friend: every time she posts something online about lgbtq issues I feel like I'm being personally alienated, like when people talk about ""the straights"" they somehow mean me. But I'm not straight - she even knows I'm not - so WHY do I feel so excluded and angry. She's out and happy and this just makes me feel.... dread. From the second she came out all I felt was dread.

It's horrible I know, and it kills me inside. I don't know what to do: I don't like thinking about it all the time but now I'm just obsessed with her orientation and watching her expression of it and picking apart my own orientation. It's made me a nervous wreck. Please help?",AskLGBT
Not sure what's going on.,"Probably for the last 14 years or so I've known I was attracted to men, it was unambiguous in my mind. What I wasn't sure about was how I felt toward women, but in the last 5 years or so it's been very clear to me that I'm not attracted sexually to women, more attracted like I want to emulate them. As far back as I can remember I've wanted to transition but it's more recently that I've understood the feelings I've had toward women in my life. I was very secure in my identity and I felt like I finally understood myself. But then these last 2 weeks I've been having incredibly vivid dreams of being intimate with women. Not anyone that I know or anything, but still. It's like I finally figured myself out and my brain went, 'lol nope' and decided to throw me for a loop. I just don't know what to think, could really use some advice.",AskLGBT
I am unsure if sexual orientation is a choice or not.,"I am not here to offend anyone, but I know there will be strong opinions on this.

But I want to learn and be more aware of the issue.

I'd like to to know sexual orientation is a choice or not.

The best definition for sexual orientation I could find is (Taken from the American Psychological Association: http://www.apa.org/topics/lgbt/orientation.aspx)

&gt;""Sexual orientation refers to an enduring pattern of emotional, romantic, and/or sexual attractions to men, women, or both sexes""

So this is the definition I'll be working with for the purposes of this question. If anyone could offer an alternative definition feel free to do so, but please provide a definition supported by a nonpartisan group that is scientifically inclined (strives for objectivity) and/or subject to peer review. 

---

My first issue is that sexual orientation seems to be a preference for a particular sex, not gender. Meaning an attraction to males or females.

So my first question would be: how does this relate to genders?

Genders, as opposed to the two sexes, are social constructs (at least from my reading, feel free to find supportive/contrary evidence), and therefore open to choice. (i.e I could choose to change my gender)

Therefore if I have a sexual preference for females/female characteristics I could potentially be a heterosexual male or a homosexual female (or bisexual male/female etc).

Since I can choose my gender and switch between man/woman could I therefore not change my sexuality from homosexual to heterosexual at-will?

Could I be a straight man today, and after I go through a gender identity switch, become a homosexual woman? 

Would this not mean that sexuality isn't determined at birth or biologically determined but instead be a pure choice?

",AskLGBT
"Is the word ""queer"" derogatory because I feel like it is but then I see people who refer to themselves as queer like a tinder bio I saw said ""vegan. Non-binary. Queer."" but is it just the context that makes it bad to say?",,AskLGBT
"Can you explain to me why body dysmorphia is a serious disorder but being ""non-binary"" should be embraced and celebrated?","If an anorexic person looks into a mirror and believes themself to be obese, we consider that to be a harmful disconnect from reality and treat it as a debilitating mental disorder, but if a man believes himself to be a woman trapped in a man's body, we are told we should embrace that and celebrate his/her(?) bravery. I don't really see a difference here. Can someone explain? 

EDIT: When people come to you with a genuine question in an honest attempt to better understand your issues, you shouldn't downvote them immediately. This is how you lead to ***more*** bigotry and hatred, not less. ",AskLGBT
"I came out as bisexual to my boyfriend of 3.5 years, but I'm now wanting to explore my sexuality.","My boyfriend and I have been in an amazing relationship for over 3 years. To sum it up, he's the one that I'm sure I'll spend the rest of my life with. Recently, I came out as bisexual to him. It's something I've known for years but recently came to understand exactly how I feel in terms of my sexuality. Telling him was basically admitting it to myself, it was the first time I actually said it out loud. I'm now realizing that I really want to explore that side of myself, but I absolutely don't want to lose our relationship. I just don't want to feel like I missed out on something later on in life, or that I didn't take the time for self discovery in that aspect. I have no idea what to do, so any advice would be greatly appreciated. ",AskLGBT
Did you ever use AIM to meet other queer people back in the 90s?,It's the 20th anniversary of AIM. I'm curious whether other people used AIM to meet other queer people for dates/friendships/whatever. ,AskLGBT
Can body-shaming lead to gender dysphoria?,"This is something I've wondered, whether being told your whole life that you aren't feminine enough could lead you to develop gender dysphoria. Therefore, if this feeling is the result of bullying is it somehow wrong for them to go under the knife to ""fit in"" with what their tormentors expect of their bodies?

I mean I think everyone is entitled to do what they want with their bodies and noone should constrain their choices and I don't want to be patronising... but if gender dysphoria could *sometimes* be a result of the body-shaming which is disgustingly prevalent in our society... then why should someone feel they need to change to fit in?

Or is the only answer to this to try and prevent more shaming happening in the future. I'm not saying that being trans is bad in any way, I would never say that in a million years because it's not true. What I'm talking about is body-shaming in our hypersexualised consumer culture",AskLGBT
Have you ever been worried about holding your partner's hand in public? (A research study on public displays of affection among LGBTQ+),"Hi /r/AskLGBT!

&amp;nbsp;

At DePaul University we are conducting a research study to learn more about public displays of affection (PDA) among gender and sexual minorities (GSM). The research consists of one anonymous survey that can be completed online and takes approximately 30 minutes to complete.   The term, ""gender and sexual minorities"", is used in this study to represent the entire spectrum of sexual orientations - such as gay, lesbian, bi, pan, asexual, etc. - as well as people who identify as any minority gender identity - such as transgender, non-binary, or genderqueer, among others (whom may or may not be heterosexual).

&amp;nbsp;
  
In order to participate in this research study you must be a sexual orientation minority, a gender identity minority, or both a sexual orientation and gender identity minority. Some people may prefer to use labels other than ‘sexual minority’ or ‘gender minority’ to describe their sexual orientation and gender identity. I use this term in this survey as a convenience, and I ask for your understanding if the term does not completely capture your sexual and gender identity.  This study will examine what makes GSM more or less likely to show public affection.

&amp;nbsp;

To be eligible to participate you must be all of the following: 


* 18 years old or older


* Any gender and/or sexual minority, such as gay, lesbian, bisexual, asexual, transgender, nonbinary, queer, etc.


* currently living in the United States 


* in a current monogamous relationship for at least one month or have had a past monogamous relationship that lasted at least one month. 

&amp;nbsp;

The following link will take you to the consent form that contains additional information on the project, the purpose of the study, how we protect your anonymity, and more. For more information or to participate, please visit: [This link](http://depaul.qualtrics.com/jfe/form/SV_aUU6aoX3irQAMBf)

&amp;nbsp;

 For more information please contact: lgbtqpda@gmail.com

&amp;nbsp;

* DePaul IRB Approved
* Protocol #JB120916PSY
* February 2, 2017 Through February 1, 2018",AskLGBT
LGBT Series/Movies/Books,"Hi guys, do you know any good LGBT Movies or Series? Ive watched couple of good movies but some of the movies I saw on the internet is too sexual for my taste? I've seen Jongens, The way he looks, and movies of the same genre, I also read some LGBT books, and I just watched the season 3 of skam which is also lgbt series. 

What movies/books/series could you suggest? I really like inspirational, romance, and coming out movies. Thank you!",AskLGBT
"If someone says they are a transgender girl, does that mean they identify as a girl or biologically a girl?",,AskLGBT
Do you ever regret your sex change?,,AskLGBT
"What is your version of the future, in a queer standpoint?",,AskLGBT
I don't know what to think,"Hi everyone. I'm looking for opinion about some kind of behaviour that puzzles me for years. I just wonder if there is some way to confront it, because I'm stuck. Sorry if some parts are a bit graphic.

I have a masturbatory routine that doesn't fit to the classic heterosexal guy way, neither in motivation nor method. About the first part, my arousals aren't product of the sight of the female body per se, but of the curiosity of experiencing what that body feels like in a sensory manner. I'm excited by thinking of the sensation of wearing some pieces of female clothes, specially tights, that fits to the body. But also, not having external genitalia, in the sense of having nothing between my legs, which lets you to do some movements easier or to wear tight clothes comfortably and without bulges. This curiosity extends to the sexual sensitivity itself, which is located inside the body.

About the method I use for self pleasure, I try to recreate that sensory experience. For that purpose, I put on a pair of tights and I tuck my genitals, trying to pretend a flat crotch. Then, that feeling of crossing legs with the touch of the tights, combined with the visual stimulation and the rubbing of the tip of the penis against the butt, it's enough to reach orgasm.

The origin of this comes from childhood. Since ever, I was attracted to tights, their appearance and smoothness, maybe because I was not allowed to wear them, as I was a boy. This kind of envy produced arousal and a clear physical response of my penis, which I felt very embarrassing and uncomfortable.

This evolved through years. I started to borrow them and put on secretly. Instantly, my interest grew into other female garments, such as skirts. But the next step was to figure out who to reduce the bulge of the crotch, first, putting on more layers, and some years later, learning to tuck.

Through all those years there wasn't a sexual intention, although the physical responses meant the opposite. If in childhood those were erections, in puberty they were wet dreams produced by dreams about wearing tights or not having genitalia. On the other hand, consciously, I found disgusting everything related to sex, so masturbation was out of my head. The masturbation routine started accidentally when I tried taping for the first time, with 18 years old. I felt both disgusted and pleasured at the same time, which made become a routine. Some years later I stopped using tape because I was injuring myself and the fear of sterility.

I tried many times to remove that attraction, without success. The constant trickle of women in tights I came across any day made me to fall back. So, I called it as something obsessive and addictive that I can't get through. I read many posts and articles in the internet and, although I can relate to some things, far from clarify my mind, they mess it more.

In other aspects, I I'm attracted exclusively to women, but only in an emotional and aesthetically manner, but not sexual. However, I never (I'm 30) had any intimate relationship with anybody because of my shyness and lack of social skills, so I can't assure the last statement. Maybe this routine is overcompensating my lack of female touch in some way. Anyway, I have no sexual fantasies per se, but because of this attraction, maybe I had imagined myself to be a woman for a day.

What this could mean?",AskLGBT
Questioning about my sexuality.,"Not sure this is why to ask about this or not, but I'm a guy. first I'm starting to watch straight porn later on my taste in porn starting to involved with two men having sex. Because of this I been avoiding to have relationship and now I think I'm starting to like this guys but this past five years I've been turning on watching gay men. Am I bi, should I starting to have a relationship with a girl or should I don't waste her time?",AskLGBT
Someone close to me just came out. What should my next steps be?,"She came out to me over text a few days ago, then publicly this morning. She knows I support her, through everything and unconditionally, but this is new to me and I want to handle it right. More than anything, I feel this innate urge to protect her, as I know others in our lives won't be as accepting when she shares her truth. Where can I find resources, especially any that I can share with conservative family? Materials on bisexuality and asexuality would be preferable.",AskLGBT
Do you guys feel like asexual or aromantic people belong in the LGBTQ+ community?,"Do you guys feel like asexual or aromantic people belong in the LGBTQ+ community? What about aro/ace? 

Why or why not? :)",AskLGBT
Do gay guys catcall each other?,"Gay dudes: have you ever catcalled another dude on the street? Have you ever been catcalled?

For purposes of this question, the definition is broad: anything from ""hey, cutie!"" up to open solicitations for sex.",AskLGBT
for the jewish/christian/muslim lgbtquia+ people,"why do you identify yourself with that religion? a religions that was founded by heteronormative men, follow a heteronormative scripture, and are antagonistic to anything that is not cis? ",AskLGBT
is bisexuality becoming an archaic term?,"especially when we need to address non-binary people ans is true that eventually, people will jump on the pan-sexual wagon and start displacing bisexuality for better or worse? even then, can it still hold up even when in the future, most people are somewhat gender fluid?",AskLGBT
Have you ever been worried about holding your partner's hand in public? (A DePaul University IRB-approved research survey),"Hi /r/AskLGBT!

&amp;nbsp;

At DePaul University we are conducting a research study to learn more about public displays of affection (PDA) among gender and sexual minorities (GSM). The research consists of one anonymous survey that can be completed online and takes approximately 30 minutes to complete.   The term, ""gender and sexual minorities"", is used in this study to represent the entire spectrum of sexual orientations - such as gay, lesbian, bi, pan, asexual, etc. - as well as people who identify as any minority gender identity - such as transgender, non-binary, or genderqueer, among others (whom may or may not be heterosexual).

&amp;nbsp;
  
In order to participate in this research study you must be a sexual orientation minority, a gender identity minority, or both a sexual orientation and gender identity minority. Some people may prefer to use labels other than ‘sexual minority’ or ‘gender minority’ to describe their sexual orientation and gender identity. I use this term in this survey as a convenience, and I ask for your understanding if the term does not completely capture your sexual and gender identity.  This study will examine what makes GSM more or less likely to show public affection.

&amp;nbsp;

To be eligible to participate you must be all of the following: 


* 18 years old or older


* Any gender and/or sexual minority, such as gay, lesbian, bisexual, asexual, transgender, nonbinary, queer, etc.


* currently living in the United States 


* in a current monogamous relationship for at least one month or have had a past monogamous relationship that lasted at least one month. 

&amp;nbsp;

The following link will take you to the consent form that contains additional information on the project, the purpose of the study, how we protect your anonymity, and more. For more information or to participate, please visit: [This link](http://depaul.qualtrics.com/jfe/form/SV_aUU6aoX3irQAMBf)

&amp;nbsp;

 For more information please contact: lgbtqpda@gmail.com

&amp;nbsp;

* DePaul IRB Approved
* Protocol #JB120916PSY
* February 2, 2017 Through February 1, 2018",AskLGBT
I don't know what to do,"Hello.I'm a 14 years old girl from Serbia and I have a big problem.Let me start from the beginning.I always knew that I was different from other girls in my school.I was the only girl who was comfortable with hanging out with guys in the first grade(girls in my school avoided them for some reason)I used to daydream about cuddling with my female cartoon heroes.Also I never really wanted to be a princess when we were playing.I didn't need a guy to save me,because I wanted to be my own hero.I was fascinated with dragons,archery,riding horses and marshal arts.My mother didn't think much of it then,because she thought that was just a phase that was going to pass.It turned out that she was right,well at least for a certain amount of time.As i grew older I became more girly.My favourite colors were pink and yellow and I was more interested in fashion and make up then I was before.I also started crushing on random guys from my school and everything was alright.However everything changed when I moved to the different city.I lost all of my old friends and I became quite a loner.For some time I wasn't hanging out with anybody which really bothered me since I was used to being surrounded by my friends.After some time I finally made some friends in my new school.I was very close with one guy and soon we became best friends.After a year or two I realized I like this guy more then I like my other friends and it soon became clear to me and everybody else that I was in love with him.Back than we were only in fourth grade so I doubt I really knew what I felt towards him,but I think I can say that he was my first love.After some time we began to drift apart from eacho  ther.He found his own group of friends and left me all alone.I was devasted and I remember that I couldn't stop crying when somebody told me that he had a crush on a girl from our class.It took me 3 years to pull myself together and move on from him.Thats when I met this girl.She was kind of nerdy and shy so I didn't really notice her before.Soon we became good friends.After some time I realized that I like her way more than I should.I started missing her and texting her 24/7.Thats when I started questioning my sexuality.I did plenty of gay tests and most of them said I was bisexual or that I was sexually curious.I was terrified.I come from a very homophobic family.Every time I try to start a conversation about LGBTQ,or Pride they get so mad at me and start telling me that being gay is not normal,that gay people are sick,mistake of nature,...Thats when I get furious and start telling them that being gay is not just about sex,that its about being emotionaly attracted to the person of a same gender as well as sexually,but they don't understand it.So I decided to keep my feeling to myself.With each day passing I realized I liked this girl more and more and when I started dreaming about kissing her,or holding her in my arms I realized I was trully in love with her.I wanted to be with her and protect her all of the time.I guess that after some time I started anoying her with my possesivnes,because she became distant with me.She stoped texting me or hanging out with me as often as she used to and started hanging out with another girl.Thats when my world crumbled down.I became depressed and stressed out all of the time.I couldn't stand to look at her being so close with anybody other than me.My parents noticed that and asked me what's wrong wit me,but I never wanted to tell them.After that plenty of shit happend to me.It was almost like a chain reaction of events.First I started ditching school and i got in a big trouble for that,then my friends read my diary and found out that I'm bisexual,then they told the girl I was in loved with that and she started avoiding me completely,then they started avoiding me and soon the rest of the school as well.The only once who didn't know that I was bisexual were my parents.Since I didn't want them to find out as well I told them that I was in love with some guy with black hair and green eyes.They bought my story and even when the rumors of me being bisexual reached them,they simply shrugged it of as just some nasty lies.Since everything I stated happened I became even more depressed and I started ditching school again.Once my parents found out that I wasn't going to school again they also found out that this guy who I told them I was in love with and used him as a reason for ditching school.Then they started questioning me and asking me questions like:""Where were you when you weren't in school?"" and ""Did you start doing drugs and having sex?""I tried to make up another lie,but they didn't believe me any longer.Now my mother is asking me to tell her the truth.or she will go to the police and school and start questioning everybody she finds suspicious.What do I do? I don't want any more drama in school,but I also don't want to tell her that I'm bisexual.I'm afraid that she will hate me and maybe even kick me out of the house.Does anyone have any suggestions?Any good cover up story that I can use?Anything will be helpful right now.P.S sorry if I have any writing mistakes I'm still learning XD",AskLGBT
Coming out troubles," I recently ( like a few minutes ago) texted my best friend and came out to him. He was pretty confused and doesn't understand being transgender. He hasn't out right rejected it,( which was a relief since previously he has made so transphobic comments), my issue is that I not doing a well enough job at explaining it, because I am getting nervous and losing my train of thought to easily. He was busy and said that he would have to talk to me later, so I would get more time to think what I wanted to say through. So is there anything tips or pre-written stuff I can have only to better explain? also I cross posted this to asktransgender.",AskLGBT
Why is society insisting on labeling sexuality ?,"Back in Ancient Rome :


&gt; ""Homosexual"" and ""heterosexual"" did not form the primary dichotomy of Roman thinking about sexuality, and no Latin words for these concepts exist. No moral censure was directed at the man who enjoyed sex acts with either women or males of inferior status, as long as his behaviors revealed no weaknesses or excesses, nor infringed on the rights and prerogatives of his masculine peers. While perceived effeminacy was denounced, especially in political rhetoric, sex in moderation with male prostitutes or slaves was not regarded as improper or vitiating to masculinity, if the male citizen took the active and not the receptive role. Hypersexuality, however, was condemned morally and medically in both men and women. Women were held to a stricter moral code, and same-sex relations between women are poorly documented, but the sexuality of women is variously celebrated or reviled throughout Latin literature. In general the Romans had more flexible gender categories than the ancient Greeks.

Why didn't we continue in this direction ?

Instead :

&gt;the prosecution of homosexuality as a general crime began in the 3rd century when male prostitution was banned by Philip the Arab. By the end of the 4th century, passive homosexuality under the Christian Empire was punishable by burning.

I want an answer more satisfying than ""religion"".

why would people exchange what they had for religion, what is the drive ? fear ? immortality ?",AskLGBT
Not really sure what I am,"Hey guys, I'm not sure if this is the proper place to post this but I figured many of you have a lot of experience with this sort of thing. I consider myself to be a straight male: I mentally think girls are very attractive. However, when it comes to the bedroom I just can't perform. I don't really think of men in a sexual way at all, so I'm just a bit confused. I don't think I'm asexual because I do definitely have sexual urges, but I when I try to act on them with a partner they go away. I'm sorry if this isn't what this sub is about, since I think I'm straight, but again if any of you have experience something similar, regardless of you sexuality, and would be willing to talk about it either in the comments or in DM, I would appreciate it. And if you know a more appropriate sub and you could point me in the right direction I would much appreciate it. Thank you all so much for listening.",AskLGBT
Help me understand Pansexual,"So I am 23 and bi. I was thinking/researching sexuality for a paper. I clearly understand why I'm not heterosexual and I understand why I'm bi because I like boys and girls but I don't really understand why I'm not Pan. 

From what I have read the prefix Pan means all. So you like everyone. Most websites give the reference of boy, girl, and trans.

But for me, if someone is a TransWoman, meaning born biologically but identifies as a woman, they are just a women. I don't think they need the prefix Trans. So with that in mind I don't understand what the difference is between Bisexuality and Pansexuality is.",AskLGBT
How honest should I be about my virginity?,"Hey there

I'm a 22 years old virgin gay guy. I'm still virgin because of late self-acceptance and self-knowlegment, low self-esteem and because I usually don't go out much. I thought I could look for a parter on these ""social apps"", like Grindr or Hornet. The thing is, every time I point out I'm virgin, the other guy says ""Ownnnn how cute! But your first time must be very special for you, should be with someone you love/know well, and I might not be that special guy"". And then my ""sex date"" gets cancelled. I really think I'd have scored that cute guy if I hadn't said I'm virgin. So, should I keep this a secret?

Meeting new people is hard as f for me, and finding someone that doesn't think I'm ugly is much f'ing harder. What the f can I do to get my sex life started?",AskLGBT
"Really confused about my sexuality, caused break up with boyfriend :(","Hey there everyone, just to start I'm 18 years old and a biological female. As you can tell by the title of this, I have recently been super confused about my sexuality. Here's some background about me and how this all started: Growing up all my life, I always had crushes on boys, but looking back, it should've also been clear that I had a physical interest in both men and women. Even before I knew what sex or attraction was, I found myself curious about bodies (at one point when I was 9 or 10 I thought there was something wrong with me because of how much I thought about and looked at bodies). Anyway, I never had crushes on girls at a young age, but I can also now say that I think most of the crushes I had on guys (even into the current point in time) stemmed from emotional connection rather than physical attraction. That is, I wouldn't find a boy ""cute"" or ""hot"" or really want to date or be with him unless I found myself emotionally attached to him as a friend or something else first. The physical feelings would happen and seeing my boy crush would give me those butterfly/nervous feelings, but only after that emotional connection.
I questioned my sexuality in high school even though I continued to have crushes on only boys, because I also felt something for girls on a purely physical level. At that time, I chalked it up to being bisexual, but didn't come out or do anything about it.
After high school, I got my first boyfriend. He had been my friend for years (we worked a summer job together), and when we started dating, my sexuality wasn't at all in question. I knew liked him and I found him cute and it all just felt right. When we started dating I felt like I was on cloud nine. All of the kissing and cuddling and just being together was so great. Some sexual things happened (like making out and some hands down pants and under shirts), and that was all fine for me too. I liked it and doing this stuff with him most definitely turned me on, and I didn't have a doubt in my mind that he was who I wanted to be with.
After about two months of this bliss, it was unfortunately time for me to move to college. We decided to do an LDR. We missed each other, so after two weeks of me being away he came up to visit me for a long weekend. I had no roommate, and so sex happened. It was good, and I didn't feel anything odd whatsoever (I was a virgin, so it took a few times to get it right, but I didn't feel weird about it or like I was doing something wrong or that wasn't for me.) The weekend was great, I felt like I was living with my soulmate, and then he had to leave. I was sad that I wouldn't be seeing him for another 6 weeks, but I knew that I loved him. However, a few days went by and something just started to feel weird. At first I thought it was just the distance, so I hung on and the second time he visited things were fine, but still something was off with my feelings. I at first chalked it up to distance stealing away our intensity. I also started to find other guys on campus attractive too, so that worried me because I feared that I was losing the love I had for my boyfriend. (I was so scared about feeling something for one particular guy that I deleted him from my Facebook so I would stop stalking him or seeing his pictures on my news feed!)
Then, one day after the second time he visited, I was still agonizing over why I didn't feel right. I don't know what happened, but I had some kind of epiphany: ""What if you aren't straight?"" And this sent me into a complete downward spiral. Even though I had just found men attractive, I also began noticing girls again. I hung on for months hoping that the love I have for my boyfriend would see us through, but I just broke up with him the other day because I still felt like I needed time to freely explore my sexuality. Something just didn't feel right about continuing on with all of the doubts and meh feelings. I feel so sad because I do still love him, I just couldn't deal with the confusion anymore. I felt like the only way for us to have a clear future was for me to take this time, and whatever the outcome of it is will be for the best.
Mind you, I still think I'm some degree of Bi, because I can look at both genders and feel something, it's just that a) the feelings are different for each, and b) right now I feel like I'm overwhelmed by the possibility of women being a part of my sexuality. It makes me wonder if I would've felt right in my heterosexual relationship at all had I felt nothing for guys. I'll admit that I've never really looked at a random hot guy and gotten hot and bothered, but seeing my boyfriend shirtless (even though he was not the most muscular guy) got me excited.
However, my boyfriend's touch rather than anything visual was what really turned me on. Pictures of dicks or pictures of men's bodies don't really do anything (maybe a twinge at most), or even a random hot guy in person doesn't really turn me on. Straight porn used to be my thing (before I ever had sex) and I never had any interest in girl on girl porn. However, I can now find myself just looking at random girls or watching girl on girl porn and getting a very intense feeling, and it scares me that maybe I've been wrong about myself all along.
I don't know if I could love or connect with a girl in the way that I did with my boyfriend, especially because when I am friends with a girl and really close with her, I don't feel that ""crush"" feeling that you might expect from a girl who likes girls. In fact, if I picture a female friend as my sexual partner, even if she is beautiful, I get completely turned off. But I was also having trouble getting aroused by fantasies of my boyfriend too, so maybe that's a moot point. Maybe I'm just more aroused by the female form as an object, but have the ability to find both sexes attractive.
I know the only way for me to figure myself out is to go out and explore and to use this time that I took for myself in order to better get to know myself, especially since trying to sort it out in my head clearly isn't working, but I am honestly just so confused and frightened.
Has anyone who identifies as bisexual ever experienced this? Did your doubts outweigh the quality of your relationship ever? Did you eventually realize you were totally gay/lesbian or were bi with a preference? How did you go about exploring yourself and what was your experience like? How did you eventually know what box you belonged in? I know this stuff takes time and I have to follow my heart, but my heart is honestly pulling me in many different directions. Please help! :(
TL/DR: College freshman girl who was in a straight Long Distance relationship and loved her boyfriend to pieces, but was too confused about her sexuality to carry on. Things in the past point to the possibility of not being straight. Thinks maybe bi, but not really sure. Needs help and advice, preferably from people who've experienced it.

(Note: I also posted this in the ""questioning"" subreddit) ",AskLGBT
Living in a rural area,"Anyone else live in a very remote or rural area? I have a hard time meeting girls, connecting with other LGBTQ people, or going on dates with other women.

My town has a population of about 1300 people. I've never met a girl in this town...I've looked into online dating but I can't find any women near me.

I do date men sometimes so I guess there's that but I feel like I have to settle for only men and completely ignore the full spectrum of my sexuality when I actually lean towards the ladies.

",AskLGBT
"How old were you when you realized you were ""different,"" and what pop culture characters helped you realize being ""different"" is ok?",,AskLGBT
POMOSEXUAL/ROMANTIC,"I am looking to ask of people whom identify as the above.

I have recently been very intrigued by these orientations and am seeing two different definitions. obviously many orientations can be defined differently from person to person but I'm curious as to if these do both relate to these terms or if it is a totally other term I'm thinking of .

the base ""definition"" im seeing is basically not liking labels. rejecting labels. feeling at though labels are not necessary. ect ect

but my question is can this also be used (DOES ANYONE IDENTIFY WITH THESE TERMS BUT ""DEFINE"" IT MORE LIKE THIS) as - I cant label this attraction because I am attracted to a variety of people but the variation isn't clear and I cant particularly ""label"" it another way so I choose this label to loosely define that without specifying any single or group of genders because its not always clear? -

I hope this makes sense :/",AskLGBT
feeling a little lost.,"I don't really know if there's a name for what I'm feeling, but I just wanted to put it out there and see what people have to say.

I recently just figured out that I'm a hetero-romactic pansexual (sexual attraction to anyone, only interested in actually dating girls), but now I'm starting to feel a little different about myself.

I was born a boy, and still identify as male, but I feel like I'll be happier if I had a girls body (boobs and vagina included) and wore girls clothes, even though I still want to go by male pronouns.

Anyone have any thoughts on why I feel this way or if there's a name for what it is that I feel?",AskLGBT
Current mental health screening questions for LGBTQ need improvement: Survey study to help change them,"* Who I am: Mental health researcher and Clinical Psychology Ph.D. student (doctoral candidate) \([My Website](http://matthewpodlogar.com/)\)  
* Affiliation: [Florida State University](https://psy.fsu.edu/~joinerlab/)  
* Target group: **LGBTQ**  
* About: 5 minute screening survey for potential eligibility into an anonymous 1 hour online mental health study and computer matching task. Purpose of study is to improve mental health screening. Study questions ask about mental health and suicide. Participation requires a contact phone number (only for record of participation, NOT linked to anonymous survey data).  
* Compensation: Upon full study completion participants may choose to receive a guaranteed $10 amazon.com gift card OR voluntary entry into a raffle for up to $100 amazon.com gift card. Gift card code sent to an email address participants provide in separate page after study completion.  
* Link: [https://fsu.qualtrics.com/SE/?SID=SV_eXxAKxCe3c4DRdP&amp;rdt=1](https://fsu.qualtrics.com/SE/?SID=SV_eXxAKxCe3c4DRdP&amp;rdt=1)  
  
*This research project is approved by the Florida State University Human Subject Review Board. More information for questions is provided on the [study website](https://fsu.qualtrics.com/SE/?SID=SV_eXxAKxCe3c4DRdP&amp;rdt=1)*",AskLGBT
The White House took down every mention of LGBT from whitehouse.gov on inauguration day,How is everyone dealing with the new administration? Are there any good resources for how to handle it when you see LGBT hate crimes on the news? ,AskLGBT
I have a difficult time articulating my thoughts. How would you answer these questions?,"On top of not being the best at articulating my thoughts, I'm also just really tired. Lately, a lot has been taken out of me. I work with LGBTQ youth, and in the past month two of my patrons were assaulted due to being trans. The second incident happened today, and I spent a long time with that individual so it's still really fresh. Today is also the first day of my week long vacation with family. I don't see them much, but I know they are more conservative than I am and ask me a lot of questions because I work with LGBTQ individuals. They ask questions since they know I work with the community and want to see my insight, not so much to goad me into an argument or anything.


Anyway, today I was asked a lot of questions about the case that just got scrapped by the supreme court. Surprisingly, I had a difficult time articulating my thoughts, and therefore couldn't give a great answer. I mean, I can explain what the bill was about, what decision means, and likely outcomes, but I have trouble answering the more abstract questions. The main question I got that I couldn't properly articulate were ""Well, where is the line to be drawn? Why should things change for such a small percentage of people? I understand the LGBTQ community feels unheard and like their opinions do not matter, but what about the opinions of people who feel this bill is not good? Do their opinions not matter/should they go unheard?""


What would you guys say? I want to be informative and stay calm as neither party is trying to argue, just understand. It may be too late to revisit this topic with my family, but I know I will be getting these questions a lot from others and I want to be able to answer them to the best of my ability without getting caught up.",AskLGBT
I need your advice,"I know somebody only online who has had a tremendous impact on me in a good way and I am planning on writing a good article about them. This will be a pretty formal article. The problem is, I am not sure of this person's gender so I don't know how to handle this situation. If I ask, I don't want to come off as rude, but if I don't, I'm going to butcher the article.

I can't use ""they"" because this is an academic-style article and that is not proper grammar. If I use ""he/she"" or ""he or she"" that is also blatantly pointing the whole thing out. This article is going to be quite long and I will be referencing the person A LOT so if I just repeatedly use their name rather than pronouns over an over again, that will also look funny. This person has referred to themselves in writing as a ""transguy"" before but also has a female name and voice. I guess I'm 60% sure they want to be referred to as a male but not 100%. Please enlighten me, thanks and excuse my ignorance, this is the first time for me.",AskLGBT
How do you meet other LGBTQ people?,"Do you have lgbtq friends either in-person or online?  If so, how did you find each other and become friends?",AskLGBT
What does it mean to be agender or gender-fluid in a world where gender roles are a social construct? I respect but do not understand.,"I give a lot of context here before stating my central question. Feel free to skip to the end.


I want to start out by saying that I completely respect everyone’s gender identity regardless of my level of understanding. I will think of anyone as being whatever gender description that they choose to identify. I’m nearly as leftist as a person can be while holding to the foundations of modern liberal philosophy / not rejecting those foundations in favor of revolutionary marxism (although I do believe strongly that a post-epochal communist system through the eventual phasing out of market systems as the best way to satisfy those Rawlsian liberal aims). But while I respect agender and gender-fluid identities, I feel like I don't understand them. And I'd like to.


I don’t fully understand how genderfluid and non binary identities function in the context of intersectional feminism and binary transgenderism (i.e. transgender men and women).


I feel comfortable in my understanding of binary transgenderism as follows [feel free to correct me]: Gender dysmorphia occurs when a person’s neurological map and internal conception of how their body should be does not match the physical layout of their body. When someone who has a penis and masculine secondary sex characteristics looks down and feels “This isn’t right, I’m a woman” or when you swap in the words vagina/feminine/man. I feel like I have a good-enough mental model of how that works.


I don’t feel like I have a good enough understanding of non binary and gender fluid identities. I can definitely understand how these identities can arise from being physiologically intersex (where it was never possible to check all of the boxes of how the medical community defines male or female sex). But I don’t understand what’s going on when a person who has all of the physiological characteristics of being male or female feels that they have no gender, or when they feel that their gender is fluid over time. This is in the context of the intersectional feminist notion that gender roles—the behaviors society or individuals ascribe to gender—are social constructs and largely arbitrary.


My central question: What differentiates someone who is truly agender or gender-fluid from someone who simply behaves in a non-gendered way, and how do those identities allow people who are agender or gender-fluid to be their truest selves in a way they could not with non-gendered behavior alone?",AskLGBT
How do you prepare for anal? Do you or your partner 'clean' before doing it?,,AskLGBT
Has anyone had a bad experience with a medical professional?,,AskLGBT
am i still straight if i'm interested in a genderqueer person?,"I'm a male, and i'm straight. recently i started to like a genderqueer person (more feminine than masculine). does this still make me straight? i'm genuinely interested.",AskLGBT
"kinda confused, need clarification","this might sound stupid but i follow this person on instagram, and her bio is ""she/they"". why would she want to be referred to as they? im honestly confused",AskLGBT
"My best friend came out as bisexual, and I now have a crush on him","I have a close friendship with one of my best friends, and we often share things with each other that we usually don't tell anybody else. 

Yesterday, he came out to me as bisexual. He told me that he has never came out to someone before. And I'm gay.

I'm feeling very confused at the moment. Part of me wants to confess I like him and hope he feels the same (but could take months before we are both ready), but part of me is worried that attempting to start a relationship will ruin our friendship.

Can I have some advice please?",AskLGBT
Are there people who are both LG and T at the same time?,"Just a random thought I had, but are there people who are trans and also gay/lesbian? Like for example, someone who was born a man but transitioned to a woman, and is also attracted to other women?",AskLGBT
Words to use other than beautiful,"My boyfriend and I have been dating for a little while but he doesn't like it when I use feminine words when talking to him BC it makes him uncomfortable I would like to know if there are any words In the place of beautiful and such? Right now I only really call him handsome.
",AskLGBT
Dissertation questionnaire about gender swapping in online gaming :),,AskLGBT
LGBT Literature,"Lately I've been on the lookout for fiction with LGBT characters and while I've found some (not very much), everything I've read seems to feature some terrific error. Especially with scenes involving bullying or violence. Does anyone have any thoughts, recommendations on good portrayals of LGBT fiction and/or thoughts on what writers could do to portray these issues better?   ",AskLGBT
Just a bit curious about something.,I hope this isn't a rude question but I've noticed gay men are quite promiscuous through personal experience. My question is are lesbian women equally promiscuous? Less? More? I've never really though about it before and would like to know to satisfy my curiosity.,AskLGBT
Transgender and gender as a social construct,"I want to preface my question by saying that I was a neuroscience major in college and believe that there is a neurobiological basis for gender, though socialization plays a major role. However, I'm also aware that there are people that believe the different behaviors of men and women are entirely socially constructed, and my question is directed at them or someone who can speak from their standpoint.

My understanding of being transgender is that you consider yourself to be a man or a women or somewhere in between, and that this doesn't match with your biological sex.  A transgender woman isn't a man that behaves like a woman, but truly a woman in a male body, and vice versa.

However, if gender is entire socially constructed, it seems that gender is just a label for a set of behaviors that society agrees upon, rather than an objective state that one can be. This framework seems to contradict the definition of transgender, which necessitates buying into the fact that being a man or woman is a thing, distinct from just acting like what society calls a man or a woman. How is this apparent contradiction reconciled?",AskLGBT
"Help, really confused","So I'm really confused about my sexuality. I think I'm bi curious, I've wanted to kiss a girl but haven't really wanted to do more than that. If I get a chance to do something with another girl a freak out and don't want to anymore but when I get drunk I get quite curious. I feel a little bit of pressure to try it but I've grown up in a place where it's 'not normal' so I'm even more confused about how I feel. I know I definitely like men as I'm currently in a very stable relationship with one. But why do I keep shying away from it? Am I not ready? Am I not really into girls? ",AskLGBT
Question about topping: What happens when you fuck up and misread whatever cues you're getting from your partner? How do you deal with grey-area breaches of consent?,,AskLGBT
Is anyone interested in sharing their experiences and being interviewed on my podcast?,"I am a straight cisgender male and I host a podcast where I interview LGBTQ people about their experiences. I am an ally and I just want to share your experiences good or bad with the world in hopes that it will bring about the improvement and acceptance of all LGBT people. 

I have 5 episodes out now if you want to listen to see what the show is all about. It's available on [Google ](https://play.google.com/music/listen?u=0#/ps/I5zki3st4rzz7uez7rafgifttvu) and [iTunes ](https://itunes.apple.com/us/podcast/the-straight-up-gay-podcast/id1191090742?mt=2)

I am interested in interviewing any LGBTQ person but I haven't had any FtM transgender people or Gay male guests on the show yet. I would really like to share your story and experiences if you are willing to share them.

You can message me on here or send me an email at major@straightupgaypodcast.com

I hope to hear from you! :)",AskLGBT
How do I write LGBT characters?,"I'm pansexual, but my characters are not and I want to make sure they're not stereotypical or offensive. Amara is 19, she dropped out of college studying physics to take care of her paraplegia(waist down paralyzed)  brother. She's a lesbian, but is really caught in the closet due to her homophobic family. Zove is a female to male transgender teen who is dealing drugs to care for his little sister cause his uncle is neglectful/borderline abusive. No one knows he is he except his little sister. Elyn is openly bisexual and currently lives with her girlfriend. Vert is straight, but isn't focused on love, she's too busy trying to end a big dog fighting ring. Sina is an aromantic who is playing mother to her little brothers after their mom ran out on them when Sina turned 16. And finally Oleti, a straight ecstasy addict. Sorry that's a lot of information, but I'm really excited about this story. Please let me know what I should do either in regards to the LGBT and/or the other parts of the characters past? Any advice/criticism will be really helpful and I'll be really grateful.",AskLGBT
[SURVEY] Sexual Minority Women &amp; The LGBTQ+ Community,"My name is Shelby and I’m a Psychology and Gender Studies undergraduate student. I’m conducting a brief survey on sexual minority women, gender presentation, and the LGBTQ community for my thesis research and would love your participation. I am looking for sexual minority women above the age of 18. Your participation should take about 10 minutes and will enable you to provide your voice in research that directly impacts your community. 

Here is the link to the survey: 
https://www.surveymonkey.com/r/D2FSQY5

If you have any questions, contact me at shelby.statham13@ncf.edu. 

Thank you!
Shelby",AskLGBT
Does wishing I was a woman = Trans,"At the moment, I'm a cis male, who thought he was gay for the longest period of time. I've tried dating many people, and I've never really got along with other men. I've always found it easier to get along with women, particularly lesbians.

Sometimes, I wish I was a lesbian woman. Do thoughts like this make me more likely to be transgender, or is it just thoughts that I shouldn't read into?",AskLGBT
Are there bi men that exclusively top?,"Male here. I've known forever that I am attracted to women, but lately I've found myself attracted to certain types of men. I've always thought that to be attracted to a man you have to want to top AND bottom, but I have always had 0% interest in the latter. Does this kind of bi guy exist normally? Or is it looked down upon generally? Just a bit confused.",AskLGBT
"Using a throwaway-It's long but please read, I need some HELP","Hello LGBT people of reddit! Before I begin, I want to say that if I somehow apologize or offendanyone in any way, I apologize as that is truly is not my intent.  I would say I support the LGBT community, though not actively; I support the right of everyone to be however they are (or choose to be, provided it doesn't hurt anyone w/o consent). If I say something that comes across as insensitive or downright wrong, perhaps I lack perspective on things.  I don't get out much, and don't have many friends (And none of them have been LGBT, to my knowledge. If that weren't the case, maybe I wouldn't need to ask questions here.)  Thank you for any of your input.


First, I'll start with a more general question.  I read an article today about a male country singer (I forget his name) who had just come out via tweet.  In his tweet, he talks about how he's always known that he's been gay, and that as he's coming out, he's never been happier-but in the next sentence he talks about how he got married, had children, and got divorced. Is this common? Because it simply seems wrong to get married to a girl when you know you're gay.  And it prompted some further questions, after some thought.  I've heard and seen people, (particularly on reddit) presumably LGBT, talk about how sexuality can be fluid i.e., changing over one's lifetime; though of course people have always made the argument that it's a choice.  

Which is it exactly? 
Is it possible to get married when straight, then turn gay and desire a divorce? 
I wanted to know: of people that have come out later in life (i.e. after puberty)-were you straight at one point? Did you become gay somehow? Why did it take so long to realize you were gay? 

Part of the reason I ask these questions is because they do have personal implications for me.  I'm a 25 year old man, and I've always been attracted to women sexually and romantically.  Even before puberty, I was very much into girls; and when puberty hit, this was practically all I could think about.  However I've battled depression for a long time now and I've become somewhat reclusive now.  While I am still really attracted to women, I don't feel this attraction to the degree that I did when I was younger and more socially active-since I have normal androgen levels I figure this is due to depression and/or lowered libido. I should mention that I've never even come close to dating anyone-I've been alone my entire life in that respect. 

But then I decided to try SSRI antidepressants-and that's when things started to get weird. Now I've never felt attracted to men in the way that I was attracted to women-I'm not interested in men's bodies, and while I can recognize when a man is considered handsome, there's never been an impulse for me to do anything sexual or have a relationship with a man.  But when I started taking these antidepressants, I somehow started thinking that I might be 1) gay or 2) turning gay. Part of this may have been due to decreased libido from the pills, as that was affecting my ability to masturbate.  But I started getting very paranoid and it was devastating me: I started thinking everyone around me was questioning my sexuality (I've been told I'm an attractive guy-people say I look like christian bale-and I had been spending time in my hometown. I kept thinking others would think it's weird that I'd never dated at all. Looking back it seems I was projecting insecurities, but that doesn't diminish how mind-breaking it was.) And I started thinking that my voice was sounding effeminate (I worried I was slurring s's); and I worried about sitting in a ""gay"" way; worried about how long I was taking to eat long foods like hot dogs, etc. It felt like I was losing my mind. I found some relief when I discovered ""Homosexual OCD"" online-this seemed to describe what I was going through perfectly.


I stopped taking the antidepressants and things returned to normal.  I've felt my libido come back to me some and my mind has relaxed some. (People usually tell me I overanalyze things-I can see what they mean now.) I enjoy masturbating and thinking about women again (thank God).  I'm sorry if I somehow sound like an asshole about some of this.  Honestly I would like to think that I would accept myself if I was gay-as I talked about earlier, I think people should do whatever feels right to them, (provided no one is being hurt) especially if it's really love. But gay stuff doesn't feel right to me personally. (Hell, I wouldn't necessarily mind being bisexual-but not liking girls? I would feel like a part of me was destroyed.) 


But sometimes those thoughts come back to me...I wonder, well, sure, I think I'm accepting of homosexuality, but what if I was personally put to that test? I don't know...it really terrifies me. I think part of why reading about homsexuality OCD helped me is that it talks about how the underlying problem is an obsession over finding proof of one's straightness or gayness, so I knew having these thoughts doesn't help, and I try to push them away.  But something happened recently that made me start freaking out again. (I was a math student so obsessing over proving things is nothing new to me.)  I have a close friend in whom I've confided some information about these issues. It was hard for me to talk to him at first, because honestly I'm not sure I trust him-I was superstitious about talking about this (to anyone) in the first place, but I needed to hear another perspective.  This friend uses pyschedelic drugs (shrooms, acid, molly, etc.) and holds the popular belief that such drugs are ""teaching"" molecules, that they help you learn things about yourself, etc. Anyway the other day he talked about how he thinks that if I took a lot of acid, I might trick myself into thinking I'm gay, but that after a few days it would wear off and I would return to normal. He then talked about how a lot of his friends have come out after dropping acid. Of course I started freaking out about this-as a matter of fact his theory about me had occurred to me before, as these psychedelics are serotonergic like the antidepressants I tried. But again, I started thinking: how can you tell the difference if you're actually gay or you just think you're gay (i.e. ""tricked"" into it)? All those thoughts and memories from that homosexual OCD experience started swarming my mind again.  It's been hell.


Anyway I wanted to ask: has anyone here had an experience involving coming out after using psychedelics? Would you say the psychedelics turned you gay, or that they helped you realize that you were already gay? I would really appreciate any thoughts or input you have.  


I got fired recently and I've been increasingly depressed lately, so I've been considering trying some shrooms, under the right set and setting of course, to hopefully give me some perspective and maybe help me lighten up. (I've had a light shroom trip before and it was a very positive experience-in fact I'd say it was almost like a cool breeze, and I think it was the first in a long time that I felt truly content-of course this was before I started having these crippling thoughts about my sexuality though.) But I really don't want to lose my mind thinking about all this shit.


Anyway-my bad on the length but I think there's not much point in a TL;DR.  I really appreciate any input or thoughts. And again, I apologize if I somehow come across the wrong way. Maybe it's weird to read this from your perspectives. I know you all have your own, perhaps more ""real,"" problems to deal with-maybe you think my problems are trivial because it they're in my head but I feel like I'm losing my mind and I think I need help-I hardly sleep anymore. Please, any perspective you have to offer is appreciated.


Thank you-I wish you all the best.  ",AskLGBT
"I'm trying to start an LGBT+ friendly Venturing (coed program in BSA) group, does anyone have experience with this?","My main problem is figuring out how not to get in trouble for letting trans youth use the right tent and facilities without getting in trouble. 
Also if anyone knows of any online community of LGBT scouters, that'd be pretty helpful. ",AskLGBT
Would any of you like to be a guest on my podcast?,"I am the host of a newly created podcast called the Straight Up Gay Podcast. I am looking for LGBT individuals with interesting stories to tell about their experiences as an LGBT person. I have recorded 3 episodes so far. The first episode is released already, I have episode 2 set to be released this Friday and Episode 3 next Friday.  

You can see what the podcast is about here.

www.straightupgaypodcast.com

And if you want to hear what the show is like before you agree to an interview you can listen to the first episode on SoundCloud here.

https://soundcloud.com/major-straight/interview-with-allison-from-berlin

I am looking for LGBT adults with interesting experiences. Please true events only. I conduct the interviews online with google hangouts or Skype. Each interview is between 1 and 2 hours. I schedule the interviews between 7-9 US eastern standard time (GMT -5) and during the weekends as early as 8:30am EST. 

I look forward to sharing your stories with people in hopes that these narratives help advance the acceptance of LGBTQ+ people.

If you are interested please send me a message on Reddit.",AskLGBT
Has anyone ever been bullied for their sexuality? How did you deal with it?,,AskLGBT
What's the difference between gay and queer in LGBT?,I'm not apart of the LGBT community and would like to know!,AskLGBT
Is there a non-gendered honorific like Sir/Ma'am?,"I work in customer service/retail, and every so often I have a customer who is androgynous/trans/etc. If they are visibly presenting a gender I respect that but I was just wondering if there was a gender-neutral option that was widely accepted? ",AskLGBT
Confused about my own gender,"Hello everyone

So... I'm currently quite confused about my own gender. Three years ago, I thought I was transgender. I thought I was actually female instead of male. My therapist back then said that it was just my autism. Now recently, my best friend questioned me (upon my request) just like a therapist would ask. However, it resulted in me not being transgender, what shocked us both. I've been trying to find out since then why I feel female most of the time then, what we currently know is this;

- I prefer to be female most of the time or in certain situations
- I don't feel anxiety when people call me he
- I envy girls who wear or have stuff that I'd also want
- I would like it if one day I was suddenly female
- even if I was female, nothing much in my life would change 

So, basically I don't mind being male although I do prefer to be female most of the time

While a simple answer would be, go to the therapist, the therapist I had left to somewhere else, and there are no other therapists anywhere close. So, I thought to ask online with people who have more knowledge about this than me. I would really appreciate any help, I really want to get this doubt and confusion out of my head.",AskLGBT
Looking for a good sub for conservative LGBT?,Does one exist or should I make my own?,AskLGBT
"Is it offensive to refuse to use a nonbinary person's preferred pronoun, but still remaining gender neutral?","I know it is considered offensive to misgender a transgender or nonbinary person, but is it considered offensive to use an unpreferred pronoun that is still in line with their gender identity?  For example, if a genderqueer or agender person's preferred pronoun is ""they"", but you refuse to use it and instead opt for other gender neutral pronouns ""ze"", ""hir"", ""xe"", etc., would that still be considered offensive?  ",AskLGBT
Orientation for genitals instead of genders?,"People generally describe their sexual orientations in terms of gender (heterosexual/homosexual/bisexual/pansexual/etc, or, less commonly, gynosexual/androsexual/etc). However, I have noticed that as a general rule I don't actually care about gender at all sexually, and my sexual preferences are more in terms of genitals, regardless of the gender of the person they're attached to. I have never really heard of this being ""a thing"", and I'm not sure if it's because most people actually prefer particular genders as opposed to particular genitals, or if people just claim to prefer men if they prefer penises and women if they prefer vaginas without attention paid to the fact that men don't always have penises and women don't always have vaginas.

So I guess my question is, is being ""penissexual"" or ""vaginasexual"" a thing, or am I just crazy?",AskLGBT
Seeing MTF cousins soon. My brother is nervous.,"Hi, I'm Vanessa. So next week my mom, my little sister, Maya, my little brother, Zach, and I are going up to Orlando to go see my cousins.My little sister is 4 and my little brother is 9. You see we're going up north to see 4 cousins our one cousin Gigi (who Maya has never met but my brother and I last saw her 5 years ago) came out as MTF transgender in 2013. Her name used to be Greg but was legally changed to Gigi in either 2013 or 2014 (not totally sure). 
no its not Gigi Gorgeous tho that would be really cool.
now we are also seeing 3 other cousins Katelynn (age 15), Jordyn (age 17), and her twin Dylynn (age 17) The last time my brother and sister saw Dylynn was in 2014 when she was still male and was named Lucas. In 2014 ""Lucas"" came out as gay (romantically attracted to men) but in 2015 ""he"" came out as MTF transgender. Her new name is Dylynn. The last time I saw Dylynn was when just me and my mom went up north and saw them was in December of last year (this was 3 months into Dylynn's hormone therapy) and she changed a lot. My sister Maya is happy yet confused about the whole situation (she is only 4) now she has never met Gigi so in a way i know how that will go. But she has only seen Dylynn as Lucas and may get confused. Now my brother, Zach on the other hand understands what transgender is and such but is scared. He is scared that he might call Gigi or Dylynn he instead of she or that he might call Gigi, Greg, or that he might call Dylynn, Lucas. Now I know that if my brother does it on accident they will understand as they love us very much and they also know he's just a kid and all-and-all a person. But, Zach is scared that he might upset them or make them feel bad, which will make him feel bad and he says that's something he never wants to happen but is terrified beyond belief that it will. So,my question is how do I help him?",AskLGBT
Gender survey for my school! Please help!,"Hello, all! I am doing a small survey for my school and would like a few individuals to honestly answer one or more of these questions. Thanks!
What is gender defined by you?
At what age do you remember being able to tell the difference between male and female?
At what age did you decide where you fall into what you identify as today?
Where are you from (very general)? Is that area accepting of there being more than two genders?
How do you view your own gender?",AskLGBT
Help understanding non-binary gender,"Hi there, I've been trying to understand non-binary gender for some time now. Is the non-binary approach a complete rejection of gender roles and norms associated with the male/female binary? If so, how are these rejections founded in gender identity?

Any response would be appreciated. Thank you.",AskLGBT
Why do I hear people saying GLBT now?,I'd never heard that prior to like a month ago and now I've heard it several times?,AskLGBT
How come LGBTQIA+ members can be homophobic/transphobic etc? Even when they are those things they fear.,"As a Genderqueer, if I meet say, a dude that uses makeup, I'm going to be really uncomfortable and distant until I know why he does that (e.g he just likes it, he considers it feminine and closer to be a woman, etc).

Now, I do use makeup when I'm alone. But that it's not a phobia or being an hypocrite. Personally that is me being introverted and awkward with someone I don't know, especially because gender it's such an intimate thing.

But having a phobia / hating while being LGBT to other LGBT people is what I don't get.

Why do you think some people are like that?",AskLGBT
I need advices,"I'm very confused about my sexuality, I don't who I am and I think that I am afraid to find out. Do you guys have any advices? Things that you guys did and helped you to find out who you are and be good about that.

And sorry for my english, it's not my native language.",AskLGBT
How do gays decide who gets to be the bride and groom in a homosexual wedding?,I'm gay and my boyfriend and I both want to be the bride. What should we do? ,AskLGBT
Tips for renting as a married queer couple in NYC?,"Anyone have any tips on getting around awkward questions about living arrangements/lease signing with their brokers/prospective landlords? I've been getting a lot of strange assumptions or even suggestions about space use from (especially Hasidic) brokers and landlords. My partner and I kind of feel like we'd be discriminated against (we're also POC) if we live openly in our ""sin"", so for now our story is we're just frugal friends making it work in smaller spaces. Any suggestions?",AskLGBT
Not Sure What to Do,"So I think I could use some advice and I'm not really sure where else to ask about this. So I've been friends with this person for a while, and as we've become closer I've become more attracted to her. I never acted on it because I had thought she was a lesbian. Well we've talked a lot more recently and she tells me she actually just has a strong female preference but there have been a few guys shes liked. She kinda said this in a way that came off as if she might be flirting/implying that I might be one of them. So I thought at this point that maybe something could come of this, but then I learned something else which further confuses me. She tells me that she actually identifies as a man, but probably won't get an operation, and he just tells people he's a lesbian because it's quicker to explain. I found this kinda shocking as he didn't really look/dress like a guy in my opinion, and he doesn't really act like a guy either... Of course thats just my own perception though. I'm personally a heterosexual man. I've never been attracted to a guy other than him, and only to him because I didn't know before and I now have a hard time viewing him as a guy due to his appearance/personality. Now it seems like he's flirting with me, and I can't help but still be attracted to him because part of my brain still sees a female who I find attractive, and have grown quite close to... I feel really confused now. Does anyone here have any advice? I would really appreciate it. Thanks!",AskLGBT
Why aren't LGBT themed books marketed as much as non LGBT themed books?,,AskLGBT
I'm looking for help/advice,Hello I'm a 26 year old male struggling with varying levels of unhappiness day to day that I think are directly tied to gender identity and sexuality. I don't know what Reddit to post on to talk to people. Can someone point me in the right direction? Thank you.,AskLGBT
What does LGBTI etc. stand for?,I know what the first three are but what are the others?,AskLGBT
"Growing up I always heard the phrase ""man trapped in a woman's body"" (or vice versa). I never hear that anymore. Why is that? Is it considered demeaning or harmful? Has there been research that discredits this way of thinking?","I'm just trying to get my head around ""trans"" and make sure I'm up to date on how to discuss this topic.",AskLGBT
"Bisexuals, if you have dated both males and females, what gender do you find to be the better partner and why?",,AskLGBT
"what will the future of gender, race, sexuality be like?",i'm actually quite curious about this one.,AskLGBT
Terminology/etiquette and use,"Probably the wrong sub, but I didn't know where else to ask; am male into females having trouble defining terms. I understand that I would be referred to as cis, but beyond that I get lost. The only definition I know for cis-thing is from chemistry, where cis- means 'on this side' and its rough antonym trans- means 'across.' Like a skeletal diagram of some molecule Thing's isomers:

    H                       H
      \                   /
       Thing         Thing
      /             /
    H             H
     Cis-Thing     Trans-Thing

What I don't understand is how cis- describes preference for a specific gender. If anything, wouldn't it more appropriately describe a gay preference? Why does transgender use trans-? Why isn't 'isosexual' a thing if 'asexual' is, and how do hetero- and homo- fit into all this? Help, I can't words!

Edit: An afterthought, is LGBTQQIP2SAA seriously considered a reasonable term? I don't mean to belittle the components of the acronym, rather the acronym itself; the only reason I can remember it in its entirety is because it has 'IP' in it and I work IT. Should there not be a more rolls-off-the-tongue word/term? Something simple, like how 'black' or 'white' describe a metric *ton* of different ethnicities each and are more or less acceptable to the groups they describe?",AskLGBT
Are there a lot of people that don't like gays?,"Like, I know that there are a lot, but are there as many as people always say, especially in the states? 
I know that's probably a stupid question I just have trouble wrapping my head around how someone could be so not okay with something that's entirely none of their business. call me naive I suppose. ",AskLGBT
I (a gay male) just finally at the age of 23 lost my anal virginity....but now I am confused...,"Hey there everyone. So tonight I was a bottom for the first time. But now I am confused/concerned. Do not worry. I am ok medically. We used protection, I did not get hurt or anything like that.

But my confusion and concern is, I have tried both topping and now bottoming. And to me, neither feels good to me. Topping feels weird and wrong and bottoming feels weird and wrong. My friend I did it with tonight says I might be straight. 

But I know I am not because I masturbate to gay porn, guys turn me on, women don't turn me on, etc...

But if neither bottom nor topping feels good to me. Where does that leave me? I always chalked it up to me not having enough experience because I have had 4 partners in 9 years. And only have sex like once a year or so. So I always just assumed it's because my body is just use to masturbating. 

I don't think I am anything like Asexual, or demisexual because I have a sex drive and I want a relationship with a guy and want to have sex with men. But nothing feels good to me

Do any of you have a similar experience or know what is different about me? Any information would be amazing.

Thank you so much.

Also. If this is the wrong subreddit to ask this. Please point me to the right subreddit. Thank You.",AskLGBT
Any suggestions for a hens night film?,"We're having a hens night for my bisexual friend. She's marrying a woman, so we thought it would be good to celebrate her bisexuality before she ties the knot. 

Unfortunately the other bridesmaid's grandmother just went into hospital so it won't be a huge evening. I'm baking a vagina cake, and we were going to watch Magic Mike. I was just wondering if anyone could recommend a good fun film about a queer relationship we could watch. Any gender of the main characters is fine, she'd be equally happy. A sex scene or two wouldn't go amiss, but she can be a little bit of a prude sometime, so something too pornographic probably wouldn't fly. 

Any suggestions would be super duper appreciated. ",AskLGBT
Pansexual vs bisexual,Can someone please explain the difference to me? To me they are the same but apparently they are different? i just dont understand,AskLGBT
Therapy not working,I have been trying to talk about my gender issues with therapists but it doesn't seem to help at all. I have talked to one back home and one at school and I just go over things I have already talked about and if anything it just makes things worse. I have talked to one therapist for 4 sessions and the other one for 2 sessions. I am probably jumping the gun on this but I was wondering other people's experiences,AskLGBT
"Hi, how do I know what gender I am?","Hi, how do I know what parts of me I can attribute to being masculine and feminine, and what parts of me could add up to being genderqueer / male / female / and non-specific?",AskLGBT
"If you had to put a percentage on the odds that we will be able to develop successful technology to change one's gender identity over the next several centuries, what would this percentage be?","Basically, I am curious about this *exclusively* due to my own personal interest in using such technology. Indeed, I certainly don't care whether or not anyone else actually uses such technology.

Anyway, any thoughts on this?",AskLGBT
Is it possible to be a gay man born into a woman's body?,"You are someone who wants a sex change to male because it feels right, yet you are gay.....How would you be sure that your sexual urges were because you were a gay man, not 'regular' female urges.",AskLGBT
What do you think of this outfit?,"Anyway, here goes:

Black earrings such as these (but perhaps a bit smaller):

https://img0.etsystatic.com/000/0/5875169/il_fullxfull.193075202.jpg

Dark red lipstick such as this:

http://i.ytimg.com/vi/ZXjldXK0OEQ/0.jpg

A tight black dress such as this one:

https://s-media-cache-ak0.pinimg.com/236x/2e/e2/88/2ee288bde37f5f360637f2f85448d546.jpg

And black shoes such as these ones:

http://static5.shop.indiatimes.com/images/products/additional/original/B2109246_View_3/fashion/formals/hush-puppies-black-women-formal-shoes-6546116.jpg

Anyway, how exactly do you think such an outfit would look? :)

Any thoughts on this? :)",AskLGBT
What do you think of this outfit?,"Basically, I am a guy who wants to *strongly* feminize myself and who has transvestic inclinations (Yes, I'm not much of a guy, now am I? ;) ). Thus, once I will actually have the money for this, I would like to *permanently* get rid of as much of my facial hair and as much of my body hair as possible, to get my testicles surgically removed (in large part for sterilization purposes), to get forehead feminization surgery, to try out estrogen HRT and see if I will like it, and, of course, to cross-dress.

Anyway, what exactly do you think of this outfit (which is probably my favorite outfit *ever* and an outfit that I certainly want to *frequently* wear after I will sufficiently feminize myself and lose some weight)? :

Red lipstick such as this one:

http://ghk.h-cdn.co/assets/15/38/1600x800/gallery-1442521039-redlipstick.jpg

Red earrings such as these:

https://s-media-cache-ak0.pinimg.com/236x/6c/3a/71/6c3a71e927c553759a8a31fcf9eb874f.jpg

A tight black sweater such as this one:

http://g01.a.alicdn.com/kf/HTB1OzJmIVXXXXXkXXXXq6xXFXXXP/2014-New-Plus-Size-XXXL-Tight-Turtleneck-Cashmere-Sweater-Woolen-Pullover-Women-Basic-Shirt-High-Collar.jpg

Short red shorts such as these:

https://s-media-cache-ak0.pinimg.com/564x/03/cd/b9/03cdb95a07231f1ee928a6d63ac42715.jpg

Striped black-red knee socks such as these:

http://cdn3.bigcommerce.com/s-9k7zoiw/products/338/images/2140/Black_Red_Striped_Knee_Highs_341_1__75139__88692__24001.1403276221.1280.1280.png?c=2

Running shoes such as this one (but *two* running shoes, obviously):

https://www.jackrabbit.com/media/catalog/product/cache/1/small_image/360x220/9df78eab33525d08d6e5fb8d27136e95/m/e/mens-asics-gel-cumulus-18-running-shoes-color-whitesilverblack-extra-wide-width-size-11-609465289529-01.1617_1.jpg

Indeed, what exactly are your thoughts on my dream outfit? :)",AskLGBT
"LGBT+, do you believe the ""radicals"" in your respective movements may be destructive to your causes?","Just a for instance: The flamboyant ones who intentionally take the ""i am who i am and you MUST accept me"" vs ""i am who i am and just want to be treated equal with equal rights, etc.""

Asking for a essay assignment",AskLGBT
Want to have a chat with anyone and everyone!,"Disclaimer: This message is not to offend or pick a fight with any type of group i simply want to hear out and get a better understanding of all groups, views, and beliefs. 

Hello Reddit! 
    
    I am firm believer in Christianity. Now a days Christianity has a very bad reputation in the media, for good reason. Many people claim to be Christians when in reality all they do is hate, judge, disrespect and tear down everyone in their path. As a Christian there are certain things that go against my faith, such as homosexuality. Hear me out! I'm not here to say what is right or what is wrong all i want to do is talk and hear about the experiences that you have had with people who's beliefs differ from your own. I want to hear about how people (from both sides) handled these discussions. Yes, i am a Christian, but i also love people. I want to know how I (and other religious communities) can do better in order to make this world a better place.
  
Much Love!",AskLGBT
Would this originalist argument for same-sex marriage work?,"First of all, I am very well-aware that, at this point in time, this debate is (thankfully) completely academic and will (thankfully) almost certainly remain this way forever/indefinitely. :) (Also, Yes, I certainly support legalized same-sex marriage nationwide.)

Anyway, though, I have previously read an article by Ilya Somin where he argues that bans on same-sex marriage are unconstitutional because they are a form of symmetric discrimination based on sex and are thus unconstitutional on the basis of the 14th Amendment. For the time being, I am unsure of the *originalist* merits of this argument since I have never heard or seen any evidence that the 14th Amendment originally applied to any *symmetric* discrimination based on sex. Of course, I am certainly going to research this issue more. :)

However, would this originalist argument for same-sex marriage work? :

If a U.S. state (pre-Obergefell, obviously) would have passed a law that would have invalidated the marriages of an ""opposite-sex"" couple where one of the parties transitioned and got a (legal) sex change, then this law would (or, at least, should) have been struck down as being a violation of the Fifth Amendment's due process clause, correct? After all, based on current scientific and medical knowledge, there is *no* rational basis for a law which invalidates the marriages of people who got (legal) sex changes, correct?

If so, then this appears to raise an obvious equal protection question (even from an originalist perspective): If *some* same-sex marriages (between consenting adults, obviously) should be legally valid, why exactly shouldn't *all* same-sex marriages (between consenting adults, obviously) be legally valid?

Indeed, considering that the original meaning of the 14th Amendment appears to have defined interracial marriage bans as being unconstitutional (the 1883 Pace v. Alabama U.S. Supreme Court ruling appears to have been a deviation from the 14th Amendment's original intent), why exactly wouldn't the 14th Amendment (even from an originalist perspective) have also applied to my example above (based on current scientific and medical knowledge, obviously)?

Anyway, any thoughts on everything that I wrote here?

Also, please don't try to ridicule me for this post of mine; after all, I am simply trying to learn more. :)",AskLGBT
"Hello, Everyone.","So, i was wanting to watch Logo's New TV Show, Finding Prince Charming, But, Sadly, i was unable to.

As you'll might know, i live in my parent's home, And my mother was present with me when i asked her that i wanted to watch the show.

She said yes, and i switched it to Finding Prince Charming, and she had this horrible facial expression and i had to change it before she turned around from the tv screen and looked at me.

""Do i put shows about Lesbians?!"" She said to me, I told her no, that it's just a show and there was a huge hype on twitter for the show, so i wanted to watch it. She said that i'm crossing the line with her, and that she dosen't like that i'm watching ""the gays"" 

She went and took a shower, me crying since i have no idea what I've done to offend her, i just wanted her and i to watch this show. 

When she came out, she told me that to watch it when she's not here, and that i need to learn how to ""respect her"" 

Idk what to do guys, Have i done something wrong? This only happened a few minutes ago upon the post of this thread.",AskLGBT
"Can You Correct My Word Choice, Please?","Hi there!  I am 37 years old, cis female, bisexual.  I'm not really part of the community, as bisexuals are not welcome where I'm from, but I certainly don't want to be offensive.  It's been called to my attention on Reddit recently that my trans word choices are outdated.  Please help me out.

Transvestite-  this is the word that got me into trouble.  Back in the day, this meant a cross-dresser.  Not a transgender person, but a cross-dresser.  I once dated a man who found it sexy to dress up in ladies' clothing, but he was a cis male and happy with that.  He called himself a transvestite.  What is the new word?  Is cross-dresser still an okay word?

Transexual- I think this word has fallen out of fashion or become offensive.  I don't use it anymore.  It used to be what we now call transgender.

Transgender- a person who was assigned incorrectly at birth.  I get this.

""Tranny""- always a slur, do not use ever.

Trans- I have seen transgender people use this shorthand, but I don't know if it's acceptable for me to use it, so I type out transgender every time.

Please help.  I'm kind of older and am surrounded by straight people in my life, but I don't need or want to piss people off online.  Is there a new glossary for this somewhere?  I think I have a good grasp on all the variety that exists, but I'm behind on what words are used.",AskLGBT
My crush came out as trans; what does that make me?,"About a month ago, a person who I've had definite feelings for since a couple years ago came out as trans (MtF). Heretofore I've only been interested in males (I'm a female, by the way) but that fact that I now know her as a female doesn't change my feelings for her in any way. Does this mean I'm bisexual, or something similar?",AskLGBT
How can I teach my daughter sexual morals?,"My daughter fell into darkness a year and a half ago when she started dating women. She is a vampire with a thirst for lesbian sex. She comes home drunk and brings tattooed women and crackwhores to bed with her, and they are loud all night long. 

If I kick her out, she self harms and attempts suicide until she gets what she wants. She is so spoiled, it is crazy. To her,  being an adult means doing whatever she wants with no consequences. If I take her to a shrink, she fakes being normal and claims I'm the abusive one.  ",AskLGBT
I Just need some help or advice or anything.,"I'm hoping this is the right outlet to post this, and that it doesn't come off as too much of a sob story or anything. I Just need some advice and I'm ready to move on with my life. I Am 25 year old gay male living in Chicago with a unique cultural background that is making ""coming out"" extremely hard to do. I'm in a very dark place emotionally right now, that I've painstakingly avoided thinking about for around 10 years since I knew I was gay at the age of 15.

&amp;nbsp;

Recently both my grandparents I was closest to passed away within a 2 month span (this June and earlier this August). I was very close to them and never really knew how much I needed them until they were gone. They both deteriorated before my eyes and it left me in such a bad and lonely mental state that I'm not close to being over, the way they both passed was just torture to watch, and I honestly don't care to relive it by typing it out.

&amp;nbsp;


Also a few weeks ago my Cat which was the only living thing I felt close to anymore apparently ran outside while I wasn't home. I Searched for hours daily to find him and even posted ads online and posters around the neighborhood but still wasn't able to. I Was barely able to grieve for any of the losses because they were so back to back. 

&amp;nbsp;


I never officially came out to my grandparents, but I think they knew something, before both of them passed they separately told me something similar without knowing what the other had said. and that was to ""forget about everything else, and just be yourself and live your life"" basically. They told me this alone and to my knowledge they didn't hand out any deathbed advice to any other family members, I couldn't even process what they told me because I would be helping to arrange their funerals days later.

&amp;nbsp;


I Know they told me this for a reason and I want to do right by them and move out from my parents house and come out, I just know it's going to be so hard because I have a lot of hurdles in my way. this is where the advice I desperately need comes in. I Don't feel comfortable at home anymore. Since my grandparents don't need me, I feel nobody does. my family treats me so poorly and I know everyone is having a tough time right now but it was even prior to any if this.

&amp;nbsp;


They have good reason to in their eyes, They either know that I'm gay and in my culture that's a huge no, I'm afraid they would kick me out if I came out to them or that'd I'd be homeless. I keep refusing to have an arranged marriage and am already considered embarrassingly old to be unmarried in my culture, I'm not going to destroy two lives by marrying a woman just to please everyone in this culture that has caused me such grief since such a young age.

&amp;nbsp;


I Want to be educated, I want to get my GED and I want to have a normal job and live a normal life and defy tradition, in my culture american education is considered shameful and typically doesn't go passed middle or elementary school. I Was taken out of school in the 4th grade to learn our traditions and stories and language which although I can appreciate them, they are useless in the real world.

&amp;nbsp;


I Am basically freeloading, with no education and no job and just a few things I do for a cash (selling on ebay) maybe they resent me because they have to support me lately since my grandparents have passed. I Don't want to give them that excuse anymore I need to get out.

&amp;nbsp;


I Don't have anyone to turn to, no friends, no family anymore that I feel I could trust or that would care. I managed to save a little bit of money secretly to eventually get out but I owe a lot to some funeral expenses on a credit card and have zero job experience, I don't even know where to start with that.

&amp;nbsp;


I've had social and general anxiety problems for a long time, which I'm sure are related to my struggles with my sexuality and my family issues. I'm worried I won't even know how to talk to someone that's not my ethnicity, I'm afraid they will think I'm strange, or dumb, or awkward. And since I can't rely on my family how am I going to rely on strangers when they could assume the worst of me.

&amp;nbsp;


Sorry this was so long, it honestly felt good typing it out and I've been avoiding it for a while. Sorry if the spelling or grammar is an issue, like I said 4th grade education.

&amp;nbsp;

I Plan to move out or at least become more independent before Winter, I just need to know if there is place that can help me do that. or someone I can go to, or talk to, or a way I can get a job without any degree or experience. If I walk into a LGBT center and tell them my story as anxious as that makes me, will it help anything? do they have programs or am I too old now? I Just don't know anything and would appreciate any advice or life lessons right now. 

&amp;nbsp;


thank you.

",AskLGBT
Why are there so few gay guys with long hair?,"Maybe my impression of this is completely wrong and inaccurate, but I noticed that, in contrast to lesbians (a good number of whom appear to be butch to some extent), there appears to be few gay guys who have long hair.

Indeed, am I wrong in regards to this? Or am I right in regards to this? If I am right in regards to this, what exactly is the reason for this?

Also, for the record, I *extremely strongly* apologize for *any* ignorance that I might have on this topic. However, Yes, this is certainly a completely serious question.",AskLGBT
Ideas for bracelets I'll be selling for charity at a Pride event?,"So, I've got some basic ones that say things like ""bisexual"" ""who i am"" ""yaas queen"" etc... and some that are a little more risque, like ""ooo daddy"" ""boytoy"" ""sissy boy"" ""cocksucker"" 

So what do you guys/gals/others think? Do these seem offensive? What would you want yours to say?",AskLGBT
Do any of you believe in a gender binary as an LGBT?,"I hope this doesn't come off as bigoted, it's just something I've wondered. I have a pretty open viewpoint  (as much as a straight male can). I  fully accept those in the LGBT community ad equals but I've always seen gender as binary, in the sense that there is only male or female. I do believe you can identify as the opposite gender from which you were born, and think it's perfectly fine to change to that which you identify as, but that there are only the 2 options.

I'm curious as to what the feelings and opinions are on this in the community.",AskLGBT
What differences in yourself have you guys experienced after Coming Out?,"I'm really interested in writing a piece about ways Coming Out changes your life. I had a very smooth coming out process so I do not remember many huge changes. So I want to hear from people who's experience wasn't so smooth and how they feel now vs. before they came out.

Can't wait to hear from you all, this is a Safe Space to talk about any story you wish. No matter the subject matter.

I can also talk to you via skype/email if you prefer? Just let me know

XoXo
Andrew - Owner - OKImGay.com",AskLGBT
question for butch and masc-of-center women who are bi or sometimes go for men,"hi redditmos! I'm a queer, kinda femme male who likes butch women (and some men). I'm in a happy, committed relationship but my partner and I both date people on the side. Aaaand I kinda don't know how to find butch women to date. I go to queer events in NYC but I don't tend to flirt with women there because a) I don't know who is bi and b) I want to respect that most women in those spaces don't want to have men hitting on them. So, for bi or queer women who sometimes date or have sex with men: where do you meet them? Do you brave okc or tinder? Through friends? At bars? Any suggestions?

In case it helps: I'm 30s, thin, average height, am guessing people in my social circle would rate me as 'pretty cute' (like not gorgeous but I do okay) and funny. People usually read me as gay unless I'm, like, standing next to my partner. ",AskLGBT
Anyone know what sexuality I am?,"If I don't explain something well, I'm sorry in advance. This is something I've never talked about.

I know what I am, but I suppose I don't have a label for it, which I'd like to have to maybe feel like a part of a community or something.

So I'm a man -- that is I was born with male genitalia. I'm attracted to women sexually. I'm fairly good looking and masculine, and have been with a few women, and so I'm more than confident in my attraction towards them. I am not attracted to other men. I really want to be a woman though. I don't know what it is... it's not that I feel I was *meant* to be a girl at birth, but it's just something I'd prefer over being a man. It's not even necessarily that I want to have female organs or anything; it's more that I just want to be an attractive woman in terms of figure and appearance. If I outwardly looked like a girl but happened to have male genitalia, that wouldn't bother me. It's not enough to just dress or act like a girl, which I've tried a couple times... that is I've seen crossdressers (sorry if any of my terminology is offensive, this isn't a topic I actively indulge myself in) and I don't want to be one, unless they're incredibly convincing in appearance. If I could press a button and wake up a sexually attractive woman I'd press it. Were I to be a woman though, I don't think I'd only be attracted to girls. I fantasize about being with other men, but only as an actual woman. I don't find it sexually arousing at all to picture myself with a man, or myself posing as a woman with a man.

Reading this back I realize I've specifically mentioned that I want to be a sexually attractive woman, or a woman that I currently am attracted to, and I suppose that's very important to me. The actual lifestyle my sisters and female friends live doesn't appeal to me... I'd probably still stay at home and just watch movies or play video games, just maybe do it in girly clothing.

If I can be more specific anywhere I'll try to be, but this is the best I can muster for now. Is this kind of mindset typical of bisexuals or transgendered people? 

Thanks in advance.",AskLGBT
I Mustaché you a Question,"I find that a lot of lesbians and bi women have an infatuation with mustaches. Many of my queer female friends wear them whenever they get the chance to dress up, and one even has a tattoo on her finger (I hope you get the image). Has anyone else found this to be true. And if so, why do you find this to be so?

Please note: From a bi-male perspective.",AskLGBT
Am I Bisexual?,"Hey everyone, I know this question might have been asked for thousands of times but still I don't know what is my sexual oriantetion and I wanted to ask you.

So, yesterday I had a dream which I was with a girl gendered friend of mine and a guy friend of her. Suddenly mine and that guy's hand met and I felt a strange emotion it was like love and ecstasy. I felt really great and strange at that moment. But in my normal days I usually don't dream about guys and I know that I like girls. So since I felt really great about that dream does it mean that I might be a bisexual?",AskLGBT
I am struggling to find a label for my sexuality. I'm not sure if anyone else relates to this but I choose what I want to be attracted to. Is there a label for this?,,AskLGBT
"[Survey] Have you ever had a relationship disapproved of by friends or family? Have YOU ever disapproved of someone else's relationship? Can you think of a couple that you think is pretty perfect? If you said YES to any of those, we want to hear from you!","Have you ever felt that your friends or family disapproved of your relationship?
Have YOU ever disapproved of the relationship of one of your friends or family members?
What about approval? Have you ever approved of someone else’s relationship, or had them approve of yours?
If you answered YES to any of these questions, we want to hear from you!

Our brief on-line study is open to everyone over the age of 18, and we are interested in hearing from people of all backgrounds, genders, sexualities, and those with diverse relationship experiences.

All participants will be entered into prize draws, and those selected for additional follow-up studies will receive additional compensation for their time. Please spread the word to others who might also be interested!

Survey Link: https://www.surveygizmo.com/s3/2833426/c173d7b4d660",AskLGBT
Not sure if this is the right place for this but I want to introduce BDSM to my relationship,"Just to give you a little background info, I'm a girl in a relationship with another girl. I'm bisexual, pretty feminine, and I've always been into bdsm because the first person I had sex with introduced me to it. My gf is kind of a tomboy, she's had sex with a lot of different girls but she's kind of conservative in that the sex was always very vanilla and that she almost never had anything inside of her. 
Anyway, we talked a little bit about trying out new things during sex and she's totally willing to try just about anything with me with me but she's reluctant to be a Dom if it means any kind of spanking/punishment although I am turned on by it. She also said that she would probably be okay with having me be a Dom and give her light spanking/punishment. Even though I'd prefer to be a sub, I'm willing to change positions to introduce her to bdsm. 
Obviously the first step is to talk about the subject again and more in depth. But that being said, any suggestions on the best way start being a Dom and introducing her to BDSM?

tl;dr: any advice for a girl trying to introduce BDSM a Dom to my gf ?",AskLGBT
do you wish you knew your biological parent/s?,"hello, i was wondering, those who have been raised by two parents of the same sex, do you wish you knew your biological parent/s?
i have been watching a debate about marriage equality and a childs apparent right to a mother and father. do you think being raised by same-sex parents was good or bad for you? do you wish you were raised differently? i am curious to hear from those directly affected by this issue. anything you would like to share would be greatly appreciated :)

thank you x",AskLGBT
[Survey] LGBTQ Research - Seeking participants for short survey on Pulse Shooting &amp; Discrimination,,AskLGBT
[22y/o straight M] Unusual dream. Am I not simply straight?,"So recently I've been in a 'don't want to be social mood'. I rather not be around people and I wanna sleep a lot. I know these are signs of depression. So don't know if I got it or not (I think I have these moods more often).

**you can skip this 1st 'quoted' paragraph, it's not that important to read.**

&gt;So against my will, I already agreed to go to a dinner party, so I went. I knew more people there, but me, another guy and a girl formed a group of three and mostly talked with eachother. The guy is pretty masculine (a bit fat, taller than me and very hairy) and the girl is as well (short hair reaching her chin, talks in a pretty deep voice, movements are also masculine). There was this one moment when I was saying that I'm a skepticist and I don't always believe what the majority or the minority says and am open to both conventional and unconventional ideas. The dude started interrogating me pretty aggressively about the global warming. I said that there seems to be a global warming indeed, but that since the earth has always been warming up and cooling down, I wouldn't bet my money on the assumption that we are the cause of this global warming. He pulled some numbers out of his ass saying 98% of the scientists agree it's our fault and then asked if I was agreeing with the 2% and my response was ""that's the thing: I don't know."" At that point I was so overwhelmed and didn't have the energy to fight back, nor did I want to strongly identify with something and 'resist' what was happening. I wasn't scared and knew he wouldn't harm me, so I didn't 'defend' myself and just kinda spaced off from what was going on. After that response he was still talking, but I couldn't understand anything of what he was saying, I didn't want to argue. So my response became automatic and continued saying ""I don't understand you."" When he kinda backed off, when he started making it less personal aimed towards me, when he more started talking about 'himself' and 'his believes' is when I could start to listen again and understand what he was saying. (I think this was some subconscious defence mechanism of myself, to not get into a verbal fight.) He no longer felt the need to attack my believes, or change my believes, but simply started stating his. From the start of his interrogation though, I felt uneasy and knew he wasn't asking this out of curiosity, I knew there **had** to be a reason why he was asking. And so apparently he eventually said that he thought something should be done about the global warming, wether we know we are the cause of it or not (but he does believe we are the cause), and that that is the reason he came with his bike instead of car. My thought still is: you do you and let me do me, but apparently he felt like I should do what he wants me to do, or maybe he got way too focused and he now realises he went too far... I don't know if he realises his own mistakes...

Anyways, I think it's the underlying aggressiveness of him towards me and me not *fighting* back that caused this unusual dream:

In this dream that same guy grabbed me firmly, clearly making himself bigger than me and me making myself smaller. He said things like ""you are so fucking pretty"" (only thing I can clearly remember him saying), being very focused on me and 'wanting me' holding me aggressively and not letting go. This clearly shows some similarities with reality: where he was also aggressively focusing on me, although in the reality it had nothing to do with sexuality nor with him 'wanting' me. In the dream I felt very feminine, I was still myself, but so submissive, powerless, unaggressive, that even though I still looked like a guy, I was feeling like I was a girl. Now here comes the weird and unusual part: when he said that I was so fucking pretty, I actually liked it. It felt good. I liked being wanted, I liked feeling like an attraction. So much so, he completely lost his sanity and had to hold me and have me. It was so raw and honest, it felt real, it didn't feel fake or like he was manipulating me, he honestly wanted me. (nobody has ever wanted me so bad in a very long time, or at all.) He couldn't control himself. 

After that initial good feeling, it quickly turned though. His animalist aggressive focus and hold on me was no longer acceptable (like any girl would feel as well). It started feeling like he was unrespectful towards me, so eventually got out of his grip and whenever he gravitated towards me again I made sure that he couldn't get to me.

All this is so unusual to me. I never felt this ever in my entire life. I think I finally understand girls. This is how they must feel like. Both what it feels like to be wanted so bad and what it feels like being overpowered by pure raw sexual energy. (because I have been overpowered by non-sexual energy of course, when I was bullied for example, I think everyone knows how that feels.). I understand that guys can get girls by showing their animalistic and strong attraction towards them, but also giving them space and showing they can control theirselves and respect the girl's choices and don't make them for them (freedom).

#I don't know what this means. Who am I? What am I? What do I want? What do I need?

Some extra information:

- I have purposely not looked at porn or fapped in 9 days so far. (maybe that causes me to have less testosterone and maybe that's why I am able to become more submissive and maybe because of the lack of sex, I can enjoy being submissive?) I was planning to not fap for a week and the week after I could fap, but still not look at porn. But I'll still not fap for as long as I can/want.

- I've always had fetish for guys transforming into girls (only if they're pretty girls). It even turned me on when Jafar transformed into Jasmine in Aladdin 2, when I was still a little kid. Naturally that interest turned into a fetish for transwoman/shemales now. (on the screen though. I don't know if that interest still exists if I ever met one in real life.)

- I don't feel like I'm a woman inside (something transwoman say they do and did since birth). Although I've always wanted to be able to transform into other people, both women and men, well attractive women and men. (mostly to experiment with) But still be able to transform back into myself.

**tl;dr** I dreamt that a guy dominated me. that I became submissive and powerless. He held me so I couldn't get away. He said things like ""you're so fucking pretty"" and it felt good when he said that. He honestly wanted me (badly). This or something similar has never happened to me in my entire life. After that initial good feeling, I felt disrespected though (could be compared to rape) and eventually got him away from me. What does this mean? What do I want?",AskLGBT
Serious question for homosexuals.,"As a bit of context beforehand, I don't say this to demean anyone in any way, but I just want to let you know where I am coming from.  I am a straight man, 24 years old, and full disclosure I strongly disagree with homosexual behavior and I view ""transgenderism"" as a mental illness, but I recognize and support your rights to do whatever you want in your own life so long as it doesn't negatively impact the lives of those around you.  Now that you know what my general viewpoint is in case you care at all, here is my question, and I ask it very seriously because I am genuinely curious.

Why do many (certainly not all but many that I have personally encountered) homosexual individuals exhibit strong traits of the opposite gender?  That is, why do many homosexual men act extremely feminine and why do many homosexual women act extremely masculine?  It seems to me, and obviously I wouldn't know because I'm straight and that's why I'm asking, that most homosexual men would act hyper masculine and most homosexual women would act hyper feminine, because if you are homosexual then doesn't that mean you as a man are attracted to other men, or as a woman are attracted to other women?  So why would you act more like a member of the opposite sex if you are trying to attract the attention of other homosexuals of the same sex?  

It seems like if I were gay, a man acting very feminine would be a big turn off, just as I, being a straight man, find a woman acting very masculine to be a turn off.  So that is my serious question, why do many homosexual men act hyper feminine and many homosexual women act hyper masculine?",AskLGBT
How often...?,How often is it that people get back together after a break? I know she's doing it to help herself out and she's working on problems. She said to give her a week. She had me promise that she wasn't going to lose me. But it's possible to love someone and not want to be with them. How likely is it that people get back together? ,AskLGBT
Who am I?,"hi, I am a male and I have always been mentally and physically attracted to girls /women. Still do. I used to watch straight porn. But of late i started watching trans, gay, bi porn too. And now comes the problem. I have this intense urge to suck cock. I am not attracted to men or boys in real life. Am not attracted to their bodies, but i am attracted to cocks. So its nothing in the mental or emotional level of attraction for men but a carnal desire to suck cock. Simply put i am getting attracted to penises but not the man. I masturbate thinking of sucking cock and taking in my ass. I had one homosexual encounter in my school days when we mutually masturbated with my close friend, thats all. I have my usual share of sex with girls and still do. So why do i have this urge? Am i bi or gay or straight? How do i get rid of this urge?",AskLGBT
Am I [24M] gay when I have a sexual 'red mist'?,"I have always enjoyed having sex with women. However, I suffer from an extremely high sex drive, where I enter into a red mist which prevents me from concentrating on other matters. This red mist then makes me want to fuck something, anything. 

This has happened several times, and it has lead me to have fascinations of being with another man. When I have the red mist, I become extremely submissive with thoughts of being used. This is despite me being a dominant during hetero sex.

Eventually, I acted on this a couple of years ago. I met with a guy who fucked me in a public place (super exciting). I enjoyed blowing him, but didn't enjoy anal or receiving a blowjob. I have cammed with tens of guys, being extremely kinky.

This wouldn't happen unless I have the red mist. I have sometimes wondered whether there is a medical issue here due to a uncontrollable sex drive.

Despite my absolute love for women, does this make me gay/bisexual?

When I think about it logically, I'm interested in sex with guys but I couldn't imagine being in a relationship with a guy. What are your thoughts?",AskLGBT
"A m/f trans person is a female transgender, right?",I always wonder if I have it right. It goes by the gender they identify with correct? It should.,AskLGBT
Gender Identity Help,"Hey, I'm new here... I made an account because I have been struggling with gender identity for as long as I can remember. The older I get, the more complex and stressful this becomes and I don't have anyone to talk to about this so I'm hoping someone can help me... P.S.: Please forgive me for writing such a long post, it's all been bottled up for so long that I don't know where to begin and where to end. I'm sorry for that. 

I'll start with, I don't know what the heck I am. Never have. The best words I'd give when asked to discribe my feelings is Alien or Misunderstood. The thing is, I was born assigned female... Ugh, even associating myself to that word makes me cringe for some reason. Not because I have any problem with women, so don't bite my head off, please.

I have never understood gender when it came to myself and others. I remember in elementary school I would wonder why some kids dressed and were treated differently then others like some would wear dresses or pink and had long hair and others jeans, tees and short hair and were treated rougher. I never understood why people were treated different based on their physical bodies. It made and still makes no sense to me. I don't see boys or girls, men or women, I see people. That's how I've always felt and always will.

However, when it comes to myself I don't know what to think. I'm tormented by assumptions based on my physical appearance that I am female. My blood boils and I feel like I'm going to jump out of my skin, scream or break down and cry every time I'm called ""miss"", ""ma'am"", or ""lady"" and ""young lady"", ""her"", ""she"" and ""mom"" which people refer to me as when speaking to or about my dog (I know right?), and so on. The same feelings apply when I'm called my given / legal name even though I'm constantly correcting everyone and writing notes for doctors to call me Elle... though recently I've been identifying more with my middle name, Kai. To make matters worse, the most recent time I was misgendered and by the way, I now totally relate to Britney Spears and why they did what they did, I immediately went home, grabbed a pair of scissors and cut off more then half my hair (it was just under two feet long). I have to say, I did feel a little better like I was reborn or something after that and yet I still had feelings of punching that poor cashier.. and the misgendering continues. 

I can't even get into the bathrooms sign issues. I have panic attacks any time I see ""male"" and ""female"" bathrooms. I just stand there in between both doors and freeze for a moment before walking away and getting strange looks so I've learned to avoid bathrooms at all costs which in turn causes me to be even more antisocial. 

Speaking of antisocial, I have always been bad with people. I couldn't connect to anyone and never had true friends, just people I'd occasionally talk to and only really if they approached me. That said, I have always gravitated to guys ever since I was an infant according to family members. Be it family, other kids or even doctors and store employees when I need to ask a question. I could talk for days to guys about the deepest shit but never a woman. 

I am more ""masculine"" in my demeanor and appearance as far as fashion goes however I realize I will never physically pass as a man nor do I fully want to, I don't want to look like any gender per se, I just want to be a person. I can't relate to woman, or the feeling or definition of being a woman, just occasionally can seem ""feminine"", whatever that means. 😒

As a kid I use to obsess over my body. I use to be slim, flat chested, toned and boyish. I loved it. Then and out of no where my body changed and my life as I knew it felt like it was over. I'd wrap my chest in an ace bandage, limit my food intake to get my smaller butt and legs back because no matter how much I worked out they still aren't like they use to be, would wear baggy clothes to hide my curves and could barely look in the mirror without wanting to cry and scream at my self that I'm hideous. I remember thinking about removing my ovaries and chest before I even knew there was such a surgery for that (for some reason even mentioning the word ""breasts"" bothers me). 

Currently, I am taking natural hormone balancers because my hormones have always been unstable which makes me sick and pharmaceutical ones make me even more sick... but don't feel I could go through with reassignment surgery as its irreversible and I am not fully a male or female and most times not female at all. I don't even know what those words mean but by societies standards that is all I have to go by. I can't be one or the other, I'm not one or the other but I'm not neither and sometimes I'm not any at all. 

I don't know what I am or how to explain it and it's driving me mad!!! How can I love myself if I don't even know who I am? How can I love another? How can they love me? 

I'm a mess. I'm confused and I'm scared. This is the loneliest feeling and it's utterly terrifying. 

Please be kind as I am very sensitive about this and can't handle any more hatred or judgment. I'm just looking for someone who may have experienced something similar and / or anyone who can shed some light on what I'm going through and how to help. I'd greatly appreciate it because I am at a loss. ",AskLGBT
Etiquette for addressing someone who I believe used to live as a he and now lives as a she?,"I'm a noob to r/asklgbt, so I apologize if I unintentionally use an incorrect term or something. Also, I realize this kind of question has almost certainly been asked many times before, but I'm not sure what exactly to search for in terms of situations relevantly similar to mine, hence my creating this post.

There's an engineer contractor with whom I periodically work, and I've been told by multiple people who have worked with her for many years that she is transgender and lives as a she now (originally lived as a he from what I understand). However, I don't know for sure that this is the case, and various people (sometimes the same people) alternately refer to her as a he or she (in e-mail or in conversation), probably because they're not sure what to do either.

What's the proper etiquette for something like this? Is it safe to assume she's living as a woman now and would prefer to be referred to as a she based on her appearance, her mannerisms, and what I've heard about her now living as a she, or would that be a mistake? Basically, I don't want to continue any awkwardness for her that I and others may have perpetuated in the past, and I have very little experience with LGBT protocol since I don't know any LGBT folks who have changed from living as a he to living as a she or vice versa, and I don't have any close friends who are LGBT in general (other than a bisexual friend, but he isn't very familiar with LGBT culture).",AskLGBT
What do you think about the world queer?,"I'm from the Netherlands so I never heard the word growing up. Untill I read a story about two gay/bi boys in the '30/'40. The story wasn't very accurate about what gay people went trough back then and also wasn't very clear about their sexuality, just that they liked each other.

So from that point I thought that queer was a word that was used it the past to discribe gay people. Which isn't the case. I honestly was shocked by how often the word is used and it's meaning in Dutch. I was reased by Catholic parents who always said gay people were unnatural, which I never believed. Maybe my thoughts on the word queer are because gay people were earlier accepted in society then in the US, maybe I'm wrong. What do you think?",AskLGBT
Consequences of Sexual Reassignment Surgery (x-post from asktransgender),"I am a male-to-female transsexual that began living as a woman full-time at the age of 18, also began hormone replacement therapy at the age of 18, and underwent sexual reassignment surgery by Dr. Suporn of Thailand at the of age 24. I have had remarkably successful results even by his own admission.

I am now 28 years old and am happier than at any point in my life. I can have sexual intercourse with heterosexual men without using any artificial lubricant and without them having any suspicion of me having an unusual sexual history. They are often in genuine disbelief even after fully disclosing it to them.

After the surgery, I noticed a slight deterioration in my mental health as to which others can attest. I definitely experience somewhat more anxiety, depression, and affective instability.
As for physical effects, I have lost almost all of what little muscle mass I had before the surgery.

I am not asking for professional medical advice with regard to any problem whatsoever, but am asking because I am very curious as to what others believe the physical and psychological consequences are of male-to-female sexual reassignment surgery.

I am not asking because I am disappointed in my experiences or have any regret, but rather a due to a genuine curiosity from a scientific and medical perspective.

The reason I feel the need to reach out to various communities on Reddit is because those like me have a very, very unusual endocrine environment. Unlike 99.99% of humans on this Earth, it is my understanding we have almost no androgens in our body whatsoever (please correct me if I am wrong) and our entire supply of sex hormones (most often estradiol, as it is in my case) is synthetic in origin and administration.

Due to the fact that we are in such a small minority of the population (even with respect to the wider transgender community), there is almost no published scientific literature on the subject of my inquiry. Therefore, I am willing to hear even anecdotal subjective experiences and complete medical speculations.

In light of this, even if it is just your opinion, what do you believe are the physical and psychological effects of male-to-female sexual reassignment surgery?

If you feel you have anything to offer, please do not hesitate to comment!",AskLGBT
"Issues with ""bisexual"".","I find it kind of difficult to understand what 'bisexual' actually means.
 
On the one hand it is treated as its own orientation- similarly to heterosexual and homosexual, and is said to describe people who are attracted to partners of more than one gender. 

 On the other hand, it is also used as a ""catch all"" term for those who might not fall completely neatly in ""straight"" &amp; ""gay""- as in ""predominantly hetero- or homosexual"", ""homoflexible"" etc. 

So to me it looks like those people actually have another orientation- homosexual &amp; heterosexual respectively, but fall under 'bi' due to maybe being more flexible.

I find this incredibly confusing, because it how can bisexual 'be its own orientation', whilst at the same time also referring clearly to other orientations, just not as rigidly expressed. 




",AskLGBT
I think I might be bi,"Asking for advice here rather than /r/relationships since the advice is usually shit there. 

I (20M) have recently been fantasizing about having sex with other men. I don't really know what to think of these urges or if I'm going to do anything about them. I have been in a relationship with my girlfriend (21F) for 4 years and I plan on marrying her in the near-ish future.

Should I tell her my feelings? I know I probably should at some point, but idk how she will react. In my mind, ideally, I would like to have something like an open relationship where we can see other people. 

I would be willing to stay monogamous with her since she's very important to me, but I feel like I'll have urges to be with other guys at some point.

I guess I just have a lot on my mind right now.",AskLGBT
Asexual?,"Based in Orlando, we film a small, new series called Gay Code and we're looking for people who are asexual to be guests on an upcoming episode to answer questions and spread awareness on one of the lesser known sexuality on the spectrum. If you're asexual, live in Orlando, and would like to help out, shoot me a message!",AskLGBT
Can you answer these criticisms against the LGBTQ community in Korea.,"So I'm korean, and in korea it is not illegal to be gay. However it is not legal to have a gay marriage. 

Many in Korea are a bit conservative. Their traditional background and lack of knowledge of the gay community is one of the primary reasons why. The rise of christianity is also something that is making the gay community in Korea less and less relevant. A lot of people do have questions and criticisms that are keeping them away from supporting the LGBTQ community. Here are some criticisms, and I'm wondering whether you can answer them. 

These are questions/criticisms that come up in every article in Naver that are about the LGBTQ community. I believe the majority of these criticisms are the general criticisms and sentiment conservative people have against the LGBTQ community in Korea. 

1. Anal sex will give you a higher possibility of getting AIDS. 
2. We've seen the Gay Pride festivals in the middle of the streets at Itaewon, I've seen gay people holding food shaped like penises, wearing nothing but underwear running across the streets, how are we supposed to support these kind of activities
3. It's not illegal to be gay in Korea, so do we really need to have LAWS to allow gay people to have sex and marry? 
4. Our country's suffering from low pregnancy rates, imagine if we allow people to be gay. Lower pregnancy rates hm? 
5. Don't you care about the men in the army suffering from gays? (?) 
6. Stop telling me to accept gay values(?), I personally have the freedom to deny that being gay is right. Why are you forcing me to accept you by trying to implement laws down our throats?

Most of these come from today's article about an interview with parents that have gay children. 
http://news.naver.com/main/read.nhn?oid=028&amp;sid1=102&amp;aid=0002318508&amp;mid=shm&amp;cid=428288&amp;mode=LSD&amp;nh=20160517205524&amp;m_view=1

I myself can answer several of these myself, but as a straight person, I probably haven't researched much like you guys so... 

It'd be great if the answers are clear, thorough and detailed. If stats are needed, please provide them too. 
",AskLGBT
What does it mean for a child to be trans?,"There was an article this morning about an 11-year-old child in Canada whose father was ordered to treat her as a girl. That reminded me of a discussion my wife and I had... what does it really mean for a young child to be trans? 

A lot of young kids (younger than 11, even) don't really have a concept of sex or sexuality, so when a very young child says that he identifies as a girl, what does that really mean? Is it truly a reflection of his gender, or is it a reflection on our society's gender norms? 

Is he saying, ""I feel like a girl"" because he is honestly gender dysmorphic, or is he saying ""I feel like a girl"" because he's simply not interested in the things that society tells him boys should be? I am completely on board with the idea that older people can truly have a sense that their body's gender doesn't match the gender of their mind/soul/whatever-term-you-prefer, but I'm not sure what it really means for a child, who doesn't really have a sense of gender to begin with.",AskLGBT
"What is the appropriate way to discuss past memories, in the sense of gender pronouns?","My daughter has a friend she met as an 8 year old girl. We lived there for 5 years. After we moved away, my daughter has found out that her friend is now a boy, and has changed names as well. We're a very open family, and have had gay friends as long as the kids remember, so this didn't shock us or anyhing (a little surprised though, she was a real girly girl)

Now at 14, he lives mostly as a boy, but once in a while still dresses as a girl. Even when dressing as a girl though (i mean in a dress and high heels, hair as a girl although cut short) he still uses his boy name, and intends to be treated as a male.

But we knew her as a girl. Although my daughter texts back and forth with this individual and interacts on facebook, my memories are all as a girl, and so are my daughters. When we discuss things the 10 year old did, it's natural to refer to him as a girl, and by his girl name.

Are we right in doing so? I've also got a 9 year old son who's asking questions, and pronouns are a tricky issue. It's doubtful we will ever see this person again (geography), but I want to make sure that if we do, we don't offend him.

Thanks.",AskLGBT
How do you guys feel about neurogenders?,,AskLGBT
"Which trans-friendly therapists, if any, work with United Healthcare insurance?","Basically, I'm an aspiring eunuch from Orange County, California who is trying to find some trans-friendly therapists who work with United Healthcare insurance. After all, I want to try getting at least one therapist letter before I will actually get an orchiectomy. :)",AskLGBT
"Hey all! Euro askLGBT, I want your opinion!","Hello beauties, 

I'm French and currently working on a research project on the **perception by EU LGBT of their rights situation in their country**. 

Every year, [The Rainbow Index](http://www.ilga-europe.org/resources/rainbow-europe/2015) publishes a report which ranks each EU country based on their handling of LGBT rights and issues. I want to find out whether these results reflect reality. I would love it if you could help me do that.

If you live in **any European country** and you're interested in giving me a hand (hehe) for this project, here are questions you should answer (you can PM me your answers if you'd rather):

You can access the [survey here](https://www.surveymonkey.com/r/TNKPC8S)

* 1- How do you **perceive** the state of LGBT rights in your country? (Let me know how you feel on a daily basis at home and **where you are from**)

* 2- How do you **reach this perception**? (What means do you use: personal experiences, social media, news, organisations...)

* 3- Are you **familiar with** the Rainbow Index?

If there is anything else you'd like to add, please feel free to do so! 

I'm also available on Kik for a chat, find me on: JoWhte.

A million thanks and hoping to hear from all of you soon! Don't hesitate to ask questions.

*Smooches*",AskLGBT
Is there a *guaranteed* way to ensure that a person who already got an orchiectomy *doesn't* have *any* extra testicles?,"After all, this *does* appear to be a real condition:

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Polyorchidism",AskLGBT
"Would transgender people say they are a different gender than is generally associated with their birth sex, or a different sex than their birth sex?",Is this distinction made?  Is the distinction that gender is an identity and that sex is exclusively a physical attribute?,AskLGBT
How to get my sister to stop assuming someone's sexuality?,"I was telling her that I had a bisexual friend and she randomly brought up my cousin and said she wishes my cousin could be ""more honest with himself"". She thinks he's gay/bi. There's never been any indication, not that there needs to be, but he's dated girls all his life, he's 26, and if he came out, it'd be a pretty big shock.

Tbh it'd be cool if he was gay, I obviously don't mind haha, but it's the fact that she was so sure he was in the closet and needed to ""be more open with himself and his feelings"" that pissed me off. Who is she to say he's gay/bi/not straight?

How do I help her understand that assuming anybody's sexuality is wrong? Or, is it not wrong? ",AskLGBT
[Nearly 9/10 Studies on Relationships Exclude GSM - We Want to Change This!] ~~Seeking Participants in Relationships For Online Study On Sexual Problems and Sexual Well-Being~~ [Master's Thesis Project],"#I am a Master's student in Clinical Psychology at Queen's University, and my passion is in conducting inclusive sex research and making sure that LGB&amp;T voices are heard in research. I am currently completing my master's thesis that looks at how different couple constellations negotiate and navigate sexual problems.   

#We are currently recruiting participants in intimate romantic relationships who have been dating a minimum of three months for an online study on sexual problems and sexual well-being. We are looking for participants in ALL relationships with any level of sexual satisfaction, with or without sexual problems or concerns. We greatly appreciate everyone who is able to participate and/or able to help us spread the word.   

#Thank you for your help in conducting inclusive sex research! *****To participate visit: https://surveys.psyc.queensu.ca/SWBR.aspx ~Note: There is also a 'save and exit' button in the survey if you would prefer to complete it over multiple sittings.",AskLGBT
Advice...I don't know who I am,"I'm 35 years old and for most of my life I have identified as bisexual, but I have always felt there was something more or something missing from me and my sexuality. I'm slowly coming to the realization that I may be gender fluid. I was born a male and I'm physically male, but I don't always feel male or even want to me male. I often times (right now and lately) have a desire and yearning to be a woman. It's more than a desire. It seems like it's more of a need right now. I'm 35. I should know who and what I am by this stage of my life. Am I the only one who still has questions about themselves and who they are? How do I figure out who or what I am? I'm just so confused and lost and alone. Any advice is greatly appreciated.",AskLGBT
"SURVEY: Stigma Experienced by Transgender Individuals from Mental Health Providers (18+, Transgender, Live in US)",,AskLGBT
"Do post-op MTF women retain their prostate? And if so, do you still have to get regular prostate exams?",,AskLGBT
Help me understand my sexuality please,"I'm a m 18 y/o. I know for sure that I like girls- I get off to female porn, I've had legitimate crushes on both girls in school &amp; female celebrities since I was a toddler, etc. etc. But, I'm wondering if I'm also somewhat interested in boys.
Here's where it gets tricky, I've never had a crush on a boy whatsoever. All my guy friends are just that, friends, who I've never even looked at as more for even a second. I've never watched a movie, or looked at a magazine or anything and been like ""wow, that guy's attractive"" (which I often do with girls). BUT, I do kind of find penises attractive- occasionally when masturbating I'll decide to not look at female porn, but rather to look at guys.
So I'm trying to figure out my sexuality. Am I just straight with a little bicuriousity? Am I bisexual? Something else? Thanks in advance for your help",AskLGBT
Question about insurance reimbursement,"I've got a question about insurance reimbursement--I (an aspiring eunuch) have talked with Erin Pollard (using e-mail) in regards to getting some therapy ahead of my orchiectomy. However, what disappointed me was that Erin said that she doesn't accept any insurance directly; indeed, Erin said that she can only provide me with a reimbursement form. Thus, what I am wondering is this:

Exactly how much money do reimbursement forms allow one to get back?

Any thoughts on this?

Also, here is another question--did anyone here use Erin Pollard as a therapist before one's surgeries? If so, then what exactly do you think of Erin and her therapy services?",AskLGBT
[Repost] Sexual Minority Women's Health Research,"Participant Recruitment Post

We are a research team at the University of Nebraska-Lincoln and the University of Florida conducting a study about the life experiences of bisexual, lesbian, and queer women. We hope that with this study, we can contribute to the understanding of the experiences of sexual minority women. Your participation is essential to achieving this goal, so we hope that you will take part in our online survey study.

In order to participate, you must: 
• Be 18 years of age or older 
• Identify as a woman and as lesbian, queer, bisexual, pansexual, gay, or any other sexual minority orientation. Anyone who identifies as sexual minority and as a woman (including trans* or gender nonconforming individuals) is invited to participate. 
• Reside in the United States

If you would like to participate in our study, you may click this link: https://unleducation.az1.qualtrics.com/SE/?SID=SV_8v5FMx6tSgHDCdL

Your responses are anonymous and your data will be removed from the server soon after you complete the study. Depending on your privacy settings, the Internet host you are using may track and save user actions. For example, social networking sites may record and maintain information about the sites and pages visited and links activated while within network. It is possible that they may use that information, linked to your identity, for marketing purposes or provide it to third parties. You may access the survey outside of a social networking site by cutting and pasting the link above into a new web page.

If you have any questions about this study, please feel free to contact us using the contact information listed below. A list of local and national resources will appear at the end of the survey for anyone interested in additional support. This research study has been approved by the University of Nebraska-Lincoln Institutional Review Board (UNL IRB# 20151215698EP) as well as the University of Florida Institutional Review Board (UF IRB# 2012-U-0639) Please feel free to pass on this message to other individuals who might be interested in participating as well.

Thank you very much in advance for your time!

Sexual Minority Women’s Health Research Team

Elliot Tebbe, Ph.D. 
University of Nebraska – Lincoln 
Counseling Psychology, 
Department of Educational Psychology 
Email: etebbe2@unl.edu

Bonnie Moradi, Ph.D. &amp; Alex Lenzen, M.S. 
University of Florida 
Counseling Psychology, 
Department of Psychology, 
Email: moradib@ufl.edu",AskLGBT
Acceptance of David Bowie in the US in the '70s?,"Bit of an odd question, but it's one that just came across my mind recently.  I know there were people in the US who loved Bowie then (my dad's old high school theatre director was one), but was he *accepted* much for his personality when he came out?  I remember reading that quote from him where he said something like he thought Americans wouldn't accept him because he was gay.

As a comparison, there are plenty of Kanye fans who admit he has said some stupid shit, but they love his music anyway because they can separate the man from the music.  Was it similar being an American Bowie fan in the '70s?",AskLGBT
[Repost] Sexual Minority Women's Health Research,"Participant Recruitment Post

We are a research team at the University of Nebraska-Lincoln and the University of Florida conducting a study about the life experiences of bisexual, lesbian, and queer women. We hope that with this study, we can contribute to the understanding of the experiences of sexual minority women. Your participation is essential to achieving this goal, so we hope that you will take part in our online survey study.

In order to participate, you must: 
• Be 18 years of age or older
• Identify as a woman and as lesbian, queer, bisexual, pansexual, gay, or any other sexual minority orientation. Anyone who identifies as sexual minority and as a woman (including trans* or gender nonconforming individuals) is invited to participate. 
• Reside in the United States

If you would like to participate in our study, you may click this link: https://unleducation.az1.qualtrics.com/SE/?SID=SV_8v5FMx6tSgHDCdL

Your responses are anonymous and your data will be removed from the server soon after you complete the study. Depending on your privacy settings, the Internet host you are using may track and save user actions. For example, social networking sites may record and maintain information about the sites and pages visited and links activated while within network. It is possible that they may use that information, linked to your identity, for marketing purposes or provide it to third parties. You may access the survey outside of a social networking site by cutting and pasting the link above into a new web page.

If you have any questions about this study, please feel free to contact us using the contact information listed below. A list of local and national resources will appear at the end of the survey for anyone interested in additional support. This research study has been approved by the University of Nebraska-Lincoln Institutional Review Board (UNL IRB# 20151215698EP) as well as the University of Florida Institutional Review Board (UF IRB# 2012-U-0639)
Please feel free to pass on this message to other individuals who might be interested in participating as well.

Thank you very much in advance for your time!

Sexual Minority Women’s Health Research Team

Elliot Tebbe, Ph.D. 
University of Nebraska – Lincoln 
Counseling Psychology, 
Department of Educational Psychology 
Email: etebbe2@unl.edu

Bonnie Moradi, Ph.D. &amp; Alex Lenzen, M.S. 
University of Florida Counseling Psychology, 
Department of Psychology, 
Email: moradib@ufl.edu",AskLGBT
Help determining orientation please,A male friend is attracted to females but finds that their personality is more important than their physical appearance. Is there a definition for this? I've just done some searching but can't find anything that fits.,AskLGBT
Two questions about facial androgynization surgery,"1. Does facial androgynization surgery actually exist? After all, I myself might very well eventually be interested in such surgery if I will actually be able to afford it. :)

2. How exactly would such surgery be handled for a person such as myself (specifically a person who previously had extremely intense surgery done in order to eliminate his extremely large underbite)?

Any thoughts on these two questions of mine? :)",AskLGBT
Open Relationship Discussion,"Some relevant background on my relationship with my boyfriend. My boyfriend has a very high sex drive, it seems he is always thinking and talking about sex. I, on the other hand, am the opposite. It's not that I don't want sex or never think about it, I just don't want to have it nearly as often and it makes my boyfriend feel guilty that he wants it so much. I have tried to ramp up the frequency of sex in our relationship even in times when I didn't really want to have sex to see if it would make him feel better. It didn't, and I should have seen that outcome from the beginning but I learned my lesson.

Recently I have been thinking about opening up our relationship so he could satisfy his sexual needs without feeling guilty that he's pressuring me. We haven't done it yet because I want to be absolutely sure that this will work and it won't break us up. I have been reading some articles about open relationships and the different triggers of jealousy and I have found that my fears and triggers are actually very common among those in my position, but I'm afraid I won't be able to control my jealousy. I want to be pushed out of my comfort zone in hopes of helping him but I don't know if I can do it alone. I was hoping to get advice from people in open relationships and see how you manage it. I'm not here looking to be told 'no' because before this, I would tell people the many reasons not to do an open relationship and so I know the risks. But I would like to know the potential benefits (besides the obvious) so I can make a truly informed decision. I need all the help I can get so any comments would be greatly appreciated. Thank you.",AskLGBT
"(X-post from /r/askscience) How does the hormonal treatment for FtM Sexual Reassignment Surgery work? Also, if a cisgender guy had the same process done, would he become a RedPillian wet dream/überman, or would it have little effect?",,AskLGBT
Who would you want to see as entertainment at a Pride event?,"I am trying to help with some ideas for entertainment for a Pride event. I am slightly out of touch with what's hip in the lgbt world of entertainment.
We have had previous contestants from RuPauls drag race - but I was hoping to do something more fresh and not to beat that horse to death.

So like the title says, what lgbt entertainer would draw you out to a Pride event?!",AskLGBT
Can the doctor who will perform my orchiectomy also remove *both* my *entire* vas deferens *and* my *entire* epididymis?,,AskLGBT
Any other lesbians with eating disorders?,I struggle a lot with food and with my sexuality. Sometimes I don't know if I'm physically attracted to a woman or jealous of her body. Does anyone else struggle this way too?,AskLGBT
Lesbians who live in Asian countries: what is it like?,,AskLGBT
Will insurance cover the cost of all of my visits to a therapist?,"For an orchiectomy recommendation letter, that is.

Also, for the record, if this isn't obvious already, I myself am an aspiring eunuch. :)",AskLGBT
"If I'm sexually aroused by the thought of me personally having a vagina, then am I trans?","Basically, I'm trying to figure this out. As you hopefully know, I am an aspiring eunuch who wants to be sterile in an infallible way as well as who was to have a strongly feminized body and a strongly feminized face. Plus, I want to cross-dress sometimes (but certainly not all of the time), though I generally prefer male pronouns.

Anyway, I am sometimes extremely sexually aroused by the thought of me personally having a vagina. (Also, though, I certainly enjoy getting erections using my penis and having penis-in-vagina sex; indeed, I am certainly strongly leaning in favor of having me permanently keep my penis.) Frankly, what I am wondering about is this--does this extremely large sexual arousal make me trans, or what?

Any thoughts on this?",AskLGBT
Is there a term for this...?,"Okay so I have a rather peculiar situation, at least in my experience... but I figured the best people to ask about this would be the LGBT community.

So I am a man, and I am invariably straight. I have never felt sexually or romantically or any of the other -ally's (barring platonically if you can really count that...) attracted to another man. But recently I've found myself attracted to another individual (not physically, mind you, as the relationship is solely long distance and I've never seen what they look like) who is also male and is not transgender'd, otherwise I really wouldn't be asking this  question.

To put it bluntly, I've basically fallen in love with the person in their skull and no farther, and I believe the feeling is mutual. Not sure if romantically or not but that's not the topic of discussion right now. We both suffer from depression, loneliness, and the idea that we are both unlovable, though we both care deeply about each other. To make this more comfortable for both of us, we've agreed to pretend, as it were, that he is female (which I've asked him numerous times if he's comfortable with, and he has confirmed that he is happy with what our odd little relationship has become.)

tl;dr: I'm male, and I'm in love with a man, but I'm not gay. Is that a thing? Please help me understand this. (And please do not try to convince me that I may actually be gay or bi, this is a one-of-a-kind experience for me, and the thought of myself being in a relationship with another man is extremely uncomfortable for me.)",AskLGBT
I'm confused,"I have a friend that I'm very close to we are both straight males. He is younger then me but we get along as if we where the same age. I don't know what to make of our friendship. It's not like any other normal friendship, he talks to me like I'm his girl. I pay his phone bill, buy him shoes, clothes and food. I stay with him at his family's house because it's easier to get to work and we sleep in the same room and bed. His family doesn't think anything weird and we don't make it weird, but we do sometimes spoon unknowingly. If we are just hanging out and his cousin cooks i will make his plate bring him something to drink and if he runs out go refill it. I have to make sure he is comfortable and has everything before i sit down and eat. I wash his and my clothes every week and clean his room daily, because he gets mad if he comes home to the room dirty. If we have a argument it last for a long time we end up texting each other for over a hour until we solve the problem or one of use says we are done and don't wanna be with the other person. He will speak to me like I'm his girlfriend I have to tell him when I leave where I go. I'm just confused he has a girlfriend and they are serious but I don't know where we stand. Is he using me or is this a type of bromance. I mean I do everything a girl would do for him beside the sex. Am I reading to much into this or does he have other hidden feelings and is to masculine and straight to admit it. To be honest if he wanted to be more than friends I think I might just go for it. I like woman and want kids and a family but there is something about him that I can't explain. We can look at each other and not say a word but I know what he is saying or he knows what I'm saying. He knows when I'm mad at him or just in a bad mood and he will tell me things like, "" when I come back in this room your attitude better be different and you better act right"". I'm not sure if it's normal but we have been going strong for a year now. Is this more than a regular friendship",AskLGBT
IAma Gay teen who Grew Up in Saudi Arabia . AMA : casualiama,,AskLGBT
Difficulty understanding difference between ____sexual and ____romantic,"I've heard that people can be attracted to certain genders sexually and different genders romantically, such as being pansexual but heteroromantic, but I can't seem to fully wrap my mind around this.

  + How does a romantic but non-sexual relationship differ from a close friendship?
  + To anyone who has differing sexual and romantic orientations, what does it feel like to be attracted to someone romantically but not sexually, or vice versa?
  + How does one determine whether their attraction to someone is sexual or romantic?",AskLGBT
Is there a term that defines a woman who is only attracted to transgender men or gay men?,"I am a therapist and I work a lot in the LGBT community.  I had a client ask me today if there was a term that describes this type of sexual orientation.  I told her I didn't know of a specific term that describes this but informed her that pansexual is a term I know is used to describe an individual who is attracted to another person without regard to their sexual orientation, gender, biological sex etc. 

Is there a term to describe this type of attraction?  I've never heard of one and would love to be educated if there is a term I'm not acquainted with.",AskLGBT
Determining my orientation?,"For some time now I've been unsure of the label that best suits my sexuality. I think I've gotten a pretty good idea of what's going on with my orientation, I just don't know what to call it, and I haven't heard about anything like this elsewhere before.

Basically what it boils down to is, I'm only attracted to females but only interested in sex with males. I never seem to think that men look attractive at all, but I am extremely turned on by the idea of having sex with men. On the other hand, I do find women attractive in what seems to be a purely visual sense, but have no interest in sex with women.

Is there a term for this, or hopefully is this at least a thing that is known to happen? I keep trying to tell myself that I don't need a label for my sexuality, but it's so confusing that there doesn't seem to be a label that is anything close to what I feel (""gay"" and ""straight"" are both pretty much correct in one sense and pretty much incorrect in the other).",AskLGBT
Does it feel better to masturbate as one sex over the other?,,AskLGBT
Questions for same-sex parents and/or kids of same-sex parents,"I hope this is the right place to ask this.  I found r/samesexparents but most of the posts on the front page there are months old and that sub seems pretty dead.  I have some questions I just kind of got to wondering out of curiosity, and my [last thread here](https://www.reddit.com/r/AskLGBT/comments/3ylr36/question_about_terminology/) got some good responses I really appreciated.

So obviously every couple is different and does things differently, but...gay dads or children of gay dads, do your kids grow up having a relationship with the woman who carried them?  Do your kids even know who the woman is?

Also, lesbian parents/kids of lesbian parents...do you tell your kids which of you carried them?  Obviously--and this applies to the previous question as well--they'd figure it out if they end up being the spitting image of one of the biological parents or the other, but I'm thinking about when they're little.  It occurred to me that it would be extremely interesting to do a study about kids of lesbian mothers to see if they--without knowing which mother carried them--were more likely to develop a closer relationship with the ""carrier.""  Obviously, it'd be a super difficult--and likely unethical--study to really carry out since you'd have to find a way to somehow control for the various parenting techniques of each parent.

Anyway, I'd love to hear your stories!",AskLGBT
Curious about orientation name.,"I'm 22 years old male and I've always considered myself straight, no questions asked and no doubts. My taste in porn is quite varied, I'm sure many would find disturbing. I can get off to Beastiality, Transsexual, lesbian, bisexual, (rarely gay) and of course straight porn.
When porn doesn't quite cut it and my imagination is lacking, I have found anal stimulation to work wonders (though I haven't achieved an orgasm through it.) What I'm trying to figure out is the name for my ""sexual orientation"" or whatever. I don't find men attractive, never have. I do find sexual acts done between men arousing, (but usually with a woman accompanying,  very rarely can I actually sit through a gay porn video without feeling not aroused.) The idea of having sex with a man doesn't bother me, and I sometimes fantasize about it, but never kissing, that grosses me out but the idea sucking a penis doesn't. I'm still a virgin though, as I'm too insecure to actually get involved with a woman romantically (due to feelings of inadequacies, but those aren't what I want to discuss). What I want to know is if there is a name for this grey area I fall into and what people think of it, as I've never really met anyone (who was willing to openly discuss this).",AskLGBT
"""Autotransgynephilia""--an appropriate description/label for me?","OK; anyway--I certainly know that transphobic bastards and idiots have unfortunately made [b]a lot[/b] of false and awful conclusions about the concept of ""autogynephilia,"" such as the false idea that ""autogynephiles"" are all men with fetishes and the awful idea that ""autogynephiles"" should be prevented from transitioning. :( Indeed, such transphobic bastards and idiots are certainly [b]extremely[/b] vile pieces of scum and should [b]extensively[/b] educate themselves about transgender people as soon as possible! :(

However, even a broken clock is right twice a day. Indeed, while the concept of ""autogynephilia"" should certainly be reexamined (to put it mildly), I [b]do[/b] feel that the concept of ""autogynephilia"" and specifically ""autotransgynephilia"" applies to me personally. (Indeed, I am only talking about myself here and what I say here should certainly [b]not[/b] be applied to [b]anyone else[/b].) To elaborate on this, while I have certainly come to terms with who I actually am (an aspiring feminine eunuch) and would certainly be [b]extremely[/b] pleased and satisfied if I will become an actual feminine eunuch (both for sterilization purposes and due to my own love of femininity and detestation of masculinity), I would also sometimes cross-dream about the idea of me being a trans-woman (Yes, specifically a trans-woman)--just like I currently do. :) Indeed, for some reason the idea of me being a trans-woman, as well as the ""boy-to-girl transformation"" itself, [b]strongly[/b] appeals to me in a way that being a cis-woman [b]never[/b] appeals to me. Also, I would like to point out that my cross-dreaming is primarily [b]non-sexual[/b] in nature nowadays; indeed, while I was certainly a transvestic fetishist in my younger years and still exhibit some traits of transvestic fetishism today, the sexual arousal in being a woman or in wearing female clothes just [b]isn't[/b] that important to me nowadays. :) Heck, even if I was asexual, I would still cross-dream [b]a lot[/b] about the idea of me being (or becoming) a trans-woman! :D

In addition to all of this, though, I certainly prefer male pronouns over female pronouns. Also, while I certainly want to have a [b]much[/b] more feminine body [b]and[/b] face than I currently have, I also generally have no problem interacting with men, presenting as a man, and acting as a man. Indeed, my ideal preference would be for me to get surgically castrated, possibly to take female hormones, to [b]permanently[/b] get rid of as much of my body hair [b]and[/b] facial hair as I can, and to make my face as androgynous as Andreja Pejic's face was before her transition or as androgynous as Stav Strashko's face is (in other words, barely enough to pass as a man, but no more). :) However, in spite of all of this, I still want to be viewed as a male-to-female cross-dreamer (indeed, when I told one of my university teaching assistants about my cross-dreaming, she asked me if I was transgender, and I certainly wish that I could have [b]honestly[/b] responded to her question with a ""Yes"" instead of giving her a more middle-of-the-road type of response) and I certainly want to alter my brain/mind (either temporarily or permanently--we'll see) to make it more female if such technology will be developed in my lifetime and if effective anti-aging technology (and especially a cure to aging) will also be developed in my lifetime (of course, I also [b]strongly[/b] hope to croygenically preserve myself after my death and to eventually get revived at some future point in time, so yeah). :)

Thus, do you think that the term ""autotransgynephile"" and/or the term ""autotransgynephilia"" applies to me? Completely serious question, for the record. After all, again, I would certainly absolutely [b]love[/b] to become a very feminine eunuch; however, even after I will (hopefully) become a very feminine eunuch, I would still often wonder if the ""grass would have been greener on the other side""--in other words, I would still often wonder if I will be even happier if I was a trans-woman. :)

Anyway, any thoughts on what I wrote here?

Also, Yes, even with all of the tragic and unfortunate discrimination that trans-women currently face and endure, I certainly envy lesbian and lesbian-leaning trans-women! :D Yes, you heard me--I said ""envy"" here! :) After all, while some/many trans-women would have preferred to be cis-women instead, I myself would certainly want to become a trans-woman if the technology to change/alter my brain/mind existed and if effective anti-aging technology (and especially a cure to aging) will be developed during my lifetime. :) Also, No, this is certainly [b]not[/b] self-hate; after all, while I certainly want to become a very feminine eunuch and certainly like very feminine eunuchs, I don't see why exactly I can't like lesbian and lesbian-leaning trans-women more than I like feminine eunuchs (as in, to the point of me eventually preferring to become a lesbian or lesbian-leaning trans-woman myself rather than for me to become/remain a very feminine eunuch indefinitely--if I will ever actually have such a choice/option, that is!).",AskLGBT
Question about terminology,"It seems to me like I often hear lesbian celebrities (on interviews or whatever) refer to themselves as ""gay"" rather than lesbian.  Is there a reason behind this?  Is it preferred to use gay as a gender-neutral term rather than have the gay/lesbian discrepancy?  Or is it just that I see people say that for no particular reason?  I realize of course what they mean when they say it.  I'm obviously as pro-lgbt as can be, so I just wanna make sure I'm correctly informed.",AskLGBT
Doctors who perform informed consent orchiectomies?,"Out of curiosity--other than Dr. Mark Arnkoff in Michigan, exactly which doctors, if any, perform informed consent orchiectomies without any therapist letters?",AskLGBT
"Is ""the pill"" worth taking if your a lesbian or asexual?",I want to know if there are any pluses to taking the pill if your lesbian or asexual. They don't really cover this in sexED at school and only focus on the contraception part of it. Is the pill worth it?,AskLGBT
How much does HRT cost *without* insurance coverage?,"For the record, I am curious about both testosterone HRT and estrogen HRT. :)",AskLGBT
How does an introvert like me meet others from the LGBT community?,"Because, let's face it, not everyone is into gay bars (or bars in general).",AskLGBT
Can attraction be a lip thing?,"Has anyone else experienced this feeling, where you look at someone/a depiction of someone which makes your lips feel dry, and like you need moisten them? And it's like you have this feeling that you might want them, but you also really don't?

I hope that makes some kind of sense, it's hard to explain in the right words I feel like.",AskLGBT
Sexualities of Trans People (Mostly Men): Top/Bottom &amp; Dysphoria,"This came to me just a while ago. I often hear more about transwomen than transmen, and one of those details I hear about is how topping for a transwoman can be very uncomfortable, bringing about feelings of gender dysphoria, feeling just *wrong* for them.

Do transmen have similar feelings towards bottoming?",AskLGBT
Exactly how much sperm would I need to freeze if I will (eventually) want to have two girls using sperm sorting?,"Anyway, I want to become a literal eunuch (after I will earn the necessary funds for this, of course) and I am certainly curious about this considering that I certainly want to keep the option of sperm sorting (for two girls) open in the event that I will either be unable or unwilling to adopt two girls (eventually--after all, I am currently unmarried and busy focusing on my university education).

Thus, exactly how much sperm would I need to freeze if I will (eventually) want to have two girls using sperm sorting?

Any thoughts on this?",AskLGBT
I've slept with both men and women but I consider myself straight - Sexuality crisis!,"There has been something bothering me for years now. I was hoping to gain some insights from others who may have gone through the same thing. I need a new way to look at this, and another way to process it. Any advice would be appreciated. Thank you in advance. FYI: I am a man in his mid twenties.

Reflecting back on my childhood, I remember being a really sexual and explorative type of kid. I enjoyed being naked in an exhibitionist type of way and getting off on it. I enjoyed showing off my body to others, wearing dresses in private, showing my package to others, sniffing panties, putting tampon pads in my undies, and I even remember watching others pee. All of this took place before I even knew how to masturbate yet alone orgasm – I just knew it felt good and I liked it.

As I grew and got a little bit older, I began surfing the web for Porn on dial-up Internet - mainly straight porn but also some gay and bisexual porn too. When Morpheus and Kazaa came around I began downloading videos again, mainly straight but some gay and bisexual porn as well. The interest for both sexes was there early on but I kept my feelings to myself.

My first relationships were with girls in middle and high school; first sexual experiences were with girls; and my first time having sex was with one of my girlfriends around age 15.
A year earlier when I was 14, I linked up with a man who I met online, who at the time was in his mid-twenties. We used to do a lot of chatting online before meeting, and we talked dirty with one another. Eventually he developed a crush on me and was attracted by my innocence.

One day we finally ended up touching one another at his house but that was it. I felt really uncomfortable with the whole situation and ended up leaving feeling dirty and disgusted by my actions. I didn’t enjoy what it felt like in real life and much preferred my experiences with girls. For the time being I stopped pursuing men.

A couple of years went by and I became really promiscuous. I had little regard for others feelings and was more than willing to use people for sex. Deep down I was unhappy and depressed about the way my life was and there were troubles at school and at home.
It wasn’t until I was 18-19 that I began to explore again with men and tried out some of the gay bars and strip clubs – more of less, I was dabbling in the whole gay scene to see what it was like. It was something that I always wanted to try now that I was older. Besides, the first experience I had was with a pedophile and I felt robbed of my innocence because of it.

A few more years go by and I continue seeing both men and women. With regards to men, my experiences were mainly giving and receiving oral and making out. To this day I’ve only had sex with a man twice - once giving and once receiving. Both of those times I was pretty fucked up on drugs and alcohol and only remember enjoying one of those two experiences.

So here I am now in my late 20’s. I haven’t had sex with men since 2009 and don’t plan on it again either it really doesn’t turn me on anymore. I can’t lie though because I still have thoughts about my past experiences but would never act on them again. To me, the fantasies are MUCH better than my real life experiences with men.
I’ve kicked my bad habits with the help of therapy and rehab and have actually been abstinent from having any sex at all since the summer of 2013. I’ve had a couple of flings here and there with women but have only made out or touched a bit.

My therapist says I may have some internal homophobia going on because I don’t like acknowledging that I have had sexual experiences with men in the past. Personally I just really hate the fact that I’ve said to some people that I was gay at one point, bisexual at one point, and pansexual at one point. I prefer the label of straight.

What do you guys think? I know what has happened has happened but it really has bothered me. I just want to accept who I am and feel comfortable without confusion. Any insights would appreciated!",AskLGBT
What can I actually do to support the LGBT community?,What can I -- a typical college student in the Midwest -- actually do to help the LGBT community?,AskLGBT
Bisexual whose never been with a woman,"idk if this is entirely the right place to post this (new to reddit) so sorry if i am wrong. 

In the past years or so I've had some emotional issues that caused me to shut people out. Because of this I haven't had any relationships (emotional or sexual) in the past couple years. I've slowy but surely been getting my life on track and now I feel like I'm in a place where I am happy with myself and can be in a healthy relationship. The only problem is I am bi and the only relationship I've had is with a guy (it was before all my personal shit went down). I want to get back into dating, but I guess my problem is I'm worried if I try to date any girls they will think I'm just experimenting and messing around because I haven't been with a woman before (I'm 20 btw). I know I'm not confused because when I see a girl I'm attracted to I think ""yeah I want to date her"", which I don't think someone who is straight would think. I guess my question is do any of you have any advice for how I should approach this situation? Or should I just continue my dateless life and buy a few cats?",AskLGBT
Are there any therapists in Southern California who are willing to write recommendation letters for aspiring eunuchs such as myself?,"Indeed, in regards to myself, I want to get surgically castrated both for sterilization purposes (considering that vasectomies can and sometimes do fail and considering that the doctors who perform vasectomies certainly don't have the nerve to man up and pay all of their patients' child support in the event of a vasectomy failure) and, if possible (I strongly value the ability to get erections using my penis and to have penis-in-vagina sex, so yeah), to help feminize my body and my face (I myself identify as genderqueer, so yeah).

Anyway, any thoughts on this? After all, I myself strongly don't want to be compelled to seek a ""back-alley"" surgical castration (which is the alternative to a safe surgical castration) instead. :(",AskLGBT
Widow/widower?,"If a gay man's husband dies, is the survivor still called a widower? If a lesbian's wife dies, is she still called a widow? Or is there a different terminology altogether?",AskLGBT
Roommate interested? And other troubles.,"So first, a bit about myself. I'm a 20 year old male college student. I'm deeply confused about my sexuality and, as a result, I am woefully, ridiculously inexperienced when it comes to sex. I've never thought I could actively pursue something without first knowing how I identify. There are other problems too. Low self esteem and a very negative body image both probably contribute to my sexual inactivity.

Anyways, the main point of this post is my roommate. He is a year younger then me, straight (I think), and in a long term relationship with a girl. I would be lying to myself if I said I wasn't attracted to him. I am, both to his personality and his body. But I had assumed that he would not be interested because of his straightness. I don't want to jeopardize my friendship with him. And I certainly don't want to do so while he is dating this girl.

So last month, I got sick with the flu. I stripped the blankets off my bed and went to sleep with the fan on to try and break the fever. I woke up that night and found myself being touched sexually. I was pretty stunned that this was happening, but I didn't stop it. I acted like I was asleep. I never actually saw him do it, but I strongly suspect that it was him. I felt pretty violated after it happened, but at the same time it felt really good. There was another, similar incident that happened a few weeks later. Again, I allowed it to happen and this time I know it was him. 

After this happened, he suddenly stopped sleeping in the room at night. He then decided to move out. He said that it was due to other problems he'd been having, but I can't help but think that this has something to do with it. I asked him if he was moving out because I was a bad roommate and he was adamant that I was a good roommate.

Then just last week, we basically cuddled on a couch all night while binge watching True Detective. His girlfriend asked him to come over to her place that night and he said no.

So TL;DR I think that he is interested in me, even though he is in a longterm relationship with his girlfriend. He's taken the initiative every step of the way. I don't really know what to do about it. I'm worried that trying to make this happen will ruin my friendship with him or start trouble with his girlfriend. I don't want to ruin their relationship or damage my reputation on campus. I don't know what to do.",AskLGBT
The hardest question I've had to ask... (gender/sexuality confused as heck),"Hey guys I created this account to ask a question (a very difficult question for me to ask) and it's going to take a bit of backstory before I reach a point where any of this will really be comprehensible. I tried posting this on a previous reddit page (NoFap) but I guess it wasn't appropriate for it? I have questions and I need someone to listen and give perspective.



 As a sidetone, I've read many TG/Sissy-related Nofappers comments/posts and none of them quite captured what I have gone through. This is, as with so many others, my story that I am posting and I'm posting it because I desparately need perspective on it.



My first sexual memories were related to pillow-humping, pretty much, when I was a kid. I was honestly going at it by the age of 8 and getting pleasure out of that as my form of masturbation. I didn't fantasize about women-- usually my fantasies were just revolving around the feeling of it, the way my muscles felt, the way it felt rubbing against the pillow and rubbing against something kind of poofy and soft. I created a lot of imaginative fantasies after a short duration of time (obviously not porn-related, I didn't deal with the internet at a young age so I didn't have that available) but I took what was available and used it imaginatively to pleasure myself (these were ideas from cartoons... submissive fantasies... becoming ""feminine"").




Gender-wise at this age, important to note, I wasn't into hyper-masculne stuff or GI Joes. I played video games a lot and I'd play games with my sister (we'd play Barbies or pretend where one of us was a baby, the other was a parent) just cute imaginative stuff that I feel most kids do. I did find at a young age though that there were toys like Tea Bunnies that I wanted that were very feminine in nature. I felt ashamed at the fact I wanted them but I still in part thought they were cute and fun-- I gravitated towards a lot of my sister's toys that were of that ilk.
As time went on, I realized that I was in fact masturbating 'wrong' as my friends started to talk about masturbation and I never mentioned how I actually did it-- I just figured hand masturbation was another way of doing it and that there wasn't a problem with my method. I tried hand masturbation it and realized I could not masturbate at all, it was physically impossible for me to do it. Masturbation evolved at that point for me that I'd find ways to tie myself to the pillow while I was humping it, coming up with rather crazy fantasies and usually finding myself in a feminine, submissive situation in my fantasies. I started looking into TMS at that age when I first got into the internet (Traumatic masturbatory syndrome) and realized that I had it. I had never looked at porn but I realized the feelings of femininity that were there were the main things pushing me into finding sexual gratification-- I was not rubbing against a pillow imagining it to be a woman, it was just the feeling of it and the fetishy-fantasies I took with it. It took a great deal of time and relapse before I finally pushed that method of masturbation away and I've relapsed very few times in my life since then.
I thought that my life was getting better at that point and I had made changes because I was dating a girl at the time that I wanted to be very serious with and to fulfill a sexual role with. The only problem was that I had never really felt any sexual attraction towards women-- I felt at the time that it was simply the right thing to do. I wanted to pleasure her and to be able to satisfy her because I thought that was the next proper course of action.




I was 19 when I first tried to have sex and I failed miserably-- I could not even get hard. My girlfriend cried and felt it was her fault and that it was due to her weight but I assured her it wasn't... I just didn't find her sexually attractive (and I didn't really find women sexually attractive). I had some confusion at this time as well because I first started to get into women's fashion-- viewing it online and buying magazines religiously and finding that I was attracted to women in extremely gorgeous clothing (for some reason, it turned me on a lot) and I realized after a duration of time that it was about wanting to wear the clothing. I started buying female clothes and I would masturbate and feel terrible soon after putting the clothes on... then I'd purge the clothes and buy more. Soon the purging stopped and I'd wear panties regularly without wanting to masturbate-- they just felt good and looked cute and it was a nice secret for me, almost a symbolism underneath everything that I still had that part of me. I also found thongs to be intensely satisfying to wear because they'd press against my ass and cause me to get really turned on in a way I hadn't really perceived before. I discovered anal stimulation... bought an aneros and adored it... butt plugs I'd wear often and find intense sexual gratification out of (much better than penile stimulation from what I'd found) and I found myself rarely masturbating, just relishing in the feelings.
I put all of this on hold for a while and tried to normalize with my girlfriend. We got married and were married for two years-- the entire time, I never wanted to have sex or be with her (we had, in effect, an entirely sexless marriage and it had to have been hell on her). I masturbated from time to time while watching porn but most of it was situational porn and I always put myself in the submissive role in the videos, whether the subject was male or female. I tried clueing my wife into the fetish and she never wanted to accept it or play on it (meanwhile, she had a mild fetish of wanting her hair washed and I'd wash her hair just to fulfill her needs-- above all, I found women having pleasure a delightful thing... semi-erotic but it never made me want to have sex with her-- pleasure was just hot to me).




My wife and I divorced due to unhappiness-- I didn't feel fulfilled and I wanted other things in my life. I spent a year traveling and trying to enjoy myself-- I developed a crush on a guy that I had been traveling with and a friend in my group noticed, called me out on it and it mortified me... I questioned everything at that point and took some time to myself, totally separated from my group and returned home.
I started to look into hypnosis files soon after that and much of the sissy hypo and regular tg hypo helped me to accept at that time I wanted to be a woman and that I was gay (or perhaps it just brainwashed me, I still can't figure that out). I started to watch gay porn and realized it really turned me on-- I started a new job and was dating my boss soon after but I never got intimate with him due to uneasiness with the whole situation... then I dated a boy very seriously for the first time and had sexual relations with him and found it intensely satisfying (and at the time, i was amazed to find that most gay men immediately knew that I wanted to bottom and be submissive). Flirting happened for the first time in my life really and it didn't feel forced-- I was just naturally submissive to him and I enjoyed his presence. The relationship ended poorly and I caught myself again questioning my sexuality but I really did feel at the time that I was happy with him and the most sexually/emotionally fulfilled I had been.
I dated another guy, was going through a time without fapping and didn't find him attractive or emotionally what I wanted so i broke up with him, questioned my sexuality again.



Finally, this past winter, I dated a guy who lived in a nearby city for nearly two months and had intense sexual and emotional relations with... but the whole time was polarizing because I told him bluntly who I was and what I was going through and he had his own ideas in mind (namely that I was not TG and that I was just gay and confused) and he tried to force those ideas upon me. While sexually, things went well, over time I just couldn't cope anymore and split up with him because we had different views of who I was and I have never enjoyed being forced to behave a certain way that makes me feel ""wrong"" about who I am.




Then, this past summer, a girl I had been seeing from the previous summer (I failed to mention her but it had, the first summer, been a mild relationship with just kissing) started to date me again and we tried to have sex for the first time. I was into her at the time and I liked her sexually but i still had this feeling of disconnect from her... it didn't help that she began to make fun of me at times and say that I kissed poorly (puckered my lips too much with kissing) which played on my sensitivity and made me feel even more like i couldn't perform. Even after almost a month of not masturbating at this point, when it came time to have sex with her, I could not get erect. I loved her breasts, loved her body and her kind of ""thickness"" to her but I could not get hard. She tried to give me a blowjob and I just couldn't get hard-- I just didn't want that stimulation for some reason and never really have wanted it.
I have found at this point I can only get super stimulating, lovely, awesome erections by anal penetration really and I never seem to want to top (I can of course still masturbate but I rarely do, sometimes I lock myself up in a chastity device to keep the desires high... I go to craigslist to flirt with men or look up sissy stuff on tumblr and relish more and more in it)-- I have almost totally erectile dysfunction with women and I couldn't imagine penetrating anyone but I want to be penetrated. It's strange but a lot of me worries that this is what the hypno files and fantasies have done to me and I wonder above all, truly, who I am-- even though I have been with men and felt emotionally and sexually in love... there's that nagging part of me that says and wishes I could be with women. Is this a porn addiction or something nofap can fix? Am I trying desperately to be an idea of normal when I may just be who I am? Am I just confused or am I gay? Transgender? Am I straight?



Can anyone give me perspective? Please?",AskLGBT
"Denying the existence of a genetic component in transgenderism is pretty much like denying climate change by now. I was wondering if there were similar physiological origins for other genders, like agender, two spirit, gender-fluid, etc. or if they were more societal?","Please don't interpret this question as antagonistic; if someone says they feel a certain way, that's good enough for me. It really doesn't matter if their identity has a genetic component or if it's purely societal. Still, I am curious if there's an observed biological component to other queer gender identities at the moment. Thanks!",AskLGBT
What are some differences between the sexualities of gay men and straight women?,,AskLGBT
What to do when coming out doesn't go well?,"My faince's bf went home for thanksgiving break and came out to his parents and it hasn't gone well at all. He is 19 and a transguy. He has repeatedly asked to leave and has been told he can't. His father has threatened to hurt him and is mentally abusing him. How can we get him out of there and keep him safe? We have the ability to go get him but aren't sure how his father will react. His father owns some guns and isn't in a rational state. Should we get the police involved or just have him sneak out? 

This is based in the state of Georgia if that makes any difference. ",AskLGBT
I hear a lot on Reddit from homosexuals who hit on heterosexuals to get shot down. Does the opposite happen a lot? Do heterosexual people (of the opposite sex) hit on homosexual people a lot without knowing it?,For example: A straight woman hits on a gay man.,AskLGBT
I'm really confused about myself,"I hate my gender. I can't stand the fact that I'm a girl. Not for societal reasons or prejudice..
I can't stay aroused because the fact that I have.. female parts.. turns me off.
(My breasts don't bother me, it's the other part)
I'm not disgusted by sex, and I'm pansexual so I have no problem involving myself with other women

I just hate what I am. I don't know what to do.. or how to deal with this.
It's starting to push me into depression",AskLGBT
Shades of bisexuality - anyone else identify as homo/heteroflexible?,"curious. im homoflexible. and yes i always get the irritating 'so youre bi?' no. hence the homo part. i love boobs. and one dude. 

just wanting to see how many identify ",AskLGBT
"New to casual sex, trying to explore myself. How much is too much?","So I'm a 21 year old metropolitan gay man. I've always known that I wanted a committed relationship, someone to be with, share with, etc. Even if its not with""the one"" I've always been long term relationship prone. 

However I recently decided I needed to take a break and do me for a long while. I've never really had any close gay friends or casual encounters, so I downloaded grindr. Of course. This was about two weeks ago. 

Since then I have had four different casual encounters. One was bad, one was meh, one was GREAT, and the other was great as well. I left all of them realizing I was okay and fine, and that nothing had changed. I do still feel fine!

However due to my upbringing as a catholic, catholic guilt is still a thing. ""You had sex casually and ENJOYED IT? SURELY YOU ARE A HORRIBLE PERSON""
I am feeling this more as I ""rack up numbers"" so to speak, I start feeling dirty. Like someone my mom would look down upon. Now I know that's not valid for me. I no longer subscribe to Catholicism as I have not for many years,  but its still something that I feel. It's engrained. 

Now, I'm practicing safe sex, being communicative, smart, reserving the right to not do anything unless I'm comfortable and the person is comfortable, and I plan on being tested at least monthly. And with every experience, I'm learning something more about myself, gaining sexual experience, and figuring things out. 

So how much is too much? How do I stop feeling guilty? And will casual sex in the meanwhile damage me emotionally to where I won't want commitment eventually? 

I realize that all of this is relative, but I like hearing other's perspectives. they help. 

I feel like I'll be okay, given the fact that I'm ALREADY thinking of these things and not just diving head first....",AskLGBT
Why is it that many trans* individuals are solely skoliosexual?,"As a single gay man, when looking around on dating websites, I often run into many profiles of FTM trans* individuals who state on their profile something to the effect of ""Only date other trans* people"".

My first question is, does this tend to be the norm, or do I just live in a weird location? Secondly, why is this the case? Is it an attraction thing, or just because it's easier?",AskLGBT
How do I figure this out?,"Hi, 19F here. I identify a lot with being demisexual—no physical attraction unless emotional bonds come first—and I've always had a thing with liking girls. I've had crushes on guys, but have only done physical stuff with guys that mean nothing to me. So naturally, I've felt absolutely nothing with all guy-experiences, no matter how heavy the touching. Does this mean I could be full-out gay? 

I have yet to physically experiment with girls (or anyone I have strong emotions for)... so there's a disclaimer. Any insight would be greatly appreciated!",AskLGBT
"Thinking of dating a transgender woman, just looking for advice.","I am thinking about dating a transgender girl and I am seeking some advice on removing and doubts I may have on my mind. I have known this girl for going on 5 years now so we know each other rather well, and I finally have my shot at actually dating her. My only concern about dating a trans girl is what my family may possibly think, I am worried about the possible stigma I may face. If our friendship turns into an actual thing how can I best deal with that if my family does not react positively towards my decision? Also, if there are any straight dudes who have or are currently dating a trans woman, how did your friends and family react when you told them about your SO?

**EDIT:** I am currently at work so I am sure I missed out on some important details, if you need more information or clarification just ask me in the comments.",AskLGBT
"When someone self-identifies as ""queer"", does that just mean not 0 on the Kinsey scale?","Originally I understood ""queer"" to mean not heterosexual, but then I got on OKC, which muddied the waters for me a little bit. Is ""queer"" now a catch-all term to mean not exclusively heterosexual?",AskLGBT
"Why do some gay males get ""more"" flamboyant or effeminate around very pretty females?","My guess is they are manifesting their repressed heterosexual desire physically in the only way they can. But that's just a guess.

Do any of you gentlemen that do this want to take the lead on answering this question?",AskLGBT
Is 'restroom' code for something?,"Yesterday, I stopped at a gas station. Needed to pee. No restroom. Ran across the street to a gay bar (only other close option).

Bartender: ""Hello. How you doing?""

Me: ""I'm fine. Do you have a restroom?""

Bartender: ""Yes we do. What can I get you?""

Me: ""Oh, I just need to pee.""

Bartender: ""Well, we don't have any *public* restrooms.""

So, is that common practice at bars? You have to buy something to use the restroom? Or was it code for something?

I don't drink and that was the first bar I've ever stepped foot into, so I don't know. ",AskLGBT
I've no idea what I'd be considered.,"I thought I was asexual. I've come to realize that I do experience sexual attraction, I just don't have the urge to engage in sex. I don't want sex at all. Everything leading up to sex is fine, but the final act itself is just ... not for me. I'm not sex-repulsed or anything. I don't understand. Any help?",AskLGBT
I need dating help.,"I am horrible at dating, first I just can't stand most people or places you meet people, I'm not good at conversation either. So I go to the internet, what sites are good? how do I carry a conversation? I am a male 23 looking for anything, my friends always joke it should be a breeze because I can pick from a bigger pool of fish, but then some women don't like that I like men, men don't like that I like women, I've never actually dated anyone trans-gendered, a few people that were into drag, but I would like too.

Basically I am a mess when it comes to dating and need some advice.",AskLGBT
"LGBQ, undergraduate ciswomen, please consider taking a survey","Hello! We are graduate student researchers studying counseling psychology at the University of Akron and we are conducting a study to understand the unique experiences of LGBQ undergraduate ciswomen and how it might impact their health. We value the voices of the women in this community. Our hope is by increasing our understanding, we can create and improve upon the available resources. If you are 18 years or older and are an undergraduate ciswoman who identifies as lesbian, gay, bisexual, pansexual and/or queer, please consider taking this survey. We value your perspectives and experiences! (Also, if you feel passionate about this topic, we encourage you to share it with others who would be eligible to participate.)


Thank you for your time! https://akron.qualtrics.com/jfe/form/SV_73g3hOEokNHIeod ",AskLGBT
Looking for places/websites for LGBT(QIA) pride and support clothing,"Good morning everyone! I am going to my first Pride Parade and Festival next week, and would like to dress for success! What are your favorite places/websites to get Pride and Support related clothing, accessories, etc., etc.? I wouldn't mind ideas for things to make either. :) Thanks!!",AskLGBT
Is this offensive?,"This is a throwaway account because some of my teammates know what my real Reddit account is and I don't want to get shit for what I write here.

So last week after practice a sophomore came up to me after practice when everybody else and said he had something important to tell me. He said since I'm captain could I try to get the team to stop making gay people the punchlines to our jokes. Like I don't really think what we do is all that bad or really too offensive. Like we say things like don't be a straighty, I'm a fagbag baby give it to me, call me daddy, grab each other's asses and say something gay like i'd hit that ass.We do make jokes about Michael Sam when we see a dude who plays the be a fag game make a tackle. We do some things like say he's definitely hung and try to make the kids you don't play the be a fag game uncomfortable. He basically told me that it makes him uncomfortable and that he doesn't like that we are making being gay and gay people in general a joke. Is what we doing offensive to gay people and how so? Should I really do something about this because it's unlikely that we'll stop since we've been doing this since like October. Like I don't want him to feel like he doesn't belong but I can't sacrifice the 30 guys who play the fag game for 1 guy. Like we do live in a pretty liberal part of New England but our team has a lot of conservatives. I don't want to rock the ship and such. So is this offensive and how would you go about talking to the team and him about this?",AskLGBT
How to talk to my straight friends,"Hi everybody ,

At this moment I'm coming out  as bisexual (which is a whole experience in it self), and I find something hard now that I'm more accepting myself. When I talk with my straight male friends of course women are a topic of subject. I like to talk about this but at the same time in my head I think about all the fine guys I like. The problem is if I really don't know if I should say that at that moment, since they have no interest in men.Do you guys have any tips??

",AskLGBT
Any good religious experiences?,"I've noticed that a lot of lgbt people seem to a) have bad experiences with religious individuals and b) are atheists. I was wondering if anyone has had a good encounter with religious people in regards to their gender, sexuality, etc? Also, are any of you religious?

EDIT: Any religion btw",AskLGBT
What resources or support forums are out there for gay men who have been sexually abused as a child?,,AskLGBT
How did you discover your gender identity?,"Hi, I'm 16 and gay. However, I'm not sure about my gender identity. I've thought I was transgender and that felt right but then there are a lot of times I'm okay with my sex I was assigned at birth (AMAB). So I guess I'm just asking for some advice here. ",AskLGBT
Why I think that LGBT women do express lust/sexual attraction in a different way then heterosexual woman.,"Hi all,
My friend just emailed me a link her Reddit posts (in which I was referenced several times) and said that I might find it interesting as it's my story that inspired her to get an answer to the question.

As a quick background, I'm a 30 year old straight male, and I DO NOT ESCALATE, not in any, way, shape or form.
I will never ask someone out, hit on someone, put my arm around them, push for sex, or be ""on top"", this just not make me feel loved in any way.
In contrast a woman dominating (not referring to bdsm) me, escalating toward me, hitting on me, putting their arm around me, pushing for sex, or being ""on top"" (as my friend put it) is a huge turn on and does make me feel loved if it's genuine (not out of necessity or monetary gain).
I'd never hire a domme or even suggest that I want a woman to do this, she has to actually feel that way in order for it to mean anything at all to me.
For me there is a world of difference between ""putting my hand on her"" and her ""putting her hand on me"". (I will escalate, just not first)

 Yes, I'm a straight guy who's jealous of lesbians.
And this is not because I'm turned on my them, it's because I see a woman taking the lead (stereotypically male) role and wanting to escalate (asking partner out, putting arm around partner, wanting to be ""on top) and such and so forth.
I see heterosexual women act just the opposite, by trying to get my attention, wearing revealing clothes, making fleeting eye contact but never approaching me, I even had a girl jump into my bed when I went to sleep at a party once she just lay there naked, and made sexual come-on's...as if I was supposed to initiate...I was repulsed by this (I carried her out of my room).
Had she jumped on me I still would not have went along with it as she was probably too intoxicated to know what she was doing, but I would have been very turned on and it would have been a very difficult choice.

 I agree with the conclusion my friend reached, this is because when lesbians have a relationship it's with someone who is usually a lot less aggressive than a man and since someone is going to want sex a titch more than the other, you see one of them take the initiative.

 Where women look at me (or any other man) and they instantly see the most ""butch"" person ever, someone who they know (or who believe) is far more sexually aggressive than them and they act accordingly by taking a recessive role.

 I agree with most of the statements made in response to my friends post, sexual escalation is subjective to how both parties feel and the esclatory role is simply taken by the one who wants sex more (heterosexually this is usually men).
But I think there is a innate difference between how woman act toward the same sex (""she's passive, I have to escalate"") and men (""he's a sex fiend, I have to be recessive"").

  I'm not a sex fiend (many men aren't), but good luck convincing women to take the initiatory role, given my male autonomy and all.
I've never been pursued or told that I'm loved, I've accepted it and I don't think that it's gonna change unless I get a sex change and become a lesbian (lol, not something I'm willing to do).


If any of you have had experiences counter to this, than by all means let me know.",AskLGBT
Girl Seeking Academics,"Hello fellow Redditors,
I was wondering if I could connect with any fellow academics out here. As a graduate student struggling with trying to do all of her coursework/be a research assistant/work on my thesis/try to learn as much as I can, I would love any advice that you could give. Specifically, I am in a program that is a hybrid of psychology and education, but my main focus is on gender and sexuality. My program only offers one class on gender and sexuality (bogus right?) and I really want to write an informative thesis breaking down some issues in this realm. What's the best way I can keep up to date with current research being released? Are there any websites that compile everything useful together? Any advice for persevering through a program that sometimes fails to take into account any form of intersectionality?",AskLGBT
"LGBT+ women, how is your EXPRESSION of attraction/lust/sexual desire experienced or manifested differently depending on your partners gender?","Hi, I've posted this question twice before the first two time's I did so I either asked the wrong question or used the wrong wording.
I'm re-posting because I feel that there is some critical point I'm missing here (that is my fault due to incorrect formulation).
If you've already commented I thank you for doing so, and feel free to comment again if you want, hopefully this will also give other new people a chance to speak their mind.
While the opinions of Butch lesbians (or any lesbian who assumes a esclatory role in a relationship), and the opinions of bisexuals (as they can provide a comparison point) are especially welcome, anyone who can offer insight into this is greatly valued.
 
 Many have told me that the way that lust/attraction/sexual desire is experienced by women is exactly the same regardless of their sexual orientation or gender identity, as no one has ever said ""lesbian's experience lust more/less aggressively than a straight women"" I am operating off the assumption that this point is accurate.
I am still open to to this question so feel free to provide insight if you wish.

My main question now is:

As an LGBT+ woman, is you attraction/lust/sexual desire toward females EXPRESSED or ACTED ON any differently than your attraction/lust/sexual desire toward males?

Female-to-Male:I want him to (sexual activity) me. (Tries to draw male into making an advance)

Lesbian-to-Female:I want to (sexual activity) her. (Makes an advance toward female)

 I know that there are lesbians that express lust the second way, butch put's arm around femme first, butch wants to kiss on the first date this is to be expected as one of the two (and not necessarily the butch) must assume an escalatory role or else there would be no relationship. (someone's gotta be a titch more esclatory or there would be no relationship)

I believe the exclusive element I'm seeing that is in lesbian relationships as opposed to heterosexual ones is that (regardless of the gender identity or roles assumed by the participants within) is that it has to have a primary female initiator who has to assume an esclatory role.

 I know that in a heterosexual relationship most of the time the male acts first and thereby assumes the esclatory role first. (nullifying any esclatory tendency's on the part of most females)
But do any straight women ever act like lesbian's (in behavior) by assuming an esclatory role, (putting their arm around him, wanting to kiss him on the first date, wanting to be the aggressor, or wanting to be ""on top"" so to say).
While this would probably only ever be apparent if the male didn't escalate, I was wondering if there are any women who assume a dominant role (like the lesbian version described above) in a relationship with a male preferentially (because they want to).

 This may seem off topic for this sub, but LGBT woman have experience as to what these differences are (A perspective most heterosexual woman can't provide), Is there any difference in escalation or expression of sexual desire in this area depending on which role is assumed?

 Do women assume a dominant, esclatory role like this in relationships with males, or is there a legitimate difference here?


Check out this link http://www.shakesville.com/2012/05/objecting-to-objectification.html Is this the way that Straight women also view/objectify men?

(DISCLAIMER:If anyone has a problem with the wording of this, feel free to let me know and I'll do my best to edit it)",AskLGBT
Bisexual vs pansexual,What's the difference?,AskLGBT
"Thoughts on the word ""queer""?","I have heard it is an academic term, an identity, a slur. What is this word?",AskLGBT
"Looking for Letherman, BDSM, definitions and dynamics of Boy and Cub.","Hi.  

I am seeking information on both Cub and Boy. I'm new to the Leatherman scene and my *future* Sir wants to adopt me but wants me to look up information on both the community and difference between a cub and a boy before deciding which one is suited for me.

Any information or leads are appreciated in advance. ",AskLGBT
How do you meet other gay guys in high school?,"I am in my senior year of high school and have just recently came out as gay. So far everything has gone great and everyone has been really supportive, the only problem is that now I have no clue how I meet other gay guys and get into a relationship. I don't even know where to start so any advice/help is greatly appreciated!",AskLGBT
Why are LGBT-haters obsessed with child-rearing? What are they trying to get out of this?,"I've asked before on [how to respond to claims against LGBT for not having children](https://www.reddit.com/r/AskLGBT/comments/2yw38q/how_do_you_respond_to_the_claim_that_lgbt_persons/?ref=search_posts).

Understandably, Western phobes have no rational reasons for against LGBT parenting other than ""It's in the Bible"" etc. Asian homophobes, however, seem to have their own reasons and it's a slippery slope: If you can't have children (preferably sons), you won't have heirs, and if you can't have heirs, who'd inherit your land or business and continue the bloodline?

Adoption seems to be out of the question, as their society expect the ""natural-born"" child to inherit the family property, and not some ""outsider"" stepchild. This expectation is also putting pressure on infertile heterosexual couples as well.

That's the only theory I can think of.

Beyond that, do you have any better ideas on why phobes are obsessed with LGBT not having children the ""natural"" way?

PS: I'm sorry if I asked this question, but the ""logic"" brought up by Malaysian homophobes on being against LGBT is driving me mad.",AskLGBT
"Bi-sexual people of reddit, which gender do you prefer?",,AskLGBT
A Question Regarding Gender Identity,"Forgive me if my vernacular comes across as ignorant, but due to a lack of any real education on this subject, I am ignorant by definition. Please do not hold this against me.


Let me just start by saying that I'm not the kind of person to try and police another person for what they do, provided it causes no physical harm to another person. I just don't have the time. I've more or less got the ""you do you"" attitude. I fully accept the concept of being transgender, transitioning or otherwise. I may not truly understand, but it doesn't bother me. As time goes on, I've learned that gender identity goes even deeper than that, (Facebook offers, I think 50 custom, non-binary gender options. I don't have Facebook so I don't really know.) I'm well aware that sex and gender are two different things, but I think I'm just confused as to what constitutes a gender identity. From what I've read, it seems like it's based around ""traditional gender roles,"" and individuals who feel as though they fall either into or out of these societal boxes they were assigned at birth.
If a person enjoys both football and knitting, does this make them transgender/non-binary/etc? How about men wearing makeup and dresses? I like to hope that it goes deeper than this. What constitutes a gender idenitity?

I've spent some time on r/TumblrInAction, and I understand that they only post the worst examples, not an accurate representation of non-binary individuals or even the website as a whole, but based on these posts, it seems to me like there is ignorance on both sides of this argument (is wolfkin really a identity?) and may make it seem like being non-binary/transgender/etc. is illegitimate, or a phase to be grown out of, which I know to be false. The struggle of transgender individuals is all too real, and I feel like identifying as a wolf, or something to that effect (much like the South Park episode where Kyle's dad undergoes surgery to become a dolphin) will trivialise this and force people with a lack of education, like myself, to marginalise people who in the end just want to be accepted and comfortable in their own bodies.


Again, forgive me for my ignorance, but at this point it just seems like the entire concept of ""non-binary"" genders is the rejection of society's arbitrary boxes in favour of your own, personal arbritrary boxes. Defying traditional gender roles by adhering to those same roles. Is anyone really to say what is a legitimate gender identity and what isn't? Especially in modern society with single parent households, where divorced men and women are forced into being both parents, and taking on the ""traditional responsibilities"" of both genders?


Personally, I was raised by a single mother who enjoyed working with tools, but was never seen cooking once her eldest daughter was responsible enough to use the stove. I consider myself straight, but I tend to date girls with more of a ""boyish"" (androgynous, maybe) look and attitude over the ones that wear lots of makeup and own several dresses. I don't want to say I don't care, but for lack of a better word, I don't really care about what they identify as, I just like to date people with vaginas.

Outside of sexual relationships, I don't really like to compartmentalize people based on who they fuck, or what's in their pants. I see these as such small aspects of who they are as people that it's irrelevant. I'm more likely to judge somebody based on what they say or do; who you fuck is your own business.

As a cis white straight male, some might say that I have no real input in this discussion, but I don't feel that's fair. My ignorance stems from a lack of education on the subject, and I think we can all agree that my situation is far from unique. If we want to move forward toward acceptance, everyone needs to be involved and be educated so that we all understand eachother more fully.



tl;dr: I'm an idiot so please explain what a gender identity is and how it relates to personality and sexuality.",AskLGBT
"Lifetime of gender and sexuality questions, haven't told my wife of 5 years","So here's my attempt to summarize a childhood and adulthood of bad decisions and sexual confusion. None of which I shared with my soulmate, and now I feel like I'm in too deep to get into it. My apologies if this not the appropriate place for relationship questions.

Early childhood, I dressed in my mother's clothes. I mean like ages 4 or 5. Way too early to understand what I was doing and that it wasn't normal.

A little later on, my older brother (by 3 years) sexually touched me. I think I suppressed the memories for a while, but it eventually came back to me. I'm not sure how long it went on for. I think I was age 6 or 7. I don't remember being upset by it at the time, which strikes me as weird. 

All during my teenage and young adult years, I continued to cross dress at every chance. As an adult, I was buying a lot of women's clothes to dress up, walk around in, just enjoying the hell out of looking like a woman. It was a very sexually driven habit. I just wanted to be treated by a woman, but a hypersexualized woman. I would never consider doing so in real life, mostly because I'm a huge man and I know that I'd never actually feel the way I've wanted to. I don't know if this makes me transgendered. I enjoy the hell out of being a man. I don't feel repulsed by my body as I've heard some transgendered people describe. I absolutely able to enjoy sex as a man.

Finally, I'm married now for the last 5 years. Good relationship. Good sex. I've given up the cross dressing, although I still fantasize about it when I see a well dressed woman. But now I'm getting very interested in what it'd be like being with a man again. 

My partner has never heard any of the above information. When we were together, I didn't think it was relevant to our relationship. I thought it was all behind me. I'm extremely self conscious about all of this, plus I don't want her to judge my brother for what he did. 

I don't know if this arc is typical or not. I don't know how to tell my wife about this. I don't know how to deal with my sexual and gender doubts.

tl;dr: Gender and sexual identify questions, how to tell wife of 5 years",AskLGBT
"I consider myself bisexual, I have a boyfriend who knows, but I feel like something is missing.","Hello,

I am a female in my early 20s and I have been with my boyfriend for over 2 years now.  I love him a lot and would hate to loose him.. But something is missing in my life.  I have always been attracted to women- more than men.  But where I grew up and who I was associated with, that was looked down upon and not accepted.  So I kept my true feelings to myself.

I met my boyfriend after my freshman year of college.. he was, and still is, the sweetest guy I have ever met.  He has been so supportive and drops everything to make sure I am happy.  I couldn't ask for a better man in my life.  He knows I am bisexual and it does not bother him at all.  I thought someday I want to marry him and spend the rest of my life with him. 

But I have a problem now.....

I feel like I missed a huge part of my life suppressing my true feeling for the same sex.  I never had a real change to experience everything with a women I have dreamed about for years.  Lately I've been thinking about it a lot and it has affected me tremendously.  I am going through some major changes in my life (graduating college 2016, finding a job, where to live) and I feel like life is coming at me too fast.  I'm planning on moving in with my boyfriend next year after college.  A huge step to take in one's life.. But the problem is I still am having feelings for the same sex and they are not going away any time soon.. which makes me question my relationship with my boyfriend. 

(Is he right for me? would I rather be with a woman? Should I just go off and experience what I need? what should I say to him?).",AskLGBT
Are asexuals part of the LGBT community?,"I had a pretty lively discussion about this on Tumblr, but I can't fully make up my mind. Are asexuals, speficially those who don't exhibit any same-sex attraction and are cisgendered, part of the LGBT spectrum and community? Should they be included?

Pro-arguments I've heard: ""They also face oppression and marginalization based on their sexual orientation and identity. Of course they are therefore ""queer"" and part of our community!""
Con-arguments I've heard: ""Asexuals don't deal with phobia and social stigmas to the degree as other queer individuals, and allowing them into LGBT spaces gives heterosexuals an easy way to potentially invade our queer spaces.""",AskLGBT
Question about bisexuality vs pansexuality,"I understand that bisexuality is an attraction to both genders, and that pansexuality is attraction to anyone regardless of gender. My question is what is the difference? My (very limited) understanding is that pansexuals are different because they are not restricted to cisgendered individuals but then wouldn't an aversion to transgendered individuals just be transphobia? I apologize if any of this wording seems ignorant or offensive, and thanks in advance.",AskLGBT
"For LGBT+ relationships, what are some specific red flags?","If you frequent any of the asks, you may see that I've already posted this there. I'm try not to spam; what I want is a full view of the subject so that everybody has a chance to have their say.

In a way, I think many of the answers will be similar but I really wanted to get into it and see if/where certain sexualities/genders/etc differed on the issue. 

I'd like to know what you consider early warning signs and/or, if you didn't catch them, warning signs when you were in the relationship ""proper""?

Are there any you don't see mentioned in articles?

I might blog about this at a later date but I won't use your username or direct quote - well, unless you ask/let me.",AskLGBT
What Would Be The Correct Term For This (If There is One)?,"((Alright, my first time posting…anything, really. Please don't let me screw this up…))

So at the moment, I'm a biological female who's confused as all hell. 

Currently, I have no problems with having boobs, nor have I ever considered them something that I dislike about myself of that I'd want to get rid of. The only real thing that bothers me about being female is really the thing that makes me female…my vagina. I've known that I didn't feel right having it since I was about ten (I'm 14 now) and I've really been wanting to figure a few things out.

The question I'm getting at is, if I were to keep my boobs and have my vagina exchanged for a penis, what would I be considered? I know about the term ""shemale"", but that name doesn't sit quite right with me. I've also heard of ""intersexual"", but I'm not really sure that the term applies to me? The question's been on my mind for long enough, so I figured I might as well try and find an answer.

(EDIT: I've gotten good responses, so thank you for helping me out! I'm just curious…what would I be deemed biologically? I could definitely be agender or non-binary in gender, but speaking solely about my biological sex, is there term for it?)",AskLGBT
I want to begin exploring gay sex - any advice?,"I'm a male, 21, and I've always been interested in, well, having sex with another male. I love hetero sex and I'm doubtful I'd ever want a longterm same-sex partner, but I still find some guys attractive and, honestly, I want to suck a dick. I know how much I like it, I think it would be hot to give that to somebody. After having gone my whole life identifying as straight, though, I don't know where to begin.

So, that is the situation that lead me to pose this question. Specifically curious about:

How can one meet gay or 'open' people discreetly? Especially in a bigger town or smaller city? I would like to keep this rather under the radar, but I feel like if I just wait around, I'm going to miss my chance to explore. 

Any advice would be greatly appreciated.",AskLGBT
Which pronouns do transvestites prefer?,"Sorry for any gramatical mistakes, English isn't my first language.

Anyway, I live right next to a gay bar (all lovely people). I've had some drinks there but I'm heterosexual myself. Anyway, yesterday evening I saw a transvestite walking home on my way back. By this I mean a man wearing a dress and in high heels, but he physically was still very much a man (broad shoulders etc) so I don't think he (she?) was undergoing a sex change.

How would they prefer to be refered to? As a he or a she? Or does it depend on whether they're in ""character"" or not?",AskLGBT
[ADVICE] Trying to get help/advice for a family member.,"I am writing this on behalf of a family member. I understand that could make this very tricky but given the situation it's the best I can do. 

My cousin just turned 18 a few months ago and recently graduated High School. She's known and accepted herself as a lesbian for years, and has been dating the same girl for several years now as well. She's come out to me and another family member and we were extremely happy for her. The problem is with her parents, because she hasn't dated any boys they are suspicious and accused her of being lesbian, in a derragatory manner. I've begun to see her parents true colors over the past 6 months. I would say her parents are fairly religious so of course I believe that's where the problems stem from. She's set to go to college in the fall but they've now been threatening to take that away from her if she doesn't ""grow up"". She's an extremely smart and intelligent girl, but won't ask for help. Her parents are extremely restricting. They know all her passwords and control every movement of hers. I'm beginning to worry about her now because her girlfriend has been informing more of what has been happening. Her mother chased her out of the house recently screaming ""lesbo"" at her. Her father said he's failed her and she's a lost cause and that she won't be going to heaven with them. She just wants them to love and accept her. The situation is killing me. I feel my hands are tied. But since she can't reach out because she may get caught and emotionally tortured I'm doing what I can to seek advice. 

Again I'm sorry for the long ,hopefully not too confusing, info. Just was hoping I could find some people out there in similar situations. I don't get to see/talk to her much with her overbearing parents but I'm one of the closest ones to her besides her girlfriend.

[TL;DR] Cousin dealing with emotionally abusive parents. Feeling trapped. Needing advice so I can help her get through the situation.",AskLGBT
"With the increase awareness of trans people in mainstream society, why isn't there more awareness of intersex people?","While it's wonderful that mainstream society is becoming more and more accepting, I've always wondered why there is never any discussion/awareness around intersex people. Curious what others think about this.",AskLGBT
"How do you, as a LGBT, answer back against people who bring up Lot, Sodom and Gomorrah as reminders?","I'm bringing this up, 'cause here in Malaysia where I live, conservative Muslims or Christians here keep bringing up Lot's story in Sodom &amp; Gomorrah stories. And with USA legalizing LGBT marriage nationwide, the locals here are quite concerned that the second Sodom ""gaypocalypse"" might repeat itself in this century.

How do you respond back to people who keeps bringing up the story? And how do you assure them that the Sodom disaster (if it does exist) won't happen again at all?",AskLGBT
"Gender, sex and attraction? Why do genitals matter so much for ""butch"" lesbians and ""femme"" gays?","I apologize for asking a question from such ignorance, but I cannot seem to wrap my head around this issue:
If you are female-identified but only attracted to ""butch"" women
If you are male-identified buy only attracted to ""femme"" men
I do not understand your preference. 

I suppose, being bi, genitals really don't matter a whole heck of a lot, so perhaps that's my bias - but are they really that important. Would dating a masc man if female-identified lesbian or femme woman if male-identified gay be so anathema? 

Please help me understand,
Confused ",AskLGBT
"Going to my first pride tomorrow, what should I expect?",,AskLGBT
Part II of 10 potentially offensive questions for transgender people that you may have been asking,,AskLGBT
"Need advice: Parents, gay siblings and coming out.","I'm not sure if this is where I should ask, but I need some advice.

My oldest brother is gay.  When he came out to our parents, they were crushed.  They had grown up in a very conservative environment and believed that being gay was wrong, unnatural, and a result of bad parenting.  I don’t think they believe these things anymore, but they still have trouble accepting his sexuality.  The idea of homosexual couples makes them very uncomfortable.  They don’t want him to talk about his relationships, or to bring it up at all.  They asked him to give them time to come to terms with it, but it’s been over ten years now - but I think he still wishes that someday they will accept him.  We've both moved out now, but he still really wants to be able to open up to them.  Knowing that they don't acknowledge such a huge part of who he is - it’s really messed up a lot of aspects of his life, including his romantic relationships.  He's a very sad and lonely person.

Meanwhile, they've been talking to me to try to understand him.  Over the years I’ve tried to be an advocate for my brother and to help them understand that being gay is normal and their upbringing was closed-minded, etc. However, they’ve told me things that I hope they never tell him because it is so hurtful - that they wish that he'd stayed in the closet until they died, that they hope to die before they see him marry another man.  That they have everything they want in life - except that they wish he weren't gay.  That they're so happy I turned out straight.  

Except - I'm bi.  My parents aren't ever going to know. I'm going to stay in the closet, at least to them, until they die.  I've been in a heterosexual relationship for many years, so most people just assume I'm straight.  I don’t avoid the question if people ask, and most of my close friends (and my SO) are aware of my sexuality.  My question is - should I tell my brother?  

I know that I am a coward - I don't want to see our parents relive what they went through when he came out, and I don’t want them to alienate me the way that they alienate him (It’s not intentionally malicious, but it hurts all the same) so I'm going to hide in the closet for as long as I can.  Also I don’t want him to feel like I’m trivializing his hurt because I feel like I’m in a similar position.  On the other hand, would he feel better knowing that he isn’t alone in his pain, that there’s someone close to him who understands how he feels and the hurt he is going through?  If you were in his shoes, would you want to know?  Would you hate me if you found out ten, twenty years down the line that I was going through a similar experience all those years ago but I never told you? Or would you hate that I can hide so easily, but you can't at all?  I want to be honest with him, but I'm afraid that I'll just make things worse.

Aside:  Please try not to be too hard on our parents.  I do believe that they are trying to change.  For some people, attitudes change easily, but for others, they don’t.  We love them very much, and they love us too.  I have to believe that, and I have to keep fighting and wishing for my family's happiness.",AskLGBT
I'm a 17 y/o girl and I'm confused as to whether I'm bisexual or just 'bicurious',"I'm a 17 y/o girl and I'm confused as to whether I'm bisexual or just 'bicurious'

I've tried to search for personal accounts from bisexual women and their experiences but I couldn't find any results that /didn't/ have experiences with another woman. 
I'm 17 and in a committed relationship (with a man) of nearly two years. We're still in love and I'm pretty sure we're going to be together for the long run. 
I'm confused about my orientation because I'm attracted to other women; i.e., finding them attractive, would want to be in sexual relations with them and be with someone of the opposite gender if I wasn't in a relationship currently. 
I'm a virgin in the extreme sense of the word. I've dated a few guys but none were serious until the guy I'm dating now. I've never had sex, never even seen a real penis in person. I've never even kissed anyone, ever. (The closest I ever got to kissing someone was on the cheek)
I don't want to leave my boyfriend to 'experience the other gender' because I feel it would be unfair and wrong. I don't believe 'experimenting' is right and I do think it's cheating, regardless of my inexperiences. 
I know this isn't just a 'phase' because I've noticed girls sexually when I was younger, for example in middle school girls' lockers.
Back then, I immediately pushed the thoughts of it away and trusted I was heterosexual. I was raised in a semi-Catholic/Buddhist household (Catholic father, Buddhist mother) where Catholicism was forced down my throat at age 13 til now. (I started attending a private Catholic Middle/Primary school from 8th grade and continued it at a Catholic Highschool) 
In Catholicism, I was taught about gays but bisexuals were never mentioned. SO I figured they were categorized in the same group. (Sigh) 
I was taught that your orientation was natural, but it was up to you to resist the ""urges of the activities"". (Heavier sigh) 
In Buddhism, I don't ever recall it ever even mentioning sexuality, nonetheless (just of what I can remember from my childhood).

I just need to know if I'm bisexual even if I've never been with another girl. Is that even possible?
I'm really sorry if I seem ignorant or naive, I just really need some guidance. ",AskLGBT
"As a heterosexual man, I'm struggling to get my head round my girlfriend's bisexuality.","**Context:**

I am a 20-year-old British student from a very heteronormative background (i.e. before I came to university I had one LGBT friend and even now I only have one friend who identifies as LGBT who I would consider close).

I started going out with a girl nearly six weeks ago who identifies as bisexual and our relationship has progressed quite quickly but, because I don't want to hurt her feelings by appearing completely ignorant or, worse, intolerant through my ignorance, I thought here would by a good place to ask some questions.

1. She says she would only ever date men but has had sexual encounters with women. Is this (or *vice versa*) common?

2. Does anyone have any links to information about relationships between heterosexual men and bisexual women (or bisexuality in general)?

3. What are some things that I wouldn't think of as issues that I should be aware of?

4. What questions have I not asked but should have?

TL;DR: I feel slightly uncomfortable about the fact that my girlfriend has slept with more women than I have and need some help with understanding bisexuality.",AskLGBT
FAQ about trans individuals that people are afraid to ask for fear of offending answered by a brave trans woman.,,AskLGBT
How am I supposed to understand this Seth MacFarlane's quote?,"From his Wikipedia page:  
He said it is ""infuriating and idiotic"" that two gay partners ""have to go through this fucking dog and pony act when they stop at a hotel and the guy behind the counter says, 'You want one room or two?'""

So... Does he mean that a hotel clerk should automatically assume that everybody is gay? Because if they offer everybody one room, that means the clerk is assuming everybody wants one room, which could be perceived as not nice towards those who want two. And if they offer everybody two rooms, that means the clerk is assuming everybody wants two rooms, which could be perceived as not nice towards those who want one.  
In my opinion, asking about your room number preference is the best solution. Why is he so furious about it then?",AskLGBT
"post op's. what is having sex using one set of genitalia like, directly compared with the other? gender assignment aside, which sensation do you prefer",,AskLGBT
How many attempted?,"just curious to know how many LGBT have a any suicide attempts because you couldn't figure out your sexual identity your sexual gender, because you were attracted to the same sex, because you felt you should have be born a male/female, never quite felt ""normal"" as far as dating went, and yet had to do ""what's normal?""",AskLGBT
Attraction v. action- why do I feel like I stopped being bi- have I been lesbian all along? Somehow confused.,"I am female  and  feel like I am somehow gender-blind when it comes to some forms of attraction- but with age I have simply stopped being interested in being with a man physically or emotionally. 

I feel like I am *capable* to fall in love with a man- but being physical and in a relationship with one always felt **lacking** to some degree- like I could not connect to them physically- I feel like this lack of capacity for connection with a man is something innate in me and it feels very gay-  so I gradually stopped considering the possibility of being with a man. 

Currently I have no interest ever on *acting* on any attraction opposite sex attraction, and I doubt that I ever will, on the other hand *some* attraction exists. 

I'd prefer to call myself gay/lesbian due to the strong *preference* for being with a woman, and innate capacity to experience connection with one- whilst I lack such capacity with men, and I have no interest in sleeping or being with a man- but I do wonder if it will not be considered as *wrong* to adopt this label. 

When people talk about 'orientation' it often gets described as 'attraction' - and as I said above I am somehow gender- blind in those- (although I do experience stronger attractions to women) and because of this I somehow feel 'obliged' to use the bisexual label- despite not really feeling bisexual in my desires for action- the gender/sex of the person *is* a deal breaker for me. 

Also I should add that being in a relationship with a man felt always a bit 'wrong'- like wearing shoes the wrong way around- which makes me feel like I am full on gay, rather than bi- *but* the existence of gender-blind attractions somehow throws me off from accepting it. 

I just don't know what I should work on: accepting being gay, or accepting being bi- out of the two bi feels more difficult right now, because it contradicts what I *want* from a relationship and what makes me comfortable. 


",AskLGBT
What is gender identity really?,"I can't seem to find any scientific reasoning, credible articles, or even interviews, where someone who's asked, ""What is a man/woman?"" can respond with a legitimate answer besides, ""Oh, it's just what you feel inside.""

I've currently been highly interested in how to interpret my own gender identity. I am born a female yet I sometimes wonder if I really am male. I'm very androgynous (slightly more towards masculine) and bisexual (slightly more towards girls/feminine).

When I was a kid, I used to want to be called Kevin and identified as a boy, always choosing male characters in video games, etc. My family members convinced me otherwise and today in the present I'm just as confused if not more.

I'm totally comfortable with myself and identifying as a ""woman,"" whatever that means, but I just think having a definition, legitimately (please don't tell me it's just what I feel like I am because that is exceptionally vague for someone to logically understand), would help me identify what I truly am.",AskLGBT
"Very confused, slightly depressed","Well, I'm a female (bio female?, I don't know the correct term, i'm sorry) and I have always liked girls, since I was very young and I was sure I was a lesbian, but as I grew up I also started liking boys, and now I  like literally everyone, except for straight cis guys, I even have a huge attraction to gay men, specially if they do drag.
I don't even know how to feel. Sometimes I feel like I should not be a woman, I just don't feel like one but other times I am entirely sure I love myself. I have a boyfriend right now, he's a cis straight guy and I love him, I told him about how I sometimes feel and he doesn't get it, he said it made him upset and worried cause he thinks he can't make me happy. I am happy most of the time but I still feel confused somehow, I wish he could understand.
Sorry if this is a dumb post, and thanks if anyone reads it and/or gives me any advice.",AskLGBT
How much do you think attraction to body types has to do with sexual orientation?,"Hi, I'm trying to understand sexuality better. As a bisexual or pansexual myself, I'm having a hard time better understanding monosexuality. And where the difference is between shallow stuff that's not about personality, and fetishes, and sexual orientation.

I feel like bisexuality or pansexuality is different for everyone. We're all attracted to different things. And just saying attracted to men, or attracted to women, is very simple, when people are so complicated.

But I have a hard time wanting to say what I would be attracted to, since it would probably sound really shallow or fetishizing. So I just say I'm bisexual or pansexual like a lot of people do. I could tell someone I'm just attracted to people, but I worry that wouldn't tell the whole story.

And for a long time, it's gotten me to thinking, what is sexuality or sexual orientation. Am I really bisexual? What is it about me that makes me pansexual? Am I bisexual or pansexual? Am I polysexual? Which parts of my my sexuality are shallow things I should get past and consider personality more? And what parts of my sexuality are fetishes and not sexual orientation?

Do you think that attraction to body types is a large part of sexual orientation? Is gender identity a large part of what attracts people to people? Are reproductive organs a large part of sexuality?

I feel like for me, the largest part of what attracts me to someone is their body type. But maybe I'm just being shallow.",AskLGBT
"What is the difference between a woman trapped in a mans body and a gay man? (sorry if this is offensive, it is an honest question)",,AskLGBT
"Hi, AskLGBT. I've got some questions about binding.","Hi! I'm 13, and I'm a physically female nonbinary.

Using two sports bras, while restricting my breathing a little, hardly flattens my chests, and I'm only an A cup! Solutions?

Ways to hide it till I come out?

Will it eventually permanently flatten my chest?

That's all for now. Thanks!",AskLGBT
"Gay food and drink (Yes, I'm serious)","Do you know any gay foods and drinks?

Yes, yes; I'm fully aware that there's no such thing. But there's a reason that I ask.

My team at work have been running an informal event called Culture Club. Every Friday, someone from the team brings in food, drink and games from their home country / culture.

We're from a really international team, so we've got easily 20 different nationalities and cultures to work through (had about 5 so far).

We're based in London, so there were too many people who could do England. So instead, they decided that my boss should try to represent gay culture instead. 

I'm completely stuck for ideas though. Gay culture is a bit harder to fit into the format than just bringing food from another country.

Any ideas?! Help would be massively appreciated!

Tl;Dr: Work want me to arrange a feast of gay culture, but I've got no idea what to make or bring!",AskLGBT
So.. I need your advice.,"Okay, so if you haven't noticed by my name, I'm using a temporary reddit. I come from a family.. and an area that is well.. really against this sorta thing and it tears me up... But thats not why im here. 

Also.. if I offend someone with the terms I use, please tell me so I can fix what I say and can not be offensive. I am really not... educated (?) in the right things to say about transgender people, and no one's explained it to me, and my background and growing up has meant I've never said the right things.

I'm in a heterosexual long-distance relationship with who I believe to be the love of my life, and we've been together since we we're nearly 14 (I'm 19 next month and she's already 19). She's on one side of my country and I'm on the other. We've been together about 4 times in the last 2 years and we're considering moving in together next year.

So, back to my conundrum. While hanging out with one of my friends, I met her transgender friend, and.. I thought she was really cute, and I really wanted to get to know her better.
A week passed, and I didn't really think of her at all... Until I saw her yesterday, and today, and all day shes what I've been thinking about while I'm not talking to my girlfriend.

To be quite honest, I haven't ever spoken to her outside of that one 2 minute long conversation, but.. idk. I guess I'm scared because I don't know how to not be ""that asshole"" and make a bad impression.

I don't know what to do, I don't know who to talk to, I don't know what I'm thinking, and I don't know what to say or who to say it to. I just thought.. maybe reddit would help.



tl;dr I'm a bisexual man in an LDR with a woman who I love more than anything but im developing a crush on a trans woman, and:
1. I need advice and I need peoples opinions
2. How do I not be accidentally offensive?",AskLGBT
What do you think of people who don't come out?,"What do you think of people who don't come out in many ways simply because it would make their lives much harder, because it would marginalize them? Do you blame them?",AskLGBT
Is what I'm feeling what gender queer is?,"I'm a boy and I've never had a problem identifying as a boy my whole life.  But inside, I feel like a girl a lot of the time.  When I read books and watch movies I usually end up identifying with one of the female characters.  Most of my role models are also women.  Sometimes in my dreams I'm a girl, and sometimes when I refer to myself in stories, I'll refer to myself using she without thinking about it.  Also, in the stories I write for school, I always end up making the main characters girl.

That said, I still am super happy as a boy, and I could never imagine getting a sex change.  I love my body, and, while I feel like a girl inside a lot of the time, I'm more than happy to identify as a man.  Sometimes I wish I could wear jeggings or skirts, or put my hair into a ponytail, but at the same time, there's nothing better than going shirtless to the beach and being able wear the same things every day and not get judged for it.  Also, basketball shorts are the bomb.

Is what I'm feeling what gender queer is? or would I be considered a trans woman who is just cool living as a man?
I know labels don't matter at all, but I'm genuinely interested in what other people think.  I love taking personality tests and that kind of thing whenever I'm bored.  I also love trying to understand how the mind and sexuality works.  Also if anyone wants to share their own experiences with gender issues, I'd love to hear it!",AskLGBT
Were you there at Japan's Tokyo Rainbow Pride 2015? How was your experience like?,"Just heard about the [Tokyo Rainbow Pride 2015](http://www.japantimes.co.jp/news/2015/04/26/national/rainbow-parade-celebrates-lgbt-equality-push/#.VT3lFZOitNs). Were you there? If not this year, what about previous years?

Do you think this might set a precedent for LGBT, not just for Japan, but also all of East Asia?

",AskLGBT
Do all transgender people see sexual reassignment as their eventual end goal? Or are some (most?) happy with presenting as their real gender for the rest of their life?,,AskLGBT
It's not too late to start participating in the Day of Silence.,,AskLGBT
About sharing a bed...,"I've already asked about this before in another subreddit, but I think I'd get more/better responses here. 

Thing is, the general consensus seems to be that an unrelated guy and a girl shouldn't share a room together, should anything happen. More so a bed. With that in mind, I'm kind of conditioned to not want to share a room with females (because I'm male) or males either (because I'm gay). So school trips where I have to room with other individuals can put me in a spot. I don't mind sharing a room much, but I'd always take the single bed if there was a choice. Then this guy comes along (during a school trip, 4 guys and 2 queens for a room) and didn't seem to mind at all that I slept with him. I'm here just to ask what people think about LGBT and rooming/sleeping with others, and to hear about others with similar experiences.

EDIT:
Thanks for the responses guys. Consider me more advised :D",AskLGBT
I have an issue regarding my own identity,"I'm definitly not the best to write about things like this, but I'll try my best.

The issue I have is that I don't know anymore what I am and how I feel, I am biologically male but it's been years now since I've wished now on a regular basis that I am a woman, I identify way more easily to women socially and I'm a bit sexist against men, truth be told.

I am soon going to turn 19 and there hasn't been a day in my life since I was 13 where I didn't feel more like a woman only to feel a bit guilty later because I'm biologicaly male, but I don't know if how my mind thinks is right.

I'm also conflicted in my orientation, I'm in a relationship with someone of the other gender but again, it happened for me to have a crush on men but I always felt the same way as stated before, a bit guilty.

I of course am generally more refered to as He/Him but whenever someone mistakes my gender for She/Her , I always feel a bit happy on the inside.

What I know at least, is that I'm not interested (not to say disgusted by) by carnal relations.

Sorry if all that is a bit messy, I'm kind of consued about my own self and I don't really know how to speak about that subject, no one in my family or my friends know about this.",AskLGBT
How do I handle SO's homophobic parents?,"So my boyfriend and I have been together for eight months now and he came out to his parents back in December. We were supposed to be meeting for the first time today, but his father cancelled and now our vacation is ruined and it's causing a strain on his parents relationship.

I think his mother has gotten better about it, but how do I go about handling his homophobic father when we move to the apartment close to their house next month?",AskLGBT
"Theoretically if there was a pill that would ""cure"" you from having nontraditional desires or gender identity. Would you take it? Why or why not? [Serious question]",,AskLGBT
I don't know what my gender is.,"I'm 13, born female. I've always been comfortable a ""girl"" but I realize I wouldn't mind suddenly waking up male or even genderless. In other words, I don't care what gender I am. What is the word for this? Do I have a gender?",AskLGBT
Do you believe that homosexuality or transsexuality is hereditary?,"I ask this question to you guys because it's been so many years that i'm questionning myself about that, and i'm not able to respond. 

(I'm pansexual, my fiancee is trans, my brother is trans, my other brother is gay, my sister and my dad are hetero and my mother is bi, but my parents are homophobics. ..so i'm confused)",AskLGBT
Coming out as bisexual on Facebook on April Fools Day?,"So, I'm bisexual and right now the only people who know that are me, my sister, two or three friends, and those guys I banged. I really want to come out as bisexual, but the closet is really, really convenient. I think if I come out as bisexual on April Fool's Day, I'll be able to pass it off as a joke whenever someone's a dick about it and still enjoy the feeling of having told everyone. What do you guys think?",AskLGBT
Is there a genderless alternative to dress' and suits?,"My SO is sick of dress', however they do not feel comfortable wearing a full suit.  What alternatives are there?",AskLGBT
Looking for gender nonconforming models,"Hey! I'm developing a photography project featuring gender nonconforming individuals (or those who don't identify with the heteronormative definition of gender). Does anyone in this subreddit know of models/people that may be willing to participate in the project? Unfortunately, I live in the south and there aren't many people I can reach out to take part, so I anticipate some traveling on my end.


EDIT: Thanks for the feedback. LGBT centers will probably be my best bet.",AskLGBT
I feel attracted to masculine females and feminine males. Is there an official term for this?,"I had a convo with a friend (hetero flexible) about her preferences. (Not my own since I'm still closeted, so to say) and I can't really find a term. I know there's femmesexual for people that are attracted to feminine males and feminine females, but I can't really find anything for my own situation.

Anyone that knows anything? Thanks!",AskLGBT
How do you respond to the claim that LGBT persons can't have a relationship or marry because they can't have children?,,AskLGBT
"Those who were married to someone of the opposite sex but found out they were gay/lesbian, what made you realize?",,AskLGBT
Friend pressuring me to date girls,"Any girl to be specific. She's been doing this since I discussed that I might be asexual with her. I don't really get it but I guess her reasoning is that since I don't really get attracted to guys it doesn't matter but every time I tell her I'm not really attracted to girls either she pretty much ignores me and keeps saying things like ""oh well we can still find you a significant other, girlfriend, whatever *wink*"" I really dont get why she keeps doing this and idk what to do to get her to stop so if anyone had suggestions I'd appreciate it. 
(Additional info: I'm a girl, early twenties, never dated before, not all that interested in it either? My interest in all genders is pretty much the same- not very interested at all. She's the same age as me and straight which makes this whole thing stranger. I think she might want a lesbian friend or something and figures I'm close enough??? but like I said idk what her deal is) ",AskLGBT
unsure,"It might be weird to ask a bunch of strangers on the internet, but I don't feel comfortable talking to anyone I know about this. 
I'm not sure if I'm bisexual.
I've only been with 2 guys in my life and I didn't enjoy it, just thinking about it gives me anxiety.
I've been interested in one woman in my life, and wanted to pursue her but she was dating a guy.
I find women more attractive than men, but I do find both attractive, and have never found myself in a relationship with a woman. 
I only enjoy lesbian porn. 
I'm confused.",AskLGBT
Teachers at my school being ordered to separate gay students in a relationship.,"**TL;DR A gay relationship is being split apart by parents and admin at my school, and I would like to know ways I and other concerned teachers can show them support while not overstepping my boundaries.**

I'm a seventh grade teacher at a small school in Texas, and one of my colleagues was opening up to me about a pair of male students (seniors) who have been in a relationship for about six months. Both students are multi-talented, intelligent, and driven.

One of the parents (deeply religious, and has their hands deep in a lot of the school's business) hacked into their son's Cloud and discovered and read all of the text messages that he and his boyfriend have been texting to one another for the past six months and have now been trying to convince him that his boyfriend is trying to manipulate him and is evil.

The parent has taken there concern to the administrators of whom have now been ordering teachers to separate the two students in all of their classes, and to not question the request. The issue with this (not just that it's horrible and heartbreaking) is that the classes for seniors are very small as this is a small school. They also compete on various UIL teams together. This has lead to the boyfriend (the one without the overprotective parents) kicking himself off the teams, sacrificing himself so that his boyfriend can still compete.

As a gay teacher, this story brought me to tears for a number of reasons. One being that I went through this in high school. My ex-boyfriend's parents thought I was the spawn of Satan, born to corrupt their son. Second being that I don't know these kids, but I want so desperately to help them. Not necessarily help their relationship survive, but to help them as individuals, to let them know that they aren't evil people, and that their love is perfectly normal.

I guess my question is, what can I do, if anything, or what can their teachers that want to help them do, to be supportive, while also having to follow these insane rules sent to them by the administration?

",AskLGBT
"I'm gay but get offended when people think I'm gay...that's weird, right?","So, I'm a closeted homosexual. I'm eighteen. The story here is that I've had a couple girls at work express interest in dating me, to which I gently decline with some sort of excuse (the latest being, ""I'm sorry, but we work together and I think it'd be awkward if things went wrong). Obviously, I didn't want to date her because I'm gay. A fellow coworker, who has a crush on said girl, later told his friends he thought I was gay because I turned her down (this was behind my back, a guy who was there told me about it later). Of course I denied. But then I realized I was angry he thought I was gay. I'm not sure why I reacted that way! Is that weird?",AskLGBT
I have a question about the LGBT cultural significance of the movie Mulan.,"So my wife posted a picture on Instagram of my son watching Mulan (he's addicted, could watch it back to back to back if we let him) and almost solely her gay friends commented on it basically saying it was a good move to teach him the theme of the movie early. Now, I've seen this movie at least 30 times now (3 year old again); I can see intergender themes, feminist themes and the obvious gender (as in sex) role themes, but I can't find any true gay themes. I feel I'm pretty progressive when it comes to the topic but it's bothering me that I can't see the appeal to the gay community. Can anyone explain?",AskLGBT
We just got engaged... now what?,"Hi, we just got engaged and plan to marry in an equality state next year. We signed up for theknot.com but it seems to be lacking in LGBT support? How do we weed through all the photos of brides and just find the info we need specific to us?",AskLGBT
A friend of mine is transgendered and I was hoping to find some books for children on the subject.,"My family is friends with another family. The bio-mom of the parental unit in that family is starting to present as more male. Because of this, my children (4 and 2, but really only the 4 year old is relevant in this) are asking a lot of questions that I've been doing my best to answer for them based on my own experiences. Are there any children's books that help them understand what may be going on?  I don't want the type of book that tries to show ""tolerance"" (I find the word loaded in that it almost denotes a value judgment), I'd prefer one that just kind of goes with the concept like the natural part of humanity it is.

They've met people post-transition before with no issue, so it's not that I feel the need to explain the concept itself; I really just want to help them understand the process and why/how a person they've known for a while is changing the way they are.",AskLGBT
Looking for advice on what I can do for/say to a friend?,"He has been straight up until last year he said he was Bi. He is 24/25 if that matters. I'll note here he mostly talks about subjects like this with one friend who isn't me so I get the information second hand. After coming out as Bi he apparently didn't like our reaction. Which our reaction was pretty neutral just a ""whatever you are cool with."" Not sure if he expected us to be anti gay or something. Since he has moved to a different city for some work it seems he is struggling between straight/gay/bi. What can I do for him or say to him that may help him not go insane and not make it weird that I want to say something?  

I hope that makes sense. ",AskLGBT
"I am a cisgendered, pansexual (or bisexual, I don't really care what you call me) female who is attracted to many variations of genitals/gender identities, but I am particularly attracted to/turned on by women with penises.","I have been with mostly cis men, but I find myself, as my title says, particularly attracted to feminine women who have a penis (whether they are non-op trans or otherwise). What I'm wondering is why does this seem to be uncommon? It seems rather common for men to be attracted to this, but when searching the Internet, I have not found much discussion of or reference to women who have this preference. Even porn seems to have very little available of PIV with two women. I just wanted to start a discussion for this specifically, since I couldn't find one, and see if there are many women out there who are like me.

If I have said anything ignorant or insensitive to the trans community, I apologize.",AskLGBT
"As actual members of the LGBT community/ies, what are your takes on ""coming out""?","Okay, so it just dawned on me that ""coming out"" is something everyone is familiar with, gay or straight, bisexual or transgender or cisgender; whatever walk of life. Pretty much everyone has heard of it. It's a cultural shared knowledge, as a concept. However, there is a wrinkle: it pertains exclusively to the LGBT community, but it's a concept not exclusively controlled/defined by the LGBT community.

Does it ever strike you as weird, that way? Am I overthinking this? Please give me your thoughts, I'm very curious what y'all think about this.",AskLGBT
"[xpost from /r/asexuality] I'm considering doing hormone therapy, but it's complicated...",,AskLGBT
Resources for a debate on gendered pronouns?,"Hi everyone! I'm new to this subreddit, and I'm here with a hard purpose. A good friend of mine and I were having a debate about gendered pronouns - that is, whether it is reasonable to expect people to change the way they talk about others based on the gender identities of those about whom they are talking. (does that make sense?)

Anyway, we didn't make a lot of headway, so we decided to switch sides and argue the other person's point. This is happening later.

I am trying to find some resources about gendered pronouns and why people feel they are so important. So far all my research has unearthed some very hateful, vehement blogs. I'm hoping that there is a more level headed, less emotional argument out there, and I thought you all might be able to recommend some reading.

In summary: Looking for reputable, level headed reading that tells me why it's important to use pronouns based on gender identity instead of how they're used in mainstream, classical society.

Any good leads?",AskLGBT
"Why do I sometimes find myself sexually responding to people I would normally find unattractive? Sometimes I feel like I am attracted to nobody, but could have sex with anyone. Internalised homophobia/heterophobia?","I am female and at times I feel like I am homosexual and biromantic, and at other times I feel like I am homoromantic and bisexual, but overall I have no 100% certainty. I feel that for 98% I prefer women and would like to have a relationship with one. 

However my sexuality kind of causing me issues and distress in a way. 

When I was younger I did not really have the courage to act on same -sex attractions and hooked up with men only. I know that I had same sex attractions from a very young age, but I did not want to be 'weird' so I 'made myself' think about men in a sexual way. I was vaguely 'grossed out' by straight sex and I tried to suppress that by 'getting used mentally to the idea of straight sex'.

Most of my hookups at the time I did it without being attracted to the guys in question. Later it became a thing of trying to 'push myself' and have sex with people I have explicitly found *unattractive*. 

I could be attracted to a guy mentally/emotionally and because of that I made  myself ignore the fact that I was physically a bit grossed out by him, and later I developed attractions based on his personality. 

There were also men of course whom I did not hate, but found kind of neutral in terms of physical attraction: I wanted to be close emotionally to them though. I liked the body of the person I had feelings for.  I think that I  am also capable of being sensually attracted to a person regardless of their sex. 

When I finally explored being with a woman I've realised that I do significantly prefer being with a woman in a relationship, and sexually, to the extent that I felt I am gay.
The only long term relationship I had with a man was riddled with emotional and sexual frustration and loneliness and I missed being with a woman. Being with a woman just feels 'right', it feels more comfortable and natural to me. I am also very much attracted sexually to female bodies, whilst looking at male nudes never did anything for me. 
Being with men always felt kind of destructive and even when it felt genuine.

But, when it comes to actual sexual attraction to people in my life I am just completely confused. I feel like I am gay and don't want to be bi/straight, but then there are those sexual responses which sabotage my sense of being lesbian, and make me feel  full of self-loathing. 


When I feel an attraction that feels comfortable and strong and 'real': it is usually to a woman and it feels really like a soul-to soul, and physical attraction. It is strong and physically powerful and it sends a rush of happiness into me, but it happens very rarely. Usually I just check out people I find interesting looking, but without actually feeling attracted to them. I don't think I've ever felt this kind of attraction/connection to a man, but it is possible, I cannot remember it. 

 I usually don't feel sexually attracted to almost anyone, for days. 
Then the tension builds and I suddenly start feeling sexual responses to almost anyone, including people &amp; men I would normally find repulsive and not attractive. 

It never is towards guys who are actually physically attractive, most of the time it is towards people who would really make me feel uncomfortable in real life. It lasts of short period of time and it sends me into spirals of self-loathing. 

I am completely not ok with going back to having casual, lonely, gross sex with random dudes I find aesthetically repulsive, but in the very moment I see that guy I think ""oh I would not mind dating/hooking up with him'. 
Its like a flashback and it makes me feel  very uncomfortable afterwards.

I don't know how to reconcile this with my attraction to women: I accept that I am attracted to women, but when it actually comes to acting on it, or acknowledging it to her face I still have difficulties, because I don't want to come across as a pervert and I really don't feel like I deserve being with a woman. 

I feel deeply uncomfortable with my responses to men, I don't want to be straight, I don't want to be even bi, and yet I get those periods of time where I feel sexual responses in situations which later will make me feel uncomfortable. I feel like I have damaged myself somehow :/ 
Please help me unpick all this. 

",AskLGBT
"Gay guys, what does arousal feel like to you?","Straight guy here who thinks he might have kinked his way into homosexuality (or at least bisexuality). I know that probably sounds really stupid and politically incorrect, but I'm a curious person and was trying to explore gay porn from various mindsets (jacking mostly to femdom but switching to gay porn occasionally to see if I could ""get"" it). I guess I thought it would be ""cool"" to be bisexual.

The point is I had a ""successful"" experience, something clicked and it felt amazing, until I came at which point what I was looking at was suddenly disgusting (which could be evidence I've changed nothing about my sexuality), but afterwards everything felt completely different, like I had completely lost my ability to feel and be masculine - which I still don't feel I've fully regained (the mindset I was approaching the gay porn was one of very high submissiveness, but that this guy would also take care of me (due to his attraction and my leveraging - I was actually pretending to be a girl while doing this)- I know how horribly politically incorrect all this probably sounds). 

Anyway, at times it feels like there's this outside force acting on my body, kind of like my body language is being ""put upon"". Idk it's really hard to describe, kind of a weakness, which can come in waves, kind of like when you're laughing really hard, but this is just walking around the place or lying in bed. My question : 

Is arousal just a penis thing as with most straight guys, or do you feel it elsewhere in your body?
Do you feel ""waves"" or tingles through you body or limbs (or around the general groin area) or anything else other than ""oh my dick is getting hard""....

Thanks in advance.",AskLGBT
"If a guy is gay, and he doesn't want to have sex with anyone until he can commit himself to that person for the rest of his life, is that bad?",,AskLGBT
"Is my on-off bf bisexual/gay/asexual/gender confused, in the closet or simply a sexual fetishist maybe?","Hi, 

I am female and mostly into women but hesitate to call myself completely gay, because I also get emotionally attracted to men and have had a few hook ups and relationships with men before things clarified for me that I am sexually more attracted to women. 

I've had this on and off relationship with one guy for many years and I have been in love with him at some point.  

 I think our sex life really damaged  me and my confidence in some sense because he was 

1) very different sexually to all the other men I've known
2) kind of distant during sex and he refused to kiss me during sex. 
3) he was also very rigid in terms of what he was comfortable with: no nipple play for him, me always submissive, no breast play/touching. He basically never grabbed my body sexually, apart from intercourse.
4) I am more of an active person, a 'top' with women and yet he felt deeply uncomfortable with me being in any way active, just wanted me to be 'feminine' for him. 

I've felt very unattractive sexually with him, and I am not unattractive. 
When I've met him my weight was 'normal', since then I've both lost a stone, and then put on a stone, but overall I much fitter than when he met me: I work out regularly, run, cycle, lift a bit.  I could probably loose a stone now, but he has behaved like that towards me even when I was slim. 
 I also have breasts, they've been between 34C to 34E  and he never touched them in either size. 

We spoke about it, and he said that he was attracted to me, and did not want to break up with me,  but why did I never *feel* his attraction? 

It is easy to say that my sexual preference for women was the issue here, but with other men I never felt so distant/isolated as with him, so it must be also an issue coming from him. 
He watches a lot of erotica/porn, but it is mostly pictures of nude women, and photos of couples having sex. I think he liked to imagine himself being either the man or the woman in that couple. *in preference to actual sex*. 

He always says that he is attracted to women and always denies that he has any attraction to men himself, but I've found some written fantasies online by him which basically left me confused and made me feel like he is sexually in denial about something, but what? 

Here is one of the fantasies he wrote (emphasis my own)

&gt;""Straight Fantasy
I'm a straight male, but (...) I mentally alternate between preferring the male and the female fantasy of having sex.

&gt;I love slim, beautiful female bodies, and though I appreciate the aesthetic of a handsome man, have **no sexual feeling to them from my own bodily self**. But when turned on, I reflect on how women seem to be able to enjoy sex more than men. **I love to imagine their imagination and desire for their partner.** A few times as a student I overheard couples having sex, and it was the woman's pleasure you could hear. Sometimes gasps of relief, other times rhythmic panting, trying hard not to make too much noise. In general women are far more vocal during sex, giving themselves up to the feeling, emotionally opening themselves to the vulnerability of penetration.

&gt;The whole cross-dressing thing doesn't appeal at all though: my body is male and isn't going to become female through accessorising it. In fantasy we take the place of the other who is NOT us - that is what is arousing about it, the pure strangeness.""

I don't get it, and it has affected me, because I had strong feelings for this guy and apparently he still does for me, but  all this sexual unhappiness, this sexual disconnection made me feel like it was my fault, that I did something wrong or was physically repulsive to him. 

What do you think is going on? 
Could he be gay but so repressed that he makes himself believe that it is all a fantasy of experiencing sex from the woman's perspective? 
Is he a simply an asexual fetishist? ",AskLGBT
Why do people only pursue relationships with those they're sexually attracted to?,"Here's just some prefixing on what I am, which influences how I think, I'm an asexual male, though I exclusively pursue relationships with women. Sex is something I do for them when they ask, but it's not something I pursue or find gratifying.  
  
I was thinking in the shower, as one does, after getting agitated with my partner. A thought that passed by was ""If there was a male that I was extremely compatible with mentally, I would happily live with and spend a majority of my time with them, though I wouldn't find them sexually attractive."" - ultimately that's what I'd also look for in women, were I looking for that sort of relationship.  
  
I then got to thinking more broadly... Why wouldn't anyone of any sexual orientation think this way? There could be somebody you're completely in tune with, but the genitalia they have doesn't increase your blood flow so you don't want to spend your life with them? With so many external avenues to have children, which continues to remain the core reason why people bond, why is chemistry still less important than sexual compatibility?  
  
I figured I'd throw this question out here where having children the vanilla way is out of the norm, hopefully leading to a more thought provoking response than ""to have kids, dummy"".",AskLGBT
Why would a lesbian have sex with a straight guy?,That is something that I have wondered because my of my friends was out and about met this Lesbian at the bar and they hooked up. I don't understand why that lesbian would do that.,AskLGBT
Engagement rings and wedding rings,"Hi All,

My boyfriend and I have been together for 3 years and we already know that we want to spend the rest of our lives together. We've talked about proposals and wedding and we've agreed we don't want both an engagement ring and a wedding ring but we do want a proposal with a ring. Any suggestions what have you'll done?",AskLGBT
Do people who are LGBT have any difficulty understanding the various sexual orientation identifiers?,"I feel like generally as a cis gender heterosexual male, I feel this identifiers are only difficult for me understand. (I know woe is me). I consider myself very progressive, its just hard to follow. I mean some of them are easy to understand pansexual, sapiosexual, asexual, even queer but biromantic? That one is kind of perplexing. I hope this doesn't sound like a rant, its more questioning is it only hard for people who aren't LGBT to understand and if you could shed some light on the term biromantic, that would be cool too. ",AskLGBT
[Poll] Masturbation-Age-Gender,,AskLGBT
A couple of stupid questions..,"If you are attracted to the same sex do you feel aroused while looking in a mirror naked?

Is there drama with in lgbt comunity? Like full on gay people thinking that bi and transgender people are just fooling themselves or Bi people not understanding how can someone be attracted to only one sex.

Do you have that high pitched tyler oukley voice? What percentege of gay people youve met act somewhat more feminised? 


For lesbians do you prefer manlier wemen or otherwise? What percentege of lesbians you know are big and manly?

Hope this doesnt offend anyone. If that happends it wasnt my intention. 

",AskLGBT
"My school's GSA want's to change it's name to something more inclusive, but we don't have any good ideas. Perhaps you lot have some?","We want one that's more inclusive than GSA, is ""Hip and Cool"", and still keeps the idea of GSA.  Preferably, it should be short and memorable.

Thanks!",AskLGBT
"I got incredibly nervous when texting a girl I liked, overtexted, she said to leave her alone. is this irreparable?","Hey AskLGBT,

I'm a 21 year old girl, been straight for 20 years, fell head over heels for a girl last summer, who i never ended up with, and realized ""HOLY FUCKING SHIT *WOMEN*"" and have been just in this dream-like daze where I'm just incredibly happy and feel normal and free every time I imagine myself with a woman. I reached out on tinder and met a few really cool people, and decided to actually meet one of them in person. let's call her Shane. So, I'm nervous as hell doing this, I've never met an e-friend before, nonetheless a stunning one. I nearly had a heart attack driving into the city, donned in the most confusing costume (a mix between a my little pony and ellen page) NOTE: THIS WAS HALLOWEEN and walked to a party at a huge venue with a rag tag group of lesbians that parked near the 7-11 like i did. We finally roll up and I gaze the crowd for her. i glance at my phone, let her know i'm here and see her leaning on a car. she looks up and recognizes me instantly and hugs me, she shows me to her friend group and introduces me to everyone we bump into. she gives me her jacket because it was a cold-ass night. it felt warm and smelled incredible. we decided to skip the venue we were at because the lines were hideous, we piled into my dirty car (i suck at driving, we all laughed the whole time, Shane kept reassuring me and there were like 6 of us) and went to a gay bar instead. it had multiple floors and we went right in, Shane knew a lot of people who worked there. we walked up different narrow sets of stairs, she kept an eye on me and asked if i was ok often. I giggled and we barely could hear one another, she told me ""welcome to the madness, welcome to the gayborhood"" and I had an incredible night meeting people dressed in crazy good costumes and dancing and drinking and it was fucking magic. we stayed until the bar closed at 2 and were forced out laughing, we walked the streets as a pair and talked about life, crazy stories, we asked a lot about eachother. we tried to hit a diner, but they were all packed. I drove her home, but we stayed in my car and talked for what must have been an hour or two. we clicked really well, and i honestly fell for her. she gave me advice and told me she also suffered from depression, and took well to me telling her i had OCD. we part ways, she said we'll hang soon and that it was an awesome night. we were both nervous. 

skip ahead, we text everyday, funny things, goings on, whatever. I ask for advice on coming out and really finding comfort in my sexuality, and often said lame dad jokes. I eventually tell her I liked her, but to no response -- AND I PRETTY MUCH PANICKED, it was only like a day of no answering that made me sweat like a pig and want to throw my phone at a wall, which honestly this whole thing was incredibly juvenile.
after many unanswered texts of me asking if i offended her or if she didn't want to be friends, and drunk texts asking how she was, she drew a line and told me to quit being persistent and pretty much harassing her. I felt fucking creepy. she said i was throwing myself a pity party for not answering her and i totally understood and apologized for being annoying and childish but she just asked for me to leave her alone for good and that she's just a girl. 

honestly, I know this is true, but I just wanted to be her friend and went overboard and ruined everything. has anyone been in this situation? is time the only thing that can help this? i feel so embarrassed and insane. 

**TL;DR: I met a girl i clicked with, had one amazing night exploring together, both got romantic, texted often, then i told her i liked her. she didn't respond for like a day and a half which was excruciating so i cracked and over texted her, until it was basically just a one sided convo and she wants nothing to do with me now. WHAT DO? I know to let her go and move on but shit man, she was something else.**",AskLGBT
Please help me conduct a survey on transender discrimination in the workplace!!,Your responses will be anonymous and very much appreciated!,AskLGBT
Is it okay to not *actively* support gay marriage?,"So I'm straight and I completely support gay marriage, but I've read/heard some people say things like: 

""I don't agree with it, but it's none of my business""

""I don't care, but I don't support it""

etc. 

Whenever I see things like this, I get really uncomfortable, but everyone has their own beliefs...

I dunno what to think. Is this okay?",AskLGBT
"Guys, gals, undecided, how do you feel about the word ""tranny""?","Okay, I'm sorry up front if the word offends, but I'm curious how it's perceived by both cis and trans persons.",AskLGBT
Can a gay person turn straight?,I was just wondering if it was possible for a gay person to become straight?  ,AskLGBT
A question about gendered pronouns and gender fluidity.,"I have a friend who has come out as gender fluid. In her case (she's identifying as female today) she feels like she wakes up one gender or another and her attitude, mode of dress, and even body language changes as a result. My question is what pronouns do people prefer in these situations where the presented gender changes every day. She doesn't personally care one way or another, but should I find myself befriending another with the same sense of gender, I would like to know the right words in case they DO care.",AskLGBT
A little help for an older brother whose 14 year old brother just came out to him.,"I was wondering if there were any resources for family members of underage LGBT people. Not so much a ""Sexuality and Gender 101"" as I have had alot of experiences with the LGBT community previous to this but more somethings tailored towards younger kids. 

I was supportive and I helped explain somethings to the best of my ability and was frankly shocked by his adult grasp of himself and his feelings but I can't help but think I better get a bloody good grasp on the fundamentals from people who maybe had some similar experiences to him at the same age.

As for his specific situation, he is 14 and after a lot of very very odd behaviour he finally told me that he had had sex with another boy his age that he knew through his school. Apparently they had spent a long long time talking about how they felt about it, whether they both consented and what the potential repercussions were for each other in their social groups. This frankly amazed me as while I love my brother he is honestly not the world's most grown up kid. They ended up swearing each other to secrecy but otherwise both seem to have had a safe and enjoyable if very scary new experience.

However he seems to have been torn apart inside about the way that other people would see him, what this meant for his identity as a person and whether what he had done was wrong. When he told me and I didn't flinch away as if he was broken It genuinely seemed as if a huge weight had been lifted off of his shoulders. 

Anyway, I was hoping that some of you could share experiences/resources that might help me be slightly more equipped to help him with his situation. 

Thanks in Advance.",AskLGBT
Question about a pansexual friend.,"Hey all! A small question, if you don't mind.

I have a friend who is out as pansexual. When I was first trying to understand what she meant, she told me she likes all genders. Cool, ok.

But then she said that it meant to be attracted to anyone no matter how they looked, not just genitals-wise. In particular, she went out with this super nerdy guy and we were talking about why she liked him and she said ""I'm pansexual so it doesn't matter what he looks like to me, even though he's not considered attractive I still have a crush on him.""

She went on to dating another traditionally physically ""unattractive"" guy and saying the same thing, that she was attracted not to physical beauty but personality.

Is this how most pansexual people feel? I thought it was attraction regardless of gender, not looks?

Any illumination on the matter is helpful, please thanks. :)",AskLGBT
Engagement Ring shopping,"Hello everyone!
I am going to propose to my amazing girlfriend next summer. I have it all planned out - the where, how, and when. Now I just need the engagement ring. 
I've been hoping I could find one I liked/she would like being sold by a smaller business, preferably one which supports the LGBTQ+ community. I've found a few websites, but uh, they also break the bank. $5000 for a ring? Yikes. I was hoping for something closer to $500, but I can go up to a thousand. 

Anyone know any places which sell engagement rings like this? Thanks!

And if you have any tips on how to make the engagement special, let me know!",AskLGBT
"Bisexuals, what are you attracted to?","Specifically, is it that you are attracted to people in an ambiguous sense, or are there certain things in each gender that you are attracted to? Or even if there are just certain characteristics that you find attractive and it's found in all genders?

EDIT: If this is the wrong sub for this, I'd appreciate a redirect.",AskLGBT
Do you feel awkward/out of place when you use a changing room ?,"Context: I'm a bi female. 

The other I was in a public changing room at my local pool. I was not nude (just went in there to wash the chorine off my goggle and cap) and there was a group of totally hot babes naked and semi naked. I tried not to look but a some points I could not help it. 

My questions relating to this incident are, do you think they would cover up more if I had a sign above me saying ""bi sexual""? 
Do you think they would offended if they knew I found  them hot? 
Does this happen to you and does it make you feel super awkward? ",AskLGBT
Am I a homophobic?,"I've gotta ask this as I've been getting some flak lately and I disagree with it.

Basically, I have zero issue with LGBT stuff, but the question comes up sometimes in about my opinion on homosexual couples adopting children. In my country of citizenship it's totally kosher but in the other country I live in that's kinda the one thing homosexuals still aren't allowed to do.

Essentially though, I am of the opinion that regardless of whether a couple is hetero- or homosexual they should be able to adopt but I think if a heterosexual couple and a homosexual couple receive the *exact same suitability rating or w/e* in attempting to adopt a child that the heterosexual couple should receive the child because in western (Euro/North American) society the child is likely to get less flak/bullied over the orientation of the parents.

It's not that I think homosexuality is a problem.

It's not that I think homosexuals cannot raise a child.

Kids can be cruel and what is different is picked on, something a lot of us learn as kids if we fall into the category of those consistently bullied. I simply think it'd be easier for a child to come from a heterosexual home than a homosexual if that's possible. Adopted kids have enough issue without that thrown on top.

I have some friends/peers who seem to quite adamantly believe this makes me homophobic.

I don't think it does.

So I ask, if I think that a heterosexual couple should receive a child over a homosexual couple *who qualifies exactly equally financially/socially/etc* on the grounds that in 2014 western society it'll be easier for the kid but I have zero qualms with homosexuals adopting children in general, am I then a homophobe?

Thanks! ",AskLGBT
"After being bisexual for 27 years, could I possibly have just realized I'm gay?","I'm 27, have been with my fair share of men and always enjoyed it. I know I am attracted to women, fantasized about them and only enjoyed lesbian porn. I've gotten pretty far with women before, but haven't found any I'm interested in enough to actually have sex with (although it's all I can think about lately). I'm kind of picky in both men and women, so no bias there. After about 4 months of self imposed celibacy, I had sex with the man I had last hooked up with. Previously, I found it thoroughly enjoyable and fulfilling. This time I hated it. I didn't like the feeling of his penis inside me AT ALL and I just wanted it to stop. I put in my best effort, and even did it again later that night only to have the same result. No physical issue, plenty of foreplay, I just did not enjoy the feeling of it at all and wanted it to be over. He's always pleased me before and he did things that used to work magic on me, but while he was on top of me all I could think about was women. What's going on here? Was this just a bad night, or was it the 4 month dry spell, or am I just realizing I'm gay? I've always tended to be someone who feels things gradually, then suddenly. Is that what this is? A little insight please
",AskLGBT
"Lesbians who had a child by sperm donor, do you know the donor? Do they want to help raise the child?",,AskLGBT
Should I introduce my lesbian friends to one another on a party I host?,"I have three lesbian friends, who are going to attend my birthday party. They don't know one another and each of them recently told me that they are single and currently looking for dates. All of them are great persons and I think they should get to know each other. What could be a nice way to introduce them?

You might tell me, well, do exactly the same you'd do with your hetero single friends. However, I'm unsure what to say anyway. Or if I should say anything at all. 
",AskLGBT
Son might be bi... Questions about support.,"My 13 year old son has mentioned to someone else that he might be bi. He can usually tell me everything, but I understand this is a huge thing, and he hasn't told me or my wife (heard it from this other friend of his). My wife and I are very open, and very pro-gay. We support them for everything, and this would be no exception. I have let him know that if he needs to talk or anything we're always here. 

I just want to make sure that he talks to us is he needs to and doesn't feel like he's alone or anything. 

Does anyone have any suggestions? I don't want to tell him we know, and break that trust he has with the other person, or make him feel bad or anything like that (no reason to feel bad, but he's a pubescent teen). We're here for him, as always. Should I wait for him to come to me? :/ I've always said that I wouldn't care if he was gay/straight/bi/trans, whatever. But, I didn't really think about the whole coming out phase... Is it generally the hardest part? I hear stories of some that are scared to tell others and they run away or try suicide.  That's what I'm fearing. :( I just want to make sure I'm doing what I can without breaking the trust that he has for the one person that he's told... ",AskLGBT
How did you find out you were gay / trans / bi (etc)? (X post from AskGSM),"I'm curious, as I'm in sort of a 'limbo' myself and wanted to gather everyone's opinions / stories on how they came to discover themselves.",AskLGBT
Between DB and coming out,"My wife (40 yo woman) told me this weekend that she no longer wants to have sex with me (40 yo man). She says that she may be bisexual or a lesbian. She's not cheated and she doesn't seem eager to go out and start a new relationship with a woman. She's probably right that her sexuality may have shifted, but I also think that she may be very low libido and not want to have sex with anyone, really. 

Anyone else seen this? Is this a common coming out process? Any help? ",AskLGBT
"Do some gay men call their boyfriends ""daddy""?",,AskLGBT
Wondering how to handle a situation I found myself in a while back.,"So I work at a roller skating rink. All of our rental skates there are sized in mens. So when women tell me their shoe size I usually tell them this or ask if what they just told me was their size in womens shoes or sometimes just automatically adjust it myself if we're busy. 

So on a particular night an individual came in who in my own estimation was ostensibly a trans woman. (I suppose this introduces a host of other problems with the assumption of gender informed by preexisting stereotypes) So after she (which I later found out to be the correct pronoun) told me her size which I responding with, iirc, is that your size in womens? The confusion I have here is I feel like whatever I said or didn't say forced me to make an assumption to the gender of this person in giving her skates. So I'm just wondering what the most respectful way to have handled this situation is. I'm a straight male also if that's at all relevant. ",AskLGBT
"[Meta] We're supposed to help educate people, not shun them for what they don't know","I am incredibly sorry if this type of post is not allowed or is perhaps in the wrong place, but I keep seeing questions being asked by people who, one could reasonably assume, are unfamiliar with LGBT topics. Now obviously that's the aim of this subreddit.

But sometimes a question will be asked and it might be worded in a different way than those familiar with the community would have said it. Now surely this must be clear that the asker is unfamiliar with some of the subtleties of a more 'politically correct' language, but they get downvoted to Hell for it. They, not necessarily knowing what is okay or not okay to say in certain situations, are finding it harder to get the answers they want because the minute a slight sign of ignorance (here meaning genuine ignorance, not intolerance or *willful* ignorance - simply not knowing, **which is fine**) some people shit on them for it instead of actually helping.

I've never been the sort to tell people 'not to get offended' or that someone should 'toughen up' because I think it's stupid, but honestly guys? These people are potential friends and allies who have made at least one step in reaching out to our community - a community of equality and acceptance - only to be turned away because of a ridiculous and accidental faux-pas that had no intention of offending anybody.

I understand that there probably have been a few posts to this subreddit that have been deliberately derogatory, but that's sadly the way the internet is. I think this sub should have a /r/NoStupidQuestions sort of vibe, because ultimately people will be asking questions here whether they are a highly-respected member of certain LGBT communities or whether they simply don't understand certain facets.

This is just my two cents and I'm willing to comply with all moderator requests if my post is against any rules, and I look forward to hearing what you have to say regarding what I have written.

TL;DR guys, unless a question is deliberately intended to provoke or cause offense it should not be considered offensive.",AskLGBT
So I know I'm not straight. But what do I tell my friends?,"I have known for a really long time that I am attracted to girls. I tried really hard to be straight after I discovered that there was such a thing as homosexuality. Being ""gay"" was always equated to this otherness that was weaker than, less than, or worse than the norm. I fit into a lot of lesbian stereotypes, but whenever I've gotten shit from people, I denied it adamantly. 

I've dated guys. I've even been genuinely attracted to guys.

I haven't talked to my friends or family about this, but I need to. I want to stop living with all this shame. I'm fairly certain they'll be accepting and wonderful, but I don't know what to tell them. I'm bisexual? I'm a lesbian? I'm queer? I'm questioning? I'm something else?

How do you come out when you aren't sure what you are? Well...other than not straight.",AskLGBT
Gay men singing?,"Straight to the point: why is it that most gay guys sing/try to sing/think they can sing? I know lots of transexuals, and drags sing, but i've notice this is something very popular in gay men culture (broadway, glee, you name it)

I think my question is, why specifically singing? and i dont mean car/shower singing, I mean listen to a song and try to copy all the vibratos, high notes and whatnot... I tried asking my gay friend, he just bursted into a song",AskLGBT
How to deal with a possibly homophobic friend?,"I've been hanging out with a few guys for the past few months in order to get a possible band going. they are really fun to hang out with but I think one of them might be homophobic. He likes to make jokes about someone we all know by saying he's gay, and I'm sure this guy isn't gay but my friend constantly makes gay jokes about him. Sometimes he goes a bit far to the point where it seems like legit hatred for gays.


This doesn't personally offend me since I'm not gay but I feel like a hypocrite for not saying anything since I don't feel the same way he does. I think it's because he holds onto his religious beliefs quite strongly (we're into heavy music and I mentioned songs about evil stuff like demons and shit, and he said the devil needs to be killed, he told me he doesn't believe in evolution etc etc) and while I respect that he has beliefs, I would prefer if he just let the homophobia go. I obviously don't want to unbefriend this guy but I would prefer if we made things clear. I consider myself open minded and I like to think my friends are as well. I've considered just asking him straight up ""do you hate gays?"" but this seems a bit too blunt, and I eventually just let it go. How would you deal with this situation?",AskLGBT
"Is men(transgender, androgene, neutrois)'s wearing of female Kimono such as Furisode really taboo or profanity?","

Greetings everyone, it is pleasure to post my very first question on Reddit. I currently am 183cm(app 6ft) South Korean guy. I also plan to undergo estrogen injection, testicle removal and other surgeries diminish my masculinity whenever my conscription ends. Before or after those feminization processes, I will visit Japan to procure my own order made female Kimono....since such immense sized female kimonos lack It seems I cannot buy ready made ones
Here is the question: Is men's wearing of female Kimono a sort of taboo or profanity? If then will kimono shop owner/artisan refuse to sew my immense sized kimono? Will Japanese people lynch me and treat me as abomination because such huge person wears very feminine clothes? Besides, certain person knows kimono very well even informed me that ONLY okamas and weird comedians are wearing female variants.
Will it be acceptable if I wear furisodes alike in western countries?",AskLGBT
Question for anyone who has met people online or through dating apps.,"A little backstory...

I started talking to this guy on Tinder about a month ago. Long story short we started texting and about a week after our first message we met up. He lives a about an hour or two away, which in Texas isn't really that bad.  Anyways, we saw each other almost every weekend this month except this past one.  We planned on hanging at my place since it was on his way back home. When he started driving he called me and said he would be at my place in about an hour. I called him an hour and a half later and didn't answer and proceeded to ignore my calls/texts for the rest of the day. 

My first thought was that he got in an accident or something of the sort but later that evening he posted on Facebook that he made it home safe. Obviously he ditched me and I was hurt. But what surprised me most was the complete surprise I had. He gave no clues that he would have ever done that so now to my question.

Have any of you guys or gals had experiences similar to this? Anyone ever been cyber ditched in order to be stood up? It sucks but I only knew him for a month and he was applying for jobs in my city but also out of the country so I knew this was probably a summer fling thing. Just wanted to hear other opinions on this. Thanks!",AskLGBT
What does this mean?,"I'm a straight male.

So I'm at this party and I see some kid from my class and I say hi. He invites me to play beer pong and we play a game. he gives me his number and says he'll let me know about other parties on campus. 
I see him again a few times in class and one day he says we should chill and invites me to his apartment. He says we can go get food somewhere but first he had to send out a few emails. So I'm just sitting in his apartment. We're jus talking about our major and chilling and girls. He says he has a girlfriend back home. We're talking about drinking,smoking weed etc and he asks me how many times I masturbate per week and I didn't think much of it then; I just awkwardly answered. He then brings up the subject of dicks and asks if he could see my dick and said subtly hinted it wasn't sexual and he just 'liked' seeing dicks. i politely refused. fast forward a few months now and he deletes me off his facebook.

I'm wondering wtf happened. I'm confused.",AskLGBT
"To those that identify as a gender other than what they were biologically born as, how did you know for sure?","I'm sure this is a very silly question, with an obvious answer, but I'm interested in a personal response. I'll apologize in advance if the bluntness of it is offensive, as I've been putting off asking this question in this sub for months so I'm just throwing it out there.

Basically, how do you know for sure that you felt like that your biological gender did not match up with your mental one? I've read that it doesn't feel ""comfortable"". In what way?",AskLGBT
What are your experiences with the 'heterosexual assumption?,"We are seeking self-identified lesbians, gay men, bisexual men and women over the age of 18 years for the [Experiences with the Heterosexual Assumption Study](http://www.psychsurveys.org/kamclemore/ucd_lgbid) at [http://www.psychsurveys.org/kamclemore/ucd_lgbid](http://www.psychsurveys.org/kamclemore/ucd_lgbid). We are interested in work or social experiences you might have had in which someone assumed you were straight and how these experiences made you feel. This research has been reviewed and approved by our ethics review board (#386947-1).

Thank you for your time. 

Stigma, Self, and Social Identity Lab
Department of Psychology
University of California, Davis",AskLGBT
"Guys of any and all sexualitys, how do I flirt with both genders how does one flirt wih either gender for romantic intentions (a date, relationship) or sexual (picking up at a bar)",Im 17 bi and clueless and would kinda like to know,AskLGBT
Is this offensive and/or homophobic? (picture),"http://i.imgur.com/xdKad1Hh.jpg  

It's one of those coffee mugs that changes when you put hot liquid in it. My dad has a Dr Who one, where a Tardis appears when you pour the coffee in, and my sister has one with a muscle-bound hunk, whose clothes disappear. This one says ""I am proud to say simply g'day"", but when you pour the coffee in, certain letters disappear, so that the message changes to ""I am proud to say im[sic] gay"".     

My first thought was that it was gross and disgusting. That it was a ""hilarious"" prank, where you give the mug to some red-blooded manly man as a gift, only to see the the horror in his face as the message changes, and he finds himself unwittingly announcing that he's a dirty gay.    

But then, not everything has to be terrible. The mug coukd be owned by an out and proud member of the community, who enjoys novelty nick-nacks.   

But I still have a queasy feeling that it's a coffee mug for homophobes.  
But as a straight person, my own queasy feeling doesn't count for much. Would the community be offended by this? ",AskLGBT
"As a woman, how do I know when other women are hitting on me?","I can't tell if they're doing that ""I'm going to act like I'm flirting because friendship"" or if it's actual flirting.",AskLGBT
"To the homosexuals of reddit, what do you think of the ""op is a faggot"" meme, and it prevalence on reddit?","I come across it fairly often and usually get downvoted to oblivion for trying to call people out on using a slur. Often times I will hear ""I know gay people and they don't care if I use it, it is just a joke""

So do you care?",AskLGBT
To any and all queer individuals: What do you identify as and how did your friends/family take you coming out to them?,,AskLGBT
This is going to sound kind of odd...,"But is there a term for an effeminate looking gay guy? I don't mean flamboyant, u mean like skinny, petite, effeminate... pretty much the antithesis of a bear.

This probably sounds really odd, but in just curious.",AskLGBT
What type of youtube vlogging videos would you guys be interested in?,"I am a transmasculine genderqueer lesbian. I am 19 and live in an apartment in the Poconos with my girlfriend of almost 4 years and our 11 pets. What would you guys be interested to see in a youtube vlogging channel from me? If you post specific questions, I will answer them in the video.",AskLGBT
Confused about my sexuality,"Hello, I am a 16 year old male. I have no idea what sexuality I am. I am attracted to both sexes. (Sometimes women/men more than the other at times) However, I also have no want for sex, having a relationship appeals to me more than that brief second of an orgasm. I just honestly don't know. I like girls, guys, and sometimes neither. Is this normal? Do you think I am Gay/Bi/Asexual? I am just so confused and this has been on my mind for a very, very long time. Is it normal for people who are gay/straight to just have very long periods of asexuality? I am sorry for the rambling nature of this post, I just have so many questions.",AskLGBT
"Getting called ""yumuşak"" by Turkish co-workers. Is this offensive?","Hi, /r/AskLGBT!

I work at a charter school and a number of my colleagues are Turkish.

For a long time I was closeted with my staff members, which was difficult. A lot of the conversations at the school are geared toward significant others and I felt like I couldn't participate. I finally was able to come out to a few coworkers that I felt comfortable with and was accepted by them, which felt amazing.

A couple of Turkish coworkers caught wind of this, and knowing the conservative feelings toward homosexuality in Turkey and in Islam, I was worried; however, nothing bad has happened.

They have started calling me yumuşak as a sort of nickname. Yumuşak, in Turkish means ""soft"", but it's become a word to call ""effeminate"" men. I've been using it, too to joke back with them; however, if this word is an equivalent of the word ""faggot"" in English, I don't want to say it, and I'd like to let them know if the word is derogatory in nature that we shouldn't be saying it, regardless of the language we're saying it in.

**TLDR is the Turkish word ""yumuşak"" a derogatory word for gay people?**",AskLGBT
Is it normal to get flustered around good looking people?,I'm 19 (m) now and I have pretty much always known that I was gay.  But recently I noticed that I get a little flustered around women.  I went to a coffee shop yesterday and couldn't keep from blushing while I was talking to the pretty barista girl behind the counter.  Is it normal to get a little shy and nervous around attractive people of both genders or is that a sign that I might be bisexual?   ,AskLGBT
"Why is it so commonplace for lesbians to ""dispose"" of their former lovers and husbands?","If you do some research into any of the prominent lesbians in the country, you will find a long paper trail of former lovers who have gone missing or were found brutally murdered. Often times one of the deceased is the lesbian's husband, who was killed in the name of feminism. These murders are called ""politically correct killings"" by the media, and the lesbian is excused from any blame on every occasion.

Studies have shown that 70% of all lesbians have been violent with their same sex partners, including rape and murder. ""Murder of the husband is commonplace in a feminist household. Feminist legal systems are reluctant to impose heavy charges against one of their own and instead cover it up."" (Bell 14)

It sickens me to read these stories, and I wonder how much further it will go from here if this behavior becomes universally condoned or swept under the rug in the name of political correctness.

What is it about lesbians that makes them so violent? Why do they feel such a strong impulse to kill those they have known carnally? Could lesbianism be caused by the same premenstrual restlessness associated with feminist androcidal behavior? (Bell 43)

Video about a group of feminist lesbians killing a man: https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=VAGt9D1tI7A",AskLGBT
"I'm 14, and have had thoughts about other boys for a long time. I'm scared, because I've never thought about the possibility of me being gay for a long time. Does anyone have advice or thoughts?","To clarify, I'm not homophobic, just scared because I have never thought about this very much, only pushed it aside. It's hard for me to get turned on by girls at all, and I still have supressed thoughts about other boys. I'm very scared right now, because I've had to deal with a lot of bullying this year already, and I just don't want any more. 
I just would like to know if any gay males on here have this situation in common with me, because I'm really not sure if this is normal for a straight male, or if I'm gay. Thank you for any advice, and I'm sorry if any of this sounded ignorant. Thank you :).",AskLGBT
Language Question (More on the RuPaul Controversy),"This is copied and pasted from a comment I left on the Advocate website. I'm sincerely interested in this issue for a couple reasons and I would love it if anybody wanted to talk it out. So here you go!


RuPaul is somewhere on the gender variant spectrum, no? Drag is a way of embracing and expressing every aspect of one's identity, including the femininity gay men have been taught to reject. It takes a special kind of person to be so at peace with themselves to shift transform into a different person and explore all aspects of their being. That being said, I don't know if I would leave all drag queens as just cis gay men. (Side note, the people who are saying cisgender isn't a thing are ridiculous.)

Part of drag is reclaiming that which we have been taught is bad about ourselves. If somebody calls me a faggot, for example, screw it. I embrace it. It just means gay. The same goes for a drag performer who wears their femininity on their sleeve. If I have nail polish on, some makeup, and some women's clothing and somebody calls me a tranny--sure, fine. I'm a guy with traditionally female characteristics. 

Certainly it's not cool to call a transman or transwoman a tranny, though because that person is NOT a man dressed as a woman or a woman dressed as a man. I get the offense, no argument there. Here's where I see a disconnect though: At no time were members of the trans community called trannies. The word tranny was used, but in reference to drag queens. Aren't we seeing gender variant people using the word to describe themselves in the irreverent manner that drag embodies? Perhaps you think that the use of the word ever, in any way, at all is bad for the trans community. But I fail to see how much weight that holds. How does censoring language that isn't used in a derogatory manner helpful? How does telling people to shut up help alleviate any transphobia? Doesn't it only exacerbate the issue by making the opposing parties feel attacked? 

Maybe we actually need to get into a more basic question: Is it the content of speech that is important or do individual, isolated words hold just as much power as an overarching message?

I seriously encourage anybody to respond. I'm not searching to argue, I'm searching to better understand all positions. I find this issue particularly interesting because I'm both interested in that fundamental question about how we analyze speech, and because any threat to the unity of the LGBTQIA community is cause for alarm.

Pardon the long-ass post! I would LOVE it if anybody wanted to talk the issue out!
",AskLGBT
Help? Please..?,"Well, first things first, im a woman, well into my twenties, well aware of my sexuality. Always identify myself as heterosexual, BUT my whole life I have been called gay, lesbian, whathaveyou. Obviously I have never taken offense, on the contrary I embrace it. I rally, I party and I am VERY vocal about gay rights which I guess doesnt help my cause. Anyway, here's my problem and w her I would like your opinions: I am extremely turned on by lesbian sex (pornography) and find myself only watching/purchasing that. I have sometimes dreamed of having lesbian encounters and find myself extremely aroused by it. When I think about putting myself in that situation, nothing happens, my mind goes blank, I lose it all. I find that when im completely lucid I have no desires for women. When I have heterosexual sex I enjoy it very much. 

Im just curious if my porn preferences and dreams are trying to tell me something? Am I supposed to give in even though im not interested to ""see if I like it""? I KNOW this has to have happened to more people than just me...

Thoughts? I appreciate any and all comments!! Thanks!",AskLGBT
Question on interactive genderbread person,"Do the last four ""spectra"" when you click orientation apply to a specific gender?",AskLGBT
Against Me's Laura Jane Grace slams Arcade Fire for transgender video - Curious to hear some opinions on this.,,AskLGBT
"Should the ""T"" be in LGBT?","I've been thinking about it a lot lately. I don't really want to say my opinion yet.
But, just in case someone doesn't get it, should transsexualism have its own little thing or do you think it fits in with the rest of the ""LGBT"" acronym?",AskLGBT
Am I a pedophile if I am attracted to my friend who looks like he is 10?,"I'm an 18 year old guy, and I'm in love with one of my friends who is 17 but looks like he has only barely started puberty.

If I didn't know him already, I would think he was somewhere between 8 and 13.

Does this mean I'm a pedophile if I find him sexually attractive?",AskLGBT
Is it wrong to be queer but not involved in the community?,"I only really have cisgender, straight friends. One of my best friends is against same-sex marriage, and I'm okay with that. It's not that I have anything against having friends who aren't straight, but I haven't felt a desire to integrate myself into the community enough to meet them. I've tried joining youth LGBT groups, and I used to be passionate about activism, but now I'm happy just being half out of the closet and not worrying about my sexual orientation (which is bisexual, if you were wondering).",AskLGBT
Preferred(most common?) method of fertilization in lesbians?,"Recently started working with a pregnant lesbian and I really want to ask whether it was a sperm donor or they when 'whole hog' (makes you more gay somehow?) and went artificial insemination but I like her and don't want her getting offended. Do you think that would offend her? Are there other ways of getting pregnant that I don't know about?
 ",AskLGBT
"How did you feel before, during and after coming out.?","A while ago a friend came out to me and i saw her mood and spirit drastically change. from never smiling to smiling regularly. Apparently i was the first person she came out to on campus. Fast forward 3 years and around campus she is fully open yet still experience depression, she told me it is because she hasn't came out to her parents, thus has no familial support. Because she fears that since she is african american and her dad is extremely religious that she would not be accepted by her family.

Do societal factor, family background or other aspect effect your happiness or keep you from coming out. Has your life change since coming out i.e. mood, how others treat you, how you take what they say. And any other details you feel **comfortable** sharing that have occurred during the process.

Thanks for any bit of your story, to helpful fulfill my curiosity.",AskLGBT
How do you deal with being in love with your straight best friend?,"I'm in love with my best friend, and it's heartbreaking. I was wondering if any of you guys have some advice on how to deal with this? ",AskLGBT
"Do you find it offensive or patronizing when people tend to find LGBT relationships ""cute""?","As a straight high school student, I've noticed that a lot of my female classmates tend to react to an LGBT relationship very differently from a straight one; namely with a lot more ""aww""s and ""so cute""s. I suppose it's a good alternative to open hostility, but I know that in those circumstances I would feel somewhat patronized, as if they weren't taking my relationship seriously. How do you react to this kind of response?",AskLGBT
How excepting\non-excepting is the LGTB community for asexuals?,"I myself am asexual, but I hear people saying that asexuality is not a sexual orientation and that we are just following ourselves. Am I just experiencing the bad side, or is this a width-spread thing?",AskLGBT
"When a friend or family member comes out to you, is it offensive to tell them that you've ""already suspected that""?","One of my cousins recently came out.  When she did, I was very supportive, but also said something like ""I had kind of assumed you were for awhile"".  She didn't specifically anything, but it kind of seemed like she was upset about that comment.

Is that an offensive or disrespectful thing to say or something?  If so, I think I'm missing something...",AskLGBT
"""The needs of the many outweigh the needs of the few"" Does this mean than the needs of the LGBT communities are worth less than cisgendered, heterosexual people?",I'm not saying it does but I am a bi-gendered person and most people don't even know what that means. I am in a minority so does this mean I should be expected to give up my happiness for those who don't feel comfortable with my name change and/or pronouns because they are the many?,AskLGBT
"So i found out my sister is ""pretending to be straight around her friends and family""","So obviously she not straight, she does not know I know, (also she is out of town with orchestra). Just anything pointers LGBT community so i can be supportive, I know my dad and my mom wont care, but some of my other relatives probably will (they live in the bible belt). Just a backround, my family is upper-middle class, im cis white straight and male and my brother is the same thing (i think). throwaway as my sister knows my account and dont want to be suspicious (though i know she isnt on reddit).",AskLGBT
I have a really dumb question. Do gay guys care about ass hair?,I don't even know if all guys have ass hair or not.,AskLGBT
"17 and confused on what to do about gender change... well, future gender change.","(I believe this is the best /askgender for this. If not, I'll move to the right one :3 )

Yes yes, I know you have to be 18 for it, but it doesn't mean I can't ask around. I'm a guy who has been wanting to be a girl since I've been little, which has been growing more and more throughout the years. I've got to the point where I feel like this should be a real open option for me, and really other than the money restraint it is. I'm healthy, have access to great health care if needed (UofM is extremely close), but I don't know who to tell, what to do, or anything really. I feel stuck and confused on where to go. I also would like to get a hold of some people who feel the same way, or someone who can help me out, but don't know where to go.

I did research on this already, and have a basic idea of what will happen. I don't know too deep of the details though.",AskLGBT
Is it true that Gay men and Women have generalized distaste (hatred) for bisexual people.,I have been hearing that alot of the gay community does bisexual people because they feel that they wanna play in both fields and need to pick a side and stick with it.  Is this true? I have not had any issues with this myself.,AskLGBT
How do you deal with bigots and haters?,I feel like most gay dudes/girls probably have to deal with bigoted people all the time. Its unfortunate.. but how do you react to that when its brought up by someone against you? It pisses me off that its like that. I wish everyone could just chill the fuck out you know?,AskLGBT
Natural selection and attraction in the homosexual community....why do you maintain vestiges of heterosexuality?,"in hetero, there are traits that appeal....Girls like Brad Pitt, Guys like Salma Hayek.....strong jaw, broad shoulders, chiseled....birthing hips, ample boobs...""Natural Selection attraction""...But not everyone can be with perfect, so they grab what they can get....""I like bald men with guts""....really? Or is it contentment with what you can get? Thunder thighs does it for you or was she just the only one who responded to your ""wink"" on Match?....anyway, this may be debated, I'm a black/white world type...so this is usually where opposition likes to nest.

Moving on, Butch lesbians, and flamboyant feminine men....kinda makes sense to me in a ""natural selection"" aspect....vestiges of brut attracts the more feminine lesbian and the girlish mannerisms appeals more to the ""masculinity"" of Man.......but if masculinity and femininity were the Attracters then they would be heteros. ie..How can you be physically attracted to Biker Butch, but not a similar looking short haired chubby man?  How as a lesbian can you be attracted to Masculinity? How as a Gay man can you be attracted to pink....but only if a guy is wearing it?

Anyway, why aren't Gay men all more masculine and attracted to masculinity....and visaversa for lesbians....why do you need/follow the vestiges of heterosexuality?",AskLGBT
Where to offer up a uterus fore hire?,"I'm in a bit of an odd situation. I'm a ftm transexual and I'd like to get on hormones etc, but the one thing holding me back is that I'd still like to get my genes out there. I can't justify having one for myself at this time because I wouldn't want to bring a kid into the world and not have a stable relationship in place. I'm now fully aware that the situation I want to be in is not going to happen with with way my dysphoria manifests.

I was thinking (and this may be a terrible idea, I'm not sure) that I could find a stable gay couple who want to have a kid, have one of them knock me up, wait 9 months, then transition and be that one uncle to the kid that sends them the best Christmas presents ever. Everyone gets what they want, right? But I have no idea how to go about this.

The only worry I have is that pregnancy will feminise my body and I wouldn't like that. From the other side I can see a gay couple being scared that I'll change my mind at some point and try to steal the kid back somehow, but I'd be cool with signing over all rights (though I'd like them back in the event of the death of both parents or in the case of abuse, but I'm not sure if that's legally possible).

Is this a thing I can do or just a really bad idea that I should put aside?",AskLGBT
Question for same sex parents. Do you have your children call you both the same thing?,"For families with two dads or two moms.  Do the children call both parents the same thing or is there any variation on Dad or Mom to distinguish between parents, especially when talking about them in the third person?",AskLGBT
Kind of confused at this point,"I'm a 22yo male who is into girls on both the intimate sexual and emotional sides of a relationship. But lately I've felt drawn to having an intimate emotional (don't really know how else to put it into words) relationship if the right guy came around, one thing though is that a sexual relationship with another man doesn't have any appeal to me. I guess like I say in my title I'm just really confused and wonder if anyone else has ever felt this way even possibly gender swapping the situation.",AskLGBT
Question From Soon To Be College Graduate Regarding New Job/Insurance Policies and my Boyfriend,"Hi /asklgbt

I've been with my boyfriend for over 2 years now, live in Texas. I'm graduating this May, I just took a job offer with a company also in Texas and I've been going over the benefits. How does insurance work if I want to put my boyfriend on the insurance plan?

Do I get spouse (but we're not married and legally can't be) or do I do family which is much more expensive? What are my options?",AskLGBT
Something I don't understand.,"Let me preface this.  I am a 21 year old straight man and I'm asking this question out of ignorance and I am not trying to offend anyone in any way.  I'm just trying to understand.  

I understand that you are born with a sexuality.  There is nothing wrong with being gay or being straight.  There is nothing to 'cure' even if you try going to one of those 'straight camps' or whatever they are.  They wont work because it's trying to deny who you truly are on the inside.  

My question comes for transexuals and people who go through gender reassignment.  If you are either born gay or born straight then by that same logic shouldn't you either be born a man or a woman. I understand that some people are born and they aren't entirely sure.  My question is more for people who are born with XX or XY chromosomes and go through a physical transformation to the opposite sex.  Weren't those people born men or women and they are choosing to be the opposite of that?  Is getting gender reassignment the same thing as going through a 'straight camp'? 

Again I'm not trying to be offensive I'm just trying to understand.  Thanks!",AskLGBT
How common is it to feel depressed as a queer person? and what can you do about it?,"I'm asking because, well, obviously I suspect I am. (and have been for quite a long time). I think being a queer person complicates things a lot though. Its hard to escape from things that get you down when you're feeling low because they are everywhere. Its hard to see a doctor or someone like that because if theyre not queer; how do they know what you're going through? Sometimes if they are an old, heterosexual person they can make things worse.

Anyway any comments would be appreciated.
Cheers
",AskLGBT
"Where are my man parts? A.k.a. how does it ""feel"" to be of any gender?","So as far as I understand the Genderbread Person on the sidebar is the most accurate tool of explaining the different spectra of sexuality and gender identity. However, I have a little trouble understanding it. Here's how Genderbread Person applies to me:

* The attraction part is simple: I like women and only women.

* Sex part as well: a functional set of male genitalia, not much ambivalence there.

* Gender expression: while I'm not into watching sports, pretty much everything about the way I dress, my hobbies, personality, ways of looking at the world is undoubtedly more masculine than feminine.

* Gender identity: here's the hard part. I identify as a man because I fit into the most common subtype of men: heterosexual, biologically male and masculine. But I don't have any particular connection to my manhood, not like I have with my sexuality, sex and masculinity. Being a man is just a way to decide which toilet to choose, which pronoun to use for myself, which aisles at a clothing shop to go to, which media target my demographic.

Yet it seems that gender identity can be very separate from the other three spectra. There's plenty of male-born people who claim to ""feel like a woman"" and vice versa, as well as people who claim to feel both male and female. Is ""feeling male"" something that you notice only if you're LGBT? Is it specifically tied to wishing for a male or female body? How would I be different if I was a very butch transsexual lesbian, agender or genderfluid?
",AskLGBT
Rejected in the gay world...,"First of all, the title can be a little hard but I'm not that good at English to know the right word... Sorry about that...Anyway... I'm mostly out of the closet, I have a boyfriend, I don't hide that I'm gay so don't give me the repressed gay talk. I'm gay, i know it and I'm more than happy with it but... Why do I need to be your kind of gay??? I go out often with hetero friends because find a guy interested in videogames, tech, football, rock climbing and some other things is really hard in the gay world, at least for me...Each time that I say this to a gay friend they say that I'm repressed and all of that but... Gays of reddit, we always say that other people need to respect gay rights and our way of thinking and at the same time I usually get rejected by other gays because the way I am...So... At the end we behave as heterosexuals? At the end also in the gay world I'm supposed to be rejected because I don't fit the stereotypes? Because I'm not as gay as I should be?I was actually expecting more from the gay world...",AskLGBT
"If science found a ""cure"" for homosexuality, would you take it?","assume no side effects and nothing surgical....something like a birth control implant hormonal/medicinal time release concoction that triggered desire for the opposite sex and diminished to near zero desire for same sex.

You could be ""normal""....would you?",AskLGBT
"Is it possible to catch ""the gays"" as a child?",I come from a southern town.  My buddy was recently telling me how he beat the fuck out of his son for playing with dolls and that would teach him not to do that again.  He was telling me how kids that boys that play with dolls will turn gay if the behavior is not stopped.  I wanted to ask the professionals so I can monitor my sons behavior so it doesn't happen.  Is this a true thing or yall born that way?,AskLGBT
"I (23 F) made out with my friend (25 F), and I'm very confused?","It was about a week ago. My friend and I went to this club, and got insanely drunk. We ended up making out a lot, like tongue, groping, the works. I don't really remember much from that night honestly, but what I do just makes me feel weird. I'd never kissed a girl before. I think I'm attracted to her...? It's so embarrassing. I don't know what to do. I feel like that Katy Perry song. =.="" ",AskLGBT
Relationship issues...,"Ok, I have been dating a guy for 4-5 months and we were really good together. I'm 25, mostly top, he 22, mostly bottom. Sex is more than fine, actually is pretty good... The relationship itself is complicated.We live in different cities but close. He study in my city but live in his hometown with his parents and he still in the closet, I live in a student residence in a double room.Usually we se each other in the weekends and when he came to my place I'm pretty horny because I haven't see him for a week so my first priority is sex. We also go out and spend time together but mostly is sex because we have just a day or two each week.A couple of days ago we were texting and he writes to me ""I would like to see you and spend time with you but without doing what we usually do""...He was talking about sex and I agree that our relationship is mostly physical and I'm more than ok about been more emotional but... Maybe I'm the wrong one but... Isn't normal to be horny after a week?And also... He can also say that we should spend more time together... Or trying to see each other in a non weekend day... Is not sex the answer? I'm I the wrong one? I'm I been insensitive? Any general advice?",AskLGBT
"Forced Gender Rolls topic: Gay men, did you play with dolls growing up? Did you do girlish things on your own?","My sister is on some warpath about feminism and forced gender rolls, I was just wondering if ""without being forced"",you, on your own, ""born that way"", gravitated to more ""historically feminine"" activities or trends.

My argument is that people are born with natural propensities...and that women like pink and dolls naturally because they(most) were born that way, and not because people forced chicks to like pink and play with dolls.  ",AskLGBT
"I've been outed at work, which is bad. What do I do?","A little background information: 

I work as a paraprofessional in a high school, which basically means I do whatever a teacher wants me to. Part of my job is standing around the Jr. High locker room while students change, in the off chance that they get in fights or smear feces everywhere, and also because there isn't a male PE teacher to monitor the locker room. This, while a bit uncomfortable for me, isn't really a problem. However: my youngest brother is in Jr. High (though he doesn't have gym).

The problem is, he told a number of his friends that I'm gay, for whatever reason. Some of them are now behaving... Poorly, for lack of a better word. They insist on asking me for hugs, and asking uncomfortable questions and making discomforting statements.  I guess what I'm asking is, what can I do? Should I do anything? I've already addressed the issue with my brother, and let him know what he did was unacceptable. Thoughts? Suggestions?

Tl;dr: Students I work with know I'm gay and I'm really uncomfortable. What can I do?",AskLGBT
Am I confused?,I can see myself dating or kissing a guy but not having sex with a guy. Am I repressing bi-sexual thoughts or am I just weird?,AskLGBT
Pronouns addressing gender neutral people,"I have heard about gender neutral people which to my understanding are people who, genderwise, don't see themselves as male or female and I have also heard that apparently there are specialized pronouns for addressing such individuals. 

I was wondering two things and please forgive me if this comes off as crass that is not my intention but...1. Is there a standardized form of these pronouns? I have found a few different ones. 2. Do some people default to using their sexes for pronouns out of convenience?

This doesn't really affect me too much but I heard about and became curious.

Thank you for the time

edit: misspelling ",AskLGBT
I don't understand transgender people.,"I don't want to seem trans phobic, but I just don't understand.
I always thought that everyone was a human, and the only way to 
Differentiate between humans was by their physical attributes.
As in race, genitals, ect. So I understand gays, lesbians, bisexuals and asexuals, because I understand that different people can be attracted to different things, but I still don't see why anyone would want to think of themselves as a human that has different genitals. It just seems weird to me.

Can anyone help me understand this?",AskLGBT
Where do crossdressers fit?,"I'm a male crossdresser, and when I go em femme, I go as a woman. I don't want to be a woman full time, but I really enjoy being a woman. So, I've been told I'm not transgender as I don't want to be a woman. I want to keep my boy parts (although sometimes I wonder...). 

I'm not quite gay (gay curious, but nothing yet). I'm straight, married, I just like being a woman sometimes. 

So, where in the LGBT do I fit? It really seems lonely sometimes. Don't really fit in anywhere.",AskLGBT
How did you find out?,"Right now I'm going through a part of my life where I'm not sure what I am, and I just want to ask LGBT people how they found out that they were not straight. 

Thanks!",AskLGBT
How do I tell my partner I am gender fluid?,"I know he does not have much of an interest in LGBTQ+ stuff so he understands little about gender so I am worried he will not understand and think it's not real or something.

My parents live near this Trans Woman who is also gay and he says that she is doing it for attention. This worries me and makes me feel that it's better to just hide this from him, I only ever wear woman's jeans and stuff due to self-harming scars covering my entire right leg from when I lost all my friends for being gay. I will never wear a skirt/dress because of this so is it even worth bringing this up? I love him so much and don't want to lose him, we are even due to be married in a year or two depending on money. 

Thank you for your help and I am sorry for putting this in more than than subreddit I just need some help.",AskLGBT
"This may sound ignorant, and probably is...","Background: I'm a newly-aware (as of last month) transgender woman, still presenting as male, all that jazz. I'm looking for help &amp; support in my local area.

There's this guy who works in a hair salon inside the store where I work. I have a suspicion that he's gay or bi, partly from his appearance (nothing specific, but he's got fabulous hair), partly from his profession (yes, I know, stereotypes), and partly because he was out shopping with another dude on Thanksgiving. I know, that's a lot of circumstantial and stereotypical BS, but it's literally all I have to go on. It wouldn't matter to me, at all, because I'm not interested in dudes, however, I wanted to ask him about LGBT support groups in the area. However, I'm afraid that if I'm wrong, and he's not gay or bi, he may be offended; or worse, he'll spread it around that I was asking about that. I don't want anyone to assume, at the moment, that I'm anything other than a cisgender straight male; yes, I'm very much in the closet about my transgender status.

Any advice? Should I just not approach him at all about it? If I should, what approach should I take? If not... he's literally the only person I have seen in the area that I have any inkling might fall under the LGBT umbrella. What other actions should I take instead?",AskLGBT
"I want to date something who's twice my age, is this wrong?",I'm 20 and gay.. just to give some context.,AskLGBT
Reach arounds? Who actually likes them and does them.,"I was talking with some friends last night and they all said that it was manditory, but I have never done it. Does this make me a bad top?",AskLGBT
"I have always been under the impression that lesbians don't really get STD's; or at least, it is extremely rare for them to get them. Is this accurate?",,AskLGBT
"Lesbians of ask LGBT, what do you find attractive in a woman.","Now I'm not asking what Lesbian women find attractive in other women overall, I am asking **you**, what qualities in a woman do *you* find--physically, emotionally, etc.--attractive?",AskLGBT
Has anyone ever tried to be friends with you simply because of your gender/sexual identity?,,AskLGBT
Studies my college professor keep bringing up,"Alright so my Introduction to Criminal Justice professor keep referencing certain studies that I feel, for lack of a better term, are complete bull.
 
The first one I feel he believes since he has spoken of it in numerous classes. It was about how bisexuality isn't truly a thing and people who identify as bisexual are homosexual that 'allow' themselves to be heterosexual. I have no idea how someone 'allows' themselves to be heterosexual since sexuality isn't really a choice. A bisexual person could have a preference to who they want to have sex with but that doesn't make them any less bisexual if they are attracted to both males and females

The second was that gay and lesbian people shouldn't hug children of the same sex because it could transmit sexual tendencies. Tried searching for it and the first thing that came up on google was pedophilia. It's ironic since my prof. used to work in child sex crimes. The only way I could see someone transmitting 'sexual tendencies' is if they were a sexual predator and even if this study does have merit I feel like it is essentially claiming that being gay is wrong. ""You shouldn't hug kids because you might give them the gay"" or something along those lines.

Basically my questions are the following:
1. Are these real studies?
2. Is there any real scientific evidence supporting these claims?
3. How should I respond to this professor?",AskLGBT
"Cis woman, needing your input.","Hello.

I am a cis woman, though I don't very strongly identify as a ""woman"". I just acknowlege that I have a female body, people recognise me as a woman, I'm used to it and ok with it. I am bisexual, and much more attracted to women, even if I have more experience with men. I am 25.

I fantasize only about women, and when masturbating, exclusively think of penetrating a women, with my penis. Of course, I don't have a penis. Afterwards, I sometimes feel down that I don't, and wonder why it seems so evident and natural that I should have a penis in such situations. In non sexual circumstances, I seem to be perfectly fine with my body being female.

I have used with different partners dildos for couples (strapless), which looked like I had a fluo dick, and it was very nice. But it seems to be more than a fantasy I like to enjoy once in a while.

So... I was wondering if any of you ever experienced that. Is it just some kind of wierd kink I have ? Or could it be the sign of some bigger gender or sexual problem ?

I'm quite sexpositive, but the impossibility of this desire, and the fact that it is the only way I like to masturbate, make me worry a bit.",AskLGBT
Do you consider asexual individuals part of the LGBTQ community?,I am curious on a friend's behalf- does she got in here? Would she be welcomed by the community?,AskLGBT
"Advice for a straight ""girl"" with gender dysphoria","Hey Reddit, 

Just wondering if any of you had some advice for me. I identify as straight (i.e. interested in men) but have some issues with gender identity. I have more ""masculine"" interests and appearance (short hair, men's clothing) though a ""feminine"" personality. 

I have a multitude of straight male friends, but none of which have ever showed an interest in me romantically (to my knowledge), and although I am not assuming it has to do with my gender identity, I'd have to imagine that it must be a factor. A couple of my friends have also outwardly told me that I'm ""one of the boys,"" which is comforting in away but also discerning because straight men aren't interested in ""boys"". Should I avert my attention to a different demographic (i.e. bisexual men)? Or do I have this whole thing wrong, all together? Please let me know what you think. I've never asked an LGBTQ community. Actually, I've never asked anyone or even came out as having gender issues though it is probably apparent through my appearance.

Note: I am defining masculine and feminine by the stereotypical definitions given by society though I don't personally believe that the distinction between the two genders is innate.",AskLGBT
Check out the advice I gave a reader regarding love.,,AskLGBT
"I ""came out"" to my dad but it doesn't feel like it.","**tl;dr - I came out to my dad, he reacted poorly. Didn't talk to me for a few weeks but we eventually resolved the conflict and everything went back to normal, except it now feels like I never came out in the first place.**

About 2-3 years ago, I was struggling with whether or not to tell my family that I am bi. I'd known for a while that I was attracted to both genders, but I never really felt compelled to tell anyone since I wasn't sexually active or pursuing anything with anyone. My dad always hated when people were vocal about their sexuality (PDA, over-the-top behaviours related to sexuality, etc).

About a week before telling him, I started questioning whether or not I should just get it over with and tell my parents that I'm bi. The thing is I genuinely thought my parents already knew - he had helped me fix a virus from my computer when I was browsing gay porn back in elementary school, so at the least I thought he had an idea that I might not be as ""straight"" as I look. I was also fairly ""girly"" as a child - I'd always play with a female friend's barbies when I was younger and I'd always relate more with the sisters of male classmates and 'friends'.

I decided one day to just kind of tell him out of the blue when we were alone since my mom was out grocery shopping and the question of whether or not to tell him was eating at me. My dad is my best friend and I'm his, so I felt it would be easier to just tell him first. When I told him, he reacted pretty harshly... he basically shut down and thought I said it to piss him off, and that I based my sexuality only on the things I saw online (re gay porn) and not on actual attraction. He got fairly angry at me when I tried to question it so I just let it go and left so that he could deal with it on his own. He didn't talk to me at all for the next 1-2 weeks which just really hurt.

After those few weeks, when we were driving alone together. He pulled into a parking lot and we talked it out, and settled out his feelings about me coming out, so we got back to our old relationship very quickly. He asked me to date a girl before I do anything and to make sure I know what it's like to be with a girl before I ""experiment"" with guys. He also asked me to never tell my mom about being bi, which I said okay to as well (it was an emotional night, I just kind of wanted my dad back so I agreed to what he wanted of me)

The thing is though, it now basically feels like he forgot about the entire thing... We have never discussed it again and he still makes the same jokes about me dating girls all the time. If I bring it back up or tell him that I want to tell my mom and let her know, I feel like he'll react the exact same way he did the first time I came out. It frustrates me because I just feel like he'll only accept me if I handle my decisions in a way that he finds acceptable. To add to the issue, I'm pretty sure my mom would react the same way my dad did (based on comments she's made to me regarding her experience with a gay cousin), so that doesn't really help at all. 

My parents aren't very religious or anything, they're just not open-minded when it comes to the affairs of others. My dad is also racist (although I really don't like using that word to describe him) and always finds flaws in everything (I say this because he would have the same issues with me dating someone outside of my race). I'm also very close to my family. My dad and I are basically best friends and my mom means the world to me. I don't want to sever my relationship with them but this issue feels like it would do exactly that if I told them.

I basically just want to tell him that it's my life and that he needs to accept me regardless of what decisions I make, but I don't want to say it harshly... I just want him to understand that he can't let me live my life freely if he puts conditions on what I can or cannot say and do.",AskLGBT
What are all the different gender types?,"My SO has a lot of friends who are different genders than what I'm used to.  I tried wikipediaing some, but it seems like some are the same thing.  Like bisexual vs pansexual.  I know pan means all, but are there really more than just two sexual orientations?

What are:

Agender, bigender, transexual vs transgender, asexual, pansexual, genderfluid, and anything else that I don't yet know about?",AskLGBT
A girlfag is a heterosexual girl attracted to homosexual men. What do you call a guy attracted to girlfags?,"Not sure where I should ask this. If this is the wrong subreddit, I would welcome a redirection to a different subreddit.

(And no, I'm not referring to myself).",AskLGBT
Am I am member of the community?,"I have always considered myself a strong ally but recently I have realized I have some sexual attraction to women. I get turned on thinking about them and like watching lesbian porn. I see girls sometimes and think that they look really sexy and I want to touch their boobs or something. 

But that is where it stops. I can't imagine feeling any sort of romantic feelings for a woman. I love the man-ness of men when it comes to cuddling and relationships and all that. I guess I am heteroromantic but bisexual? 

My issue is kind of a silly one. Am I part of the community or just and ally? I am probably never going to face any persecution for these feelings so I don't know if it is fair to budge into the space of people who have real issues relating to their sexuality. I am kind of just like a straight partygirl who makes out with a girl while others watch (not that I have done that.) and it doesn't seem fair to people who face actual issues.",AskLGBT
How long did it take you to accept yourself?,"I'm not LGBT, but I'm very pro-equality and anti-bigotry. Following the trans thread in /r/askreddit earlier today, it reminded me how today's world can still be an intolerant place. 

When you were figuring everything out, did you try and deny who you really were? Did you have a pretty good idea of it but try to talk yourself out of it because of fear? Did you have a sudden moment of clarity when you made the decision to embrace your feelings?",AskLGBT
I am scared what should do about coming out?,So I am 14 years old and I know I was gay around 9. I tried to hide but I guess I was a little fem. My mom told me she didn't want a gay son about over a year ago. I told her no that is gross. She said that would be the most embarrassing thing. I got really depressed over that and started cutting and was about to kill myself but I detracted myself with Beyonce. Hence the name BeyNation. Now I try to stay away from my family so it won't hurt them when I come out or do something stupud. ,AskLGBT
"So, I'm not gay but I wish I was, and I have no idea why. And thoughts?",,AskLGBT
Any advice for planning a bachelor party for my gay friend's wedding?,"So my friend is getting married, and I am planning his bachelor party.  He planned mine years ago, and it was awesome. I really want to repay him, but I don't know what to do. I have been a part of several traditional weddings, so I know the typical ""guys night"" stuff for a bachelor party. I really want some ideas to go above and beyond. 

My questions can probably summed up:
Who should be invited? (There are gay and straight men and women in his wedding party.)
What activities might be fun?
Is there a better term to use instead of ""bachelor"" party?

Any suggestions would be greatly appreciated. ",AskLGBT
"ATTN ASKER: This is currently a more active subreddit, if you want to ask a question",,AskLGBT
"Hi Reddit, I have a personal dilemma, perhaps you could help shed some light on it?","So, to make a long story short, I have been bi-curious for years upon years, and I've been pretty shy about it up until recently, and here's where the dilemma is. I'm in a very committed relationship, and I enjoy it thoroughly, but have been away from the area I'm living in for a few years, and running into old friends has been eye-opening, to say the least. One of my childhood friends and I recently started hanging out a lot again, and he's always been very open about his sexuality and has dated other guys before, and has always told me I was a good looking guy, always told me ""What a shame it was that I was so straight."" But we would kinda just laugh it off, joking around. Well, when we started hanging out again, I've been noticing how I'm starting to fantasize about having sex with him, and it's bothering me because I want so much  to see how sex with another man would be, but am afraid of screwing up my relationship with my girlfriend, although she is very understanding, but here's where it gets tricky: They're also exes, so my friendship with him has been awkward in some situations. Another point to this is I know he would be understanding and comfortable with it, as he's told me in the past, and I feel like if I were to have relations with another man, I would rather do it with someone I trust and would be caring and gentle, but passionate at the same time, and we both ""Hit on"" each other all the time and have kissed in the past at parties and what not. Reddit, how do I approach this situation? And sorry for the rambling, it's just plaguing my mind and making it difficult to think.

TL;DR: Bi-curious for years, in a committed relationship, have the hots for my best friend who is openly bisexual, but happens to be my dedicated girlfriends recent ex boyfriends.",AskLGBT
Is no homo really homophobic?,"I just saw on a site that tracked ""Homophobic"" tweets to show the casual use of offensive language, it tracked Faggot, yeah that makes sense, Dyke, again makes sense, so gay, yeah I get that. But what I don't get is that it tracked No homo, I'm like ""what?"" so is no homo homophobic? If so, explain.",AskLGBT
"Dear LGBT, what are the technical differences between ""bisexuality"" and ""pansexuality""?","I've seen definitions and read up on both of them but I still feel like it's safe to call them the same. Is it that with bisexuality there's a 'lean' towards a gender, whereas pansexuality completely ignores that?

BTW, I hope this is a good question to get the ball rolling here. Good subreddit idea!",AskLGBT
"What do we do when the ""Gaydar"" fails?","I'm a straight male.  I have never had it happen but its been a curiosity of mine for a while.

How do we respond when your gaydar fails?",AskLGBT
